California, session 20252026, SB857.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7583.7 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7583.7. (a) The course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force may be administered, tested, and certified by any licensee or by any organization or school approved by the department. The department may approve any person or school to teach the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force. The department may review and provide more guidance on courses of training when best practices are updated. The course of training shall be approximately eight hours in length and shall cover all of the following topics:(1) Responsibilities and ethics in citizen arrest.(2) Relationship between a security guard and a peace officer in making an arrest.(3) Limitations on security guard power to arrest.(4) Restrictions on searches and seizures.(5) Criminal and civil liabilities, including both of the following:(A) Personal liability.(B) Employer liability.(6) Trespass law.(7) Ethics and communications.(8) Emergency situation response, including response to medical emergencies.(9) Security officer safety.(10) The appropriate use of force, including all of the following topics:(A) Legal standards for use of force.(B) Duty to intercede.(C) The use of objectively reasonable force.(D) Supervisory responsibilities.(E) Use of force review and analysis.(F) De-escalation and interpersonal communication training, including tactical methods that use time, distance, cover, and concealment, to avoid escalating situations that lead to violence.(G) Implicit and explicit bias and cultural competency.(H) Skills, including de-escalation techniques, to effectively, safely, and respectfully interact with people with disabilities or behavioral health issues.(I) Use of force scenario training, including simulations of low-frequency, high-risk situations and calls for service, shoot-or-don’t-shoot situations, and real-time force option decisionmaking.(J) Mental health and policing, including bias and stigma.(K) Active shooter situations.(11) Any other topic deemed appropriate by the bureau, excluding Weapons of Mass Destruction and Terrorism Awareness, which may be an elective topic only.(b) (1) The majority of the course shall be taught by means of verbal instruction. This instruction may include the use of a video presentation.(2) Paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) shall be conducted through traditional classroom instruction. For the purposes of this paragraph, “traditional classroom instruction” means instruction where the instructor is physically present with students in a classroom for a minimum of 50 percent of the course and is available at all times, including during instruction provided through distance learning or remote platforms, to answer students’ questions while providing the required training. In this setting, the instructor provides demonstrations and hands-on instruction in order to establish each student’s proficiency as to the course content.(c) (1) The department shall make available a guidebook as a standard for teaching the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force, which may be known as the Power to Arrest and Appropriate Use of Force Manual. The department shall encourage additional training and may provide a training guide recommending additional courses to be taken by security personnel.(2) The development, adoption, amendment, or repeal of the Power to Arrest and Appropriate Use of Force Manual by the bureau is exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(d) Private patrol operators may provide a copy of the Power to Arrest and Appropriate Use of Force Manual to each person that they currently employ as a security guard. The private patrol operator may provide the guidebook to each person the private patrol operator intends to hire as a security guard a reasonable time prior to the time the person begins the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force.(e) The bureau may inspect, supervise, or view the administration of the test at any time and without any prior notification. Any impropriety in the administration of the course or the test shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action.(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.SEC. 2. Section 7598.2 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7598.2. (a) The course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force may be administered, tested, and certified by any licensee. The department may approve any person or school to teach the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force. The course of training shall be approximately four hours in length and cover the following topics:(1) Responsibilities and ethics in citizen arrest.(2) Relationship with the public police in arrest.(3) Limitations on security guard power to arrest.(4) Restrictions on searches and seizures.(5) Criminal and civil liabilities.(A) Personal liability.(B) Employer liability.(6) The appropriate use of force, including all of the following topics:(A) Legal standards for use of force.(B) Duty to intercede.(C) The use of objectively reasonable force.(D) Supervisory responsibilities.(E) Use of force review and analysis.(F) De-escalation and interpersonal communication training, including tactical methods that use time, distance, cover, and concealment, to avoid escalating situations that lead to violence.(G) Implicit and explicit bias and cultural competency.(H) Skills, including de-escalation techniques, to effectively, safely, and respectfully interact with people with disabilities or behavioral health issues.(I) Use of force scenario training, including simulations of low-frequency, high-risk situations and calls for service, shoot-or-don’t-shoot situations, and real-time force option decisionmaking.(J) Mental health and policing, including bias and stigma.(K) Active shooter situations.(7) Any other topic deemed appropriate by the bureau, excluding Weapons of Mass Destruction and Terrorism Awareness, which may be an elective topic only.(b) Paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) shall be conducted through traditional classroom instruction. For the purposes of this subdivision, “traditional classroom instruction” means instruction where the instructor is physically present with students in a classroom and is available to answer students’ questions while providing the required training. In this setting, the instructor provides demonstrations and hands-on instruction in order to establish each student’s proficiency as to the course content.(c) The department shall make available a guidebook as a standard for teaching the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force. The department shall encourage additional training and may provide a training guide recommending additional courses.(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.SEC. 3. Section 49428.2 of the Education Code is amended to read:49428.2. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Local educational agency” means a county office of education, school district, state special school, or charter school that serves pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive.(2) “Youth behavioral health disorders” means pupil mental health and substance use disorders.(3) “Youth behavioral health training” means training that develops awareness of trauma and the brain’s response to stress and the protective factors for behavioral health and well-being that support healing and resilience.(b) (1) The governing board or body of a local educational agency shall, before January 31, 2026, adopt, at a regularly scheduled meeting, a policy on referral protocols for addressing pupil behavioral health concerns in grades 7 to 12, inclusive. The policy shall be developed in consultation with school and community stakeholders and school-linked behavioral health professionals, and shall, at a minimum, address procedures relating to referrals to behavioral health professionals and support services. Policies adopted before the date of enactment of the act that added this section may be considered to meet the requirements of this section, if they fulfill the requirements of this section.(2) The policy adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall either be based on the model policy developed by the department or be consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 49428.1.(3) The policy adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall specifically address the needs of high-risk groups, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) Pupils bereaved by death or loss of a close family member or friend.(B) Pupils for whom there is concern due to behavioral health disorders, including common psychiatric conditions and substance use disorders such as opioid and alcohol abuse.(C) Pupils with disabilities, mental illness, or substance use disorders.(D) Pupils experiencing homelessness or placed in out-of-home settings, such as foster care.(E) Lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, or questioning pupils.(4) (A) The policy adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall also address any training to be provided to teachers of pupils in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, on pupil behavioral health.(B) Materials approved by a local educational agency for training shall include how to identify appropriate contacts for behavioral health evaluation, services, or both evaluation and services, at both the schoolsite and within the larger community, and when and how to refer pupils and their families to those services.(C) Materials approved for training may also include programs that can be completed through self-review of materials developed pursuant to this section.(5) The policy adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be written to ensure that a school employee acts only within the authorization and scope of the employee’s credential or license. Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing or encouraging a school employee to diagnose or treat youth behavioral health disorders unless the employee is specifically licensed and employed to do so.(6) To assist local educational agencies in developing policies on referral protocols, the department shall develop and maintain a model policy in accordance with Section 49428.1 to serve as a guide for local educational agencies.(c) Subject to subdivision (d), on or before July 1, 2029, a local educational agency shall certify to the department that 100 percent of its certificated employees and 40 percent of its classified employees, who have direct contact with pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, have received youth behavioral health training at least one time, in accordance with all of the following:(1) The training provides instruction around the unique risk factors and warning signs of behavioral health problems in adolescents, builds understanding of the importance of early intervention, and teaches classified and certificated employees how to help an adolescent in crisis or experiencing a behavioral health challenge, including guidance on when to make referrals consistent with the policy adopted pursuant to subdivision (b). The training may also include the following:(A) Instruction on recognizing the signs and symptoms of youth behavioral health disorders, including, but not limited to, psychiatric conditions and substance use disorders such as opioid and alcohol abuse.(B) Instruction on how to maintain pupil privacy and confidentiality in a manner consistent with federal and state privacy laws.(C) Instruction on the safe de-escalation of crisis situations involving pupils with a youth behavioral health disorder.(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the youth behavioral health training is provided to classified and certificated employees during regularly scheduled work hours.(3) If a classified or certificated employee receives the youth behavioral health training in a manner other than through an in-service training program provided by the local educational agency, the employee may present a certificate of successful completion of the training to the local educational agency for purposes of satisfying the requirements of this subdivision.(4) The youth behavioral health training shall not be a condition of employment or hiring for classified or certificated employees.(5) A local educational agency may use the training described in subdivision (c) of Section 49428.15 to meet the requirements of this section.(d) A local educational agency may exclude a licensed behavioral health professional who holds a pupil personnel services credential from the youth behavioral health training required by this section.(e) A local educational agency may meet the requirements of subdivision (c) through an alternative approach by adopting a policy that describes how this approach is consistent with the goals specified in subdivision (c) but better meets the needs of pupils.(f) Any parts of this section that fall within the scope of representation, as that term is used in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 3543.2 of the Government Code, are subject to bargaining with the exclusive representative pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the sum of thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000), or as much of that amount as is available, be allocated to the department, for apportionments to local educational agencies in the 2025–26 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 36005 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. Upon appropriation for this purpose, all of the following shall apply:(1) The funding shall be provided on a per-pupil basis for each pupil enrolled in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, as reported in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System for the prior year Fall 1 Submission to meet the requirements of this section.(2) Local educational agencies shall first use the funding provided to support the youth behavioral health training described in subdivision (c).(3) If there are remaining funds, local educational agencies shall use the funds to offer additional training consistent with this section or to increase the number of staff that hold a pupil personnel services credential within the local educational agency.(h) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2030, and, as of January 1, 2031, is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 49428.15 of the Education Code is amended to read:49428.15. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Evidence-based” means peer-reviewed, scientific research evidence, including studies based on research methodologies that control threats to both the internal and the external validity of the research findings.(2) “Evidence-informed” means using research that is already available and has been tested for efficacy and effectiveness. This evidence is then combined with the experiences and expertise of the training program developers to best fit the population intended to be served.(3) “Local educational agency” means a county office of education, school district, state special school, or charter school that serves pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive.(4) “Youth behavioral health disorders” means pupil mental health and substance use disorders.(5) “Youth behavioral health training” means training addressing the signs and symptoms of a pupil mental health or substance use disorder.(b) The department shall, on or before January 1, 2023, recommend best practices, and identify evidence-based and evidence-informed training programs for schools to address youth behavioral health, including, but not necessarily limited to, staff and pupil training.(c) In identifying one or more evidence-based or evidence-informed youth behavioral health training programs for use by local educational agencies to train school staff or pupils pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall ensure that each training program meets all of the following requirements:(1) Provides instruction on recognizing the signs and symptoms of youth behavioral health disorders, including common psychiatric conditions and substance use disorders such as opioid and alcohol abuse.(2) Provides instruction on how school staff can best provide referrals to youth behavioral health services or other support to individuals in the early stages of developing a youth behavioral health disorder.(3) Provides instruction on how to maintain pupil privacy and confidentiality in a manner consistent with federal and state privacy laws.(4) Provides instruction on the safe de-escalation of crisis situations involving individuals with a youth behavioral health disorder.(5) Is capable of assessing trainee knowledge before and after training is provided in order to measure training outcomes.(6) Is administered by a nationally recognized training authority in youth behavioral health disorders or by a local educational agency.(7) (A) Includes in-person and virtual training with certified instructors who can recommend resources available in the community for individuals with a youth behavioral health disorder.(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “certified instructors” means individuals who obtain or have obtained a certification to provide the selected youth behavioral health training.(d) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that an appropriation is made in the annual Budget Act or another statute for these purposes.SEC. 5. Section 56366.1 of the Education Code is amended to read:56366.1. (a) A nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency that seeks certification shall file an application with the Superintendent on forms provided by the department, and shall include all of the following information on the application:(1) A description of the special education and designated instruction and services provided to individuals with exceptional needs if the application is for nonpublic, nonsectarian school certification.(2) A description of the designated instruction and services provided to individuals with exceptional needs if the application is for nonpublic, nonsectarian agency certification.(3) A list of appropriately qualified staff, a description of the credential, license, or registration that qualifies each staff member rendering special education or designated instruction and services to do so, and copies of their credentials, licenses, or certificates of registration with the appropriate state or national organization that has established standards for the service rendered.(4) (A) (i) Commencing with the 2020–21 school year, documentation that the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency will train staff who will have contact or interaction with pupils during the schoolday in the use of evidence-based practices and interventions specific to the unique behavioral needs of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency’s pupil population. The training shall be provided within 30 days of employment to new staff who have any contact or interaction with pupils during the schoolday, and annually to all staff who have any contact or interaction with pupils during the schoolday.(ii) For a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency that was in existence as of the January 1 immediately preceding a school year, documentation that the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency’s staff members who will have contact or interaction with pupils during the schoolday have received training that complies with the requirements of subparagraphs (B) and (C).(B) The training described in this paragraph shall be selected and conducted by the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency and shall satisfy all of the following conditions:(i) Be conducted by persons licensed or certified in fields related to the evidence-based practices and interventions being taught.(ii) Be taught in a manner consistent with the development and implementation of individualized education programs.(iii) Be consistent with the requirements of Article 5.2 (commencing with Section 49005) of Chapter 6 of Part 27, relating to pupil discipline.(C) The content of the training described in this paragraph shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:(i) Positive behavioral intervention and supports, including collection, analysis, and use of data to inform, plan, and implement behavioral supports.(ii) How to understand and address challenging behaviors, including evidence-based strategies for preventing those behaviors.(iii) Evidence-based interventions for reducing and replacing challenging behaviors, including de-escalation techniques.(D) (i) The contracting local educational agency shall verify the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency’s compliance with the requirements of this paragraph, and the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall report the contracting local educational agency’s verification to the Superintendent annually with the annual certification documents described in subdivision (h).(ii) For a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency seeking initial certification, the contracting local educational agency shall verify that the plan and timeline for training provided pursuant to this paragraph are included in the master contract.(iii) For a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency not in existence as of the January 1 immediately preceding a school year, the contracting local educational agency shall, 30 days following the commencement of the school year, verify that the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency provided the training required by this paragraph, and shall submit the verification to the Superintendent at that time.(iv) The nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall maintain written records of the training provided pursuant to this paragraph, and shall provide written verification of the training upon request.(5) Commencing with the 2021–22 school year, documentation that the administrator of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school holds or is in the process of obtaining one of the following:(A) An administrative credential granted by an accredited postsecondary educational institution and two years of experience with pupils with disabilities.(B) A pupil personnel services credential that authorizes school counseling or psychology.(C) A license as a clinical social worker issued by the Board of Behavioral Sciences.(D) A license in psychology regulated by the Board of Psychology.(E) A master’s degree issued by an accredited postsecondary institution in education, special education, psychology, counseling, behavioral analysis, social work, behavioral science, or rehabilitation.(F) A credential authorizing special education instruction and at least two years of experience teaching in special education before becoming an administrator.(G) A license as a marriage and family therapist certified by the Board of Behavioral Sciences.(H) A license as an educational psychologist issued by the Board of Behavioral Sciences.(I) A license as a professional clinical counselor issued by the Board of Behavioral Sciences.(6) An annual operating budget.(7) Affidavits and assurances necessary to comply with all applicable federal, state, and local laws and regulations that include criminal record summaries required of all nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency personnel having contact with minor children under Section 44237.(8) Commencing with the 2024–25 school year, a nonpublic nonsectarian school shall include assurances that for any pupil served by the school who is a foster child as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 48853.5, the school agrees to do both of the following:(A) Serve as the school of origin of the foster child, as applicable pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 48853.5.(B) Allow the foster child to continue their education in the school, as applicable pursuant to subdivisions (f) and (g) of Section 48853.5.(b) (1) The applicant shall provide the special education local plan area in which the applicant is located with the written notification of its intent to seek certification or renewal of its certification. The local educational agency representatives shall acknowledge that they have been notified of the intent to certify or renew certification. The acknowledgment shall include a statement that representatives of the local educational agency for the area in which the applicant is located have had the opportunity to review the application at least 60 calendar days before submission of an initial application to the Superintendent, or at least 30 calendar days before submission of a renewal application to the Superintendent. The acknowledgment shall provide assurances that local educational agency representatives have had the opportunity to provide input on all required components of the application.(2) If the local educational agency has not acknowledged an applicant’s intent to be certified 60 calendar days from the date of submission for initial applications or 30 calendar days from the date of the return receipt for renewal applications, the applicant may file the application with the Superintendent.(3) The department shall provide electronic notification of the availability of renewal application materials to certified nonpublic, nonsectarian schools and agencies at least 120 days before the date their current certification expires.(c) If the applicant operates a facility or program on more than one site, each site shall be certified.(d) If the applicant is part of a larger program or facility on the same site, the Superintendent shall consider the effect of the total program on the applicant. A copy of the policies and standards for the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency and the larger program shall be available to the Superintendent.(e) (1) Before certification, the Superintendent shall conduct an onsite review of the facility and program for which the applicant seeks certification. The Superintendent may be assisted by representatives of the special education local plan area in which the applicant is located and a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency representative who does not have a conflict of interest with the applicant. The Superintendent shall conduct an additional onsite review of the facility and program within three years of the effective date of the certification, unless the Superintendent conditionally certifies the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency, or unless the Superintendent receives a formal complaint against the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency. In the latter two cases, the Superintendent shall conduct an onsite review at least annually.(2) In carrying out this subdivision, the Superintendent may verify that the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency has received a successful criminal background check clearance and has enrolled in subsequent arrest notice service, pursuant to Section 44237, for each owner, operator, and employee of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency.(3) Commencing with the 2020–21 school year, a local educational agency that enters into a master contract with a nonpublic, nonsectarian school shall conduct, at minimum, both of the following:(A) An onsite visit to the nonpublic, nonsectarian school before placement of a pupil if the local educational agency does not have any pupils enrolled at the school at the time of placement.(B) At least one onsite monitoring visit during each school year to the nonpublic, nonsectarian school at which the local educational agency has a pupil attending and with which it maintains a master contract. The monitoring visit shall include, but is not limited to, a review of services provided to the pupil through the individual service agreement between the local educational agency and the nonpublic, nonsectarian school, a review of progress the pupil is making toward the goals set forth in the pupil’s individualized education program, a review of progress the pupil is making toward the goals set forth in the pupil’s behavioral intervention plan, if applicable, an observation of the pupil during instruction, and a walkthrough of the facility. The local educational agency shall report the findings resulting from the monitoring visit to the department within 60 calendar days of the onsite visit. On or before June 30, 2020, the department shall, with input from special education local plan area administrators, create and publish criteria for reporting this information to the department.(f) The Superintendent shall make a determination on an application within 120 days of receipt of the application and shall certify, conditionally certify, or deny certification to the applicant. If the Superintendent fails to take one of these actions within 120 days, the applicant is automatically granted conditional certification for a period terminating on August 31 of the current school year. If certification is denied, the Superintendent shall provide reasons for the denial. The Superintendent shall not certify the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency for a period longer than one year.(g) Certification becomes effective on the date the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency meets all the application requirements and is approved by the Superintendent. Certification may be retroactive if the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency met all the requirements of this section on the date the retroactive certification is effective. Certification expires on December 31 of the terminating year.(h) The Superintendent annually shall review the certification of each nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency. For this purpose, a certified nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency annually shall update its application between August 1 and October 31, unless the state board grants a waiver pursuant to Section 56101. The Superintendent may conduct an onsite review as part of the annual review.(i) (1) The Superintendent shall conduct an investigation of a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency onsite at any time without prior notice if there is substantial reason to believe that there is an immediate danger to the health, safety, or welfare of a child. The Superintendent shall document the concern and submit it to the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency at the time of the onsite investigation. The Superintendent shall require a written response to any noncompliance or deficiency found.(2) A nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall notify the department and the local educational agency with which it has a master contract of any pupil-involved incident at the school or agency in which law enforcement was contacted. This notification shall be provided in writing, no later than one business day after the incident occurred.(3) With respect to a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency, the Superintendent shall conduct an investigation, which may include an unannounced onsite visit, if the Superintendent receives evidence of a significant deficiency in the quality of educational services provided, a violation of Section 56366.9, or noncompliance with the policies expressed by subdivision (b) of Section 1501 of the Health and Safety Code by the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency. The Superintendent shall document the complaint and the results of the investigation and shall provide copies of the documentation to the complainant, the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency, and the contracting local educational agency.(4) Violations or noncompliance documented pursuant to paragraph (1) or (3) shall be reflected in the status of the certification of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency, at the discretion of the Superintendent, pending an approved plan of correction by the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency. The department shall retain for a period of 10 years all violations pertaining to certification of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency.(5) In carrying out this subdivision, the Superintendent may verify that the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency received a successful criminal background check clearance and has enrolled in subsequent arrest notice service, pursuant to Section 44237, for each owner, operator, and employee of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency.(j) The Superintendent shall monitor the facilities, the educational environment, and the quality of the educational program, including the teaching staff, the credentials authorizing service, the standards-based core curriculum being employed, and the standards-focused instructional materials used, of an existing certified nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency on a three-year cycle, as follows:(1) The nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall complete a self-review in year one.(2) The Superintendent shall conduct an onsite review of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency in year two.(3) The Superintendent shall conduct a followup visit to the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency in year three.(k) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the Superintendent shall not certify a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency that proposes to initiate or expand services to pupils currently educated in the immediate prior fiscal year in a juvenile court program, community school pursuant to Section 56150, or other nonspecial education program, including independent study or adult school, or both, unless the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency notifies the county superintendent of schools and the special education local plan area in which the proposed new or expanded nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency is located of its intent to seek certification.(2) The notification shall occur no later than the December 1 before the new fiscal year in which the proposed or expanding school or agency intends to initiate services. The notice shall include the following:(A) The specific date upon which the proposed nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency is to be established.(B) The location of the proposed program or facility.(C) The number of pupils proposed for services, the number of pupils currently served in the juvenile court, community school, or other nonspecial education program, the current school services including special education and related services provided for these pupils, and the specific program of special education and related services to be provided under the proposed program.(D) The reason for the proposed change in services.(E) The number of staff who will provide special education and designated instruction and services and hold a current valid California credential or license in the service rendered.(3) In addition to the requirements in subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, the Superintendent shall require and consider the following in determining whether to certify a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency as described in this subdivision:(A) A complete statement of the information required as part of the notice under paragraph (1).(B) Documentation of the steps taken in preparation for the conversion to a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency, including information related to changes in the population to be served and the services to be provided pursuant to each pupil’s individualized education program.(4) Notwithstanding any other law, the certification becomes effective no earlier than July 1 if the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency provided the notification required pursuant to paragraph (1).(l) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the Superintendent shall not certify or renew the certification of a nonpublic, nonsectarian school that also operates a licensed children’s institution, unless all of the following conditions are met:(A) The entity operating the nonpublic, nonsectarian school maintains separate financial records for each entity that it operates, with each nonpublic, nonsectarian school identified separately from any licensed children’s institution that it operates.(B) The entity submits an annual budget that identifies the projected costs and revenues for each entity and demonstrates that the rates to be charged are reasonable to support the operation of the entity.(C) The entity submits an entitywide annual audit that identifies its costs and revenues, by entity, in accordance with generally accepted accounting and auditing principles. The audit shall clearly document the amount of moneys received and expended on the educational program provided by the nonpublic, nonsectarian school.(D) The relationship between various entities operated by the same entity are documented, defining the responsibilities of the entities. The documentation shall clearly identify the services to be provided as part of each program, for example, the residential or medical program, the mental health program, or the educational program. The entity shall not seek funding from a public agency for a service, either separately or as part of a package of services, if the service is funded by another public agency, either separately or as part of a package of services.(2) For purposes of this section, “licensed children’s institution” has the same meaning as it is defined by Section 56155.5.(m) (1) The nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall be charged a reasonable fee for certification. The Superintendent may adjust the fee annually commensurate with the statewide average percentage inflation adjustment computed for local control funding formula allocations pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, of unified school districts with greater than 1,500 units of average daily attendance if the percentage increase is reflected in the school district local control funding formula allocation pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, for inflation purposes. For purposes of this section, the base fee shall be the following:(1) 1–5 pupils ........................ $ 300(2) 6–10 pupils ........................ 500(3) 11–24 pupils ........................ 1,000(4) 25–75 pupils ........................ 1,500(5) 76 pupils and over ........................ 2,000(2) The nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall pay this fee when it applies for certification and when it updates its application for annual renewal by the Superintendent. The Superintendent shall use these fees to conduct onsite reviews, which may include field experts. A fee shall not be refunded if the application is withdrawn or is denied by the Superintendent.(n) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, only those nonpublic, nonsectarian schools or agencies that provide special education and designated instruction and services using administrators and staff who hold a certificate, permit, or other document equivalent to that which staff in a public school are required to hold in the service rendered are eligible to receive certification. Only those nonpublic, nonsectarian schools or agencies located outside of California that employ staff who hold a current valid credential or license to render special education and related services as required by that state shall be eligible to be certified. Commencing with the 2021–22 school year, this paragraph shall not apply to administrators.(2) Commencing with the 2021–22 school year, notwithstanding any other law, only those nonpublic, nonsectarian schools or agencies that provide special education and related services using administrators who hold or are in the process of obtaining a credential, degree, or license in accordance with paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) are eligible to be certified.(3) The state board shall develop regulations to implement this subdivision.(o) In addition to meeting the standards adopted by the state board, a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall provide written assurances that it meets all applicable standards relating to fire, health, sanitation, and building safety.(p) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (n) of Section 44237, and for purposes of enabling the Superintendent to carry out the duties pursuant to this section, a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall, upon demand, make available to the Superintendent evidence of a successful criminal background check clearance and enrollment in subsequent arrest notice service, conducted pursuant to Section 44237, for each owner, operator, and employee of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency.(2) The nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall retain the evidence and store it in a locked file separate from other files.SEC. 6. Section 6389 of the Family Code, as added by Section 9.5 of Chapter 544 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:6389. (a) A person subject to a protective order, as defined in Section 6218, shall not own, possess, purchase, or receive a firearm or ammunition while that protective order is in effect. A person who owns, possesses, purchases, or receives, or attempts to purchase or receive, a firearm or ammunition while the protective order is in effect is punishable pursuant to Section 29825 of the Penal Code.(b) On all forms providing notice that a protective order has been requested or granted, the Judicial Council shall include a notice that, upon service of the order, the respondent shall be ordered to relinquish possession or control of any firearms or ammunition and not to purchase or receive or attempt to purchase or receive any firearms or ammunition for a period not to exceed the duration of the restraining order.(c) (1) Upon issuance of a protective order, as defined in Section 6218, the court shall order the respondent to relinquish any firearm or ammunition in the respondent’s immediate possession or control or subject to the respondent’s immediate possession or control.(2) The relinquishment ordered pursuant to paragraph (1) shall occur by immediately surrendering the firearm or ammunition in a safe manner, upon request of a law enforcement officer, to the control of the officer, after being served with the protective order. A law enforcement officer serving a protective order that indicates that the respondent possesses weapons or ammunition shall request that the firearm or ammunition be immediately surrendered. Alternatively, if a request is not made by a law enforcement officer, the relinquishment shall occur within 24 hours of being served with the order, by either surrendering the firearm or ammunition in a safe manner to the control of local law enforcement officials, or by selling, transferring, or relinquishing for storage pursuant to Section 29830 of the Penal Code, the firearm or ammunition to a licensed gun dealer, as specified in Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2 of Division 6 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code. The law enforcement officer or licensed gun dealer taking possession of the firearm or ammunition pursuant to this subdivision shall issue a receipt to the person relinquishing the firearm or ammunition at the time of relinquishment. A person ordered to relinquish a firearm or ammunition pursuant to this subdivision shall, within 48 hours after being served with the order, do both of the following:(A) File, with the court that issued the protective order, the receipt showing the firearm or ammunition was surrendered to a local law enforcement agency or sold to a licensed gun dealer. Failure to timely file a receipt shall constitute a violation of the protective order.(B) File a copy of the receipt described in subparagraph (A) with the law enforcement agency that served the protective order. Failure to timely file a copy of the receipt shall constitute a violation of the protective order.(3) The forms for protective orders adopted by the Judicial Council and approved by the Department of Justice shall require the petitioner to describe the number, types, and locations of any firearms or ammunition presently known by the petitioner to be possessed or controlled by the respondent.(4) A court holding a hearing on this matter shall review the file to determine whether the receipt has been filed and inquire of the respondent whether they have complied with the requirement. Violations of the firearms prohibition of any restraining order under this section shall be reported to the prosecuting attorney in the jurisdiction where the order has been issued within two business days of the court hearing unless the restrained party provides a receipt showing compliance at a subsequent hearing or by direct filing with the clerk of the court.(5) Every law enforcement agency in the state shall develop, adopt, and implement written policies and standards for law enforcement officers who request immediate relinquishment of firearms or ammunition.(d) If the respondent declines to relinquish possession of a firearm or ammunition based on the assertion of the right against self-incrimination, as provided by the Fifth Amendment to the United States Constitution and Section 15 of Article I of the California Constitution, the court may grant use immunity for the act of relinquishing the firearm or ammunition required under this section.(e) A local law enforcement agency may charge the respondent a fee for the storage of a firearm or ammunition pursuant to this section. This fee shall not exceed the actual cost incurred by the local law enforcement agency for the storage of the firearm or ammunition. For purposes of this subdivision, “actual cost” means expenses directly related to taking possession of a firearm or ammunition, storing the firearm or ammunition, and surrendering possession of the firearm or ammunition to a licensed dealer as defined in Section 26700 of the Penal Code or to the respondent.(f) The restraining order requiring a person to relinquish a firearm or ammunition pursuant to subdivision (c) shall state on its face that the respondent is prohibited from owning, possessing, purchasing, or receiving a firearm or ammunition while the protective order is in effect and that the firearm or ammunition shall be relinquished to the local law enforcement agency for that jurisdiction or sold to a licensed gun dealer, and that proof of surrender or sale shall be filed with the court within a specified period of receipt of the order. The order shall also state on its face the expiration date for relinquishment. This section does not limit a respondent’s right under existing law to petition the court at a later date for modification of the order.(g) The restraining order requiring a person to relinquish a firearm or ammunition pursuant to subdivision (c) shall prohibit the person from possessing or controlling a firearm or ammunition for the duration of the order. At the expiration of the order, the local law enforcement agency shall return possession of the surrendered firearm or ammunition to the respondent, within five days after the expiration of the relinquishment order, unless the local law enforcement agency determines that (1) the firearm or ammunition has been stolen, (2) the respondent is prohibited from possessing a firearm or ammunition because the respondent is in a prohibited class for the possession of firearms or ammunition, as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code, Section 30305 of the Penal Code, and Sections 8100 and 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or (3) another successive restraining order is issued against the respondent under this section. If the local law enforcement agency determines that the respondent is the legal owner of a firearm or ammunition deposited with the local law enforcement agency and is prohibited from possessing a firearm or ammunition, the respondent shall be entitled to sell or transfer the firearm or ammunition to a licensed dealer as defined in Section 26700 of the Penal Code. If the firearm or ammunition has been stolen, the firearm or ammunition shall be restored to the lawful owner upon the owner identifying the firearm and ammunition and providing proof of ownership.(h) The court may, as part of the relinquishment order, grant an exemption from the relinquishment requirements of this section for a particular firearm or ammunition if the respondent is not otherwise prohibited from owning, possessing, controlling, or purchasing a firearm and ammunition under state or federal law and one of the following applies:(1) (A) The respondent is currently employed as a sworn peace officer who is required, as a condition of continued employment, to carry a firearm, ammunition, or firearm and ammunition and the current employer is unable to reassign the peace officer to another position where use of a specified firearm or ammunition is unnecessary. In such a case, a court may allow the peace officer to continue to carry a specified firearm, ammunition, or firearm and ammunition, either on duty or off duty, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence, in writing or on the record, both of the following:(i) The peace officer’s personal safety depends on the ability to carry that specific firearm, ammunition, or firearm and ammunition outside of scheduled work hours.(ii) The peace officer does not pose an additional threat of harm to a protected party or the public by having access to that specific firearm, ammunition, or firearm and ammunition, including whether the peace officer might use the firearm for a purpose other than as permitted under this paragraph.(B) Prior to making this finding, the court shall require a mandatory psychological evaluation of the peace officer by a licensed mental health professional with domestic violence expertise. The court shall consider the results of an evaluation and may require the peace officer to enter into counseling or another remedial treatment program to deal with a propensity for domestic violence.(2) (A) The respondent is not a peace officer but is required to carry a specific firearm, ammunition, or firearm and ammunition during scheduled work hours as a condition of continued employment, and the current employer is unable to reassign the respondent to another position where the firearm, ammunition, or firearm and ammunition is unnecessary. In such a case, a court may grant an exemption to allow the respondent to possess a specific firearm, ammunition, or firearm and ammunition only during scheduled work hours if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence, in writing or on the record, that the respondent does not pose an additional threat of harm to a protected party or the public by having access to the specific firearm, ammunition, or firearm and ammunition only during scheduled work hours, including whether the respondent might utilize the firearm, ammunition, or firearm and ammunition for a purpose other than as permitted under this paragraph.(B) To assist the court in making this determination, the court may order a psychological evaluation of the respondent by a licensed mental health professional with domestic violence expertise.(C) If the court grants an exemption pursuant to this paragraph, the order shall provide that the specific firearm, ammunition, or firearm and ammunition shall be in the physical possession of the respondent only during scheduled work hours and that the exemption does not authorize the respondent to possess any other firearm or ammunition, or to possess the specific firearm, ammunition, or firearm and ammunition outside of scheduled work hours.(i) (1) If an exemption is granted under subdivision (h) during the pendency of a temporary restraining order and the court subsequently issues a restraining order after hearing on the same application, the court shall review and make a finding, in writing or on the record, as to whether the exemption remains appropriate, based upon the criteria set forth in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (h), as applicable, in light of the issuance of the order after hearing. This review and finding shall occur at the time the restraining order after hearing is issued.(2) If an exemption is granted and the court subsequently renews the restraining order pursuant to Section 6345 at the request of a party, the court shall review and make a finding, in writing or on the record, as to whether the exemption remains appropriate, based upon the criteria set forth in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (h), as applicable, in light of the renewal. This finding shall be made at the time the restraining order after hearing is renewed.(3) The court may terminate or modify an exemption granted pursuant to this paragraph at any time if the respondent demonstrates a need to modify the specific firearm, ammunition, or firearm and ammunition authorized by the court pursuant to subdivision (h) or if the respondent no longer meets the requirements in this section or otherwise violates the restraining order.(j) During the period of the relinquishment order, a respondent is entitled to make one sale of all firearms or ammunition that are in the possession of a local law enforcement agency pursuant to this section. A licensed gun dealer, who presents a local law enforcement agency with a bill of sale indicating that all firearms or ammunition owned by the respondent that are in the possession of the local law enforcement agency have been sold by the respondent to the licensed gun dealer, shall be given possession of those firearms or ammunition, at the location where a respondent’s firearms or ammunition are stored, within five days of presenting the local law enforcement agency with a bill of sale.(k) The disposition of any unclaimed property under this section shall be made pursuant to Section 1413 of the Penal Code.(l) (1) The relinquishment of a firearm to a law enforcement agency pursuant to subdivision (g) shall not be subject to the requirements of Section 27545 of the Penal Code.(2) The return of firearms and ammunition by a law enforcement agency pursuant to this section shall be governed by the applicable provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.(m) If the respondent notifies the court that the respondent owns a firearm or ammunition that is not in their immediate possession, the court may limit the order to exclude that firearm or ammunition if the judge is satisfied the respondent is unable to gain access to that firearm or ammunition while the protective order is in effect.(n) A respondent to a protective order who violates an order issued pursuant to this section shall be punished under the provisions of Section 29825 of the Penal Code.(o) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.SEC. 7. Section 7286 of the Government Code is amended to read:7286. (a) For the purposes of this section:(1) “Deadly force” means any use of force that creates a substantial risk of causing death or serious bodily injury. Deadly force includes, but is not limited to, the discharge of a firearm.(2) “Excessive force” means a level of force that is found to have violated Section 835a of the Penal Code, the requirements on the use of force required by this section, or any other law or statute.(3) “Feasible” means reasonably capable of being done or carried out under the circumstances to successfully achieve the arrest or lawful objective without increasing risk to the officer or another person.(4) “Intercede” includes, but is not limited to, physically stopping the excessive use of force, recording the excessive force, if equipped with a body-worn camera, and documenting efforts to intervene, efforts to de-escalate the offending officer’s excessive use of force, and confronting the offending officer about the excessive force during the use of force and, if the officer continues, reporting to dispatch or the watch commander on duty and stating the offending officer’s name, unit, location, time, and situation, in order to establish a duty for that officer to intervene.(5) “Law enforcement agency” means any police department, sheriff’s department, district attorney, county probation department, transit agency police department, school district police department, the police department of any campus of the University of California, the California State University, or community college, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, and the Department of Justice.(6) “Retaliation” means demotion, failure to promote to a higher position when warranted by merit, denial of access to training and professional development opportunities, denial of access to resources necessary for an officer to properly perform their duties, or intimidation, harassment, or the threat of injury while on duty or off duty.(b) Each law enforcement agency shall, by no later than January 1, 2021, maintain a policy that provides a minimum standard on the use of force. Each agency’s policy shall include all of the following:(1) A requirement that officers utilize de-escalation techniques, crisis intervention tactics, and other alternatives to force when feasible.(2) A requirement that an officer may only use a level of force that they reasonably believe is proportional to the seriousness of the suspected offense or the reasonably perceived level of actual or threatened resistance.(3) A requirement that officers immediately report potential excessive force to a superior officer when present and observing another officer using force that the officer believes to be beyond that which is necessary, as determined by an objectively reasonable officer under the circumstances based upon the totality of information actually known to the officer.(4) A prohibition on retaliation against an officer who reports a suspected violation of a law or regulation by another officer to a supervisor or other person at the law enforcement agency who has the authority to investigate the violation.(5) Clear and specific guidelines regarding situations in which officers may or may not draw a firearm or point a firearm at a person.(6) A requirement that officers consider their surroundings and potential risks to bystanders, to the extent reasonable under the circumstances, before discharging a firearm.(7) Procedures for disclosing public records in accordance with Section 832.7.(8) Procedures for the filing, investigation, and reporting of citizen complaints regarding use of force incidents.(9) A requirement that an officer intercede when present and observing another officer using force that is clearly beyond that which is necessary, as determined by an objectively reasonable officer under the circumstances, taking into account the possibility that other officers may have additional information regarding the threat posed by a subject.(10) Comprehensive and specific guidelines regarding approved methods and devices available for the application of force.(11) An explicitly stated requirement that officers carry out duties, including use of force, in a manner that is fair and unbiased.(12) Comprehensive and specific guidelines for the application of deadly force.(13) Comprehensive and detailed requirements for prompt internal reporting and notification regarding a use of force incident, including reporting use of force incidents to the Department of Justice in compliance with Section 12525.2.(14) The role of supervisors in the review of use of force applications.(15) A requirement that officers promptly provide, if properly trained, or otherwise promptly procure medical assistance for persons injured in a use of force incident, when reasonable and safe to do so.(16) Training standards and requirements relating to demonstrated knowledge and understanding of the law enforcement agency’s use of force policy by officers, investigators, and supervisors.(17) Training and guidelines regarding vulnerable populations, including, but not limited to, children, elderly persons, people who are pregnant, and people with physical, mental, and developmental disabilities.(18) Procedures to prohibit an officer from training other officers for a period of at least three years from the date that an abuse of force complaint against the officer is substantiated.(19) A requirement that an officer that has received all required training on the requirement to intercede and fails to act pursuant to paragraph (9) be disciplined up to and including in the same manner as the officer that committed the excessive force.(20) Comprehensive and specific guidelines under which the discharge of a firearm at or from a moving vehicle may or may not be permitted.(21) Factors for evaluating and reviewing all use of force incidents.(22) Minimum training and course titles required to meet the objectives in the use of force policy.(23) A requirement for the regular review and updating of the policy to reflect developing practices and procedures.(c) Each law enforcement agency shall make their use of force policy adopted pursuant to this section accessible to the public.(d) This section does not supersede the collective bargaining procedures established pursuant to the Myers-Milias-Brown Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4), the Ralph C. Dills Act (Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 3512) of Division 4), or the Higher Education Employer-Employee Relations Act (Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4).SEC. 8. Section 8589.11 of the Government Code is amended to read:8589.11. The office may acquire new or used firefighting apparatus and equipment for resale to local agencies. If the apparatus or equipment is in a used condition, the office may contract with the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority to repair or refurbish the apparatus or equipment to acceptable fire service standards before resale. The resale price shall recover the office’s cost of acquisition, repairing, refurbishing, and associated indirect expenses.SEC. 9. Section 8589.15 of the Government Code is amended to read:8589.15. The office may contract with the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority to perform any of the responsibilities or services required or authorized by this article.SEC. 10. Section 12838 of the Government Code is amended to read:12838. (a) There is hereby created in state government the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, to be headed by a secretary, who shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall consist of Adult Operations, Adult Programs, Health Care Services, Juvenile Justice, the Board of Parole Hearings, the Board of Juvenile Hearings, the State Commission on Juvenile Justice, the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority, and the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Board.(b) The Governor, upon recommendation of the secretary, may appoint three undersecretaries of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, subject to Senate confirmation. The undersecretaries shall hold office at the pleasure of the Governor. One undersecretary shall oversee administration, one undersecretary shall oversee health care services, and one undersecretary shall oversee operations for the department.(c) The Governor, upon recommendation of the secretary, shall appoint a Chief for the Office of Victim Services, and a Chief for the Office of Correctional Safety, both of whom shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.SEC. 11. Section 12838.6 of the Government Code is amended to read:12838.6. The following entities shall be continued in existence within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and shall retain existing functions, powers, responsibilities, and jurisdiction, except as expressly provided otherwise: Council on Criminal Justice and Behavioral Health, California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority, California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Board, California Council for Interstate Adult Offender Supervision, and the Joint Venture Policy Advisory Board. For purposes of this article, these shall be known as “continuing entities.”SEC. 12. Section 13332.09 of the Government Code is amended to read:13332.09. (a) A purchase order or other form of documentation for acquisition or replacement of motor vehicles shall not be issued against any appropriation until the Department of General Services has investigated and established the necessity therefor.(b) A state agency shall not acquire surplus mobile equipment from any source for program support until the Department of General Services has investigated and established the necessity therefor.(c) Notwithstanding any other law, any contract for the acquisition of a motor vehicle or general use mobile equipment for a state agency shall be made by or under the supervision of the Department of General Services. Pursuant to Section 10298 of the Public Contract Code, the Department of General Services may collect a fee to offset the cost of the services provided.(d) Any passenger-type motor vehicle purchased for a state officer, except a constitutional officer, or a state employee shall be an American-made vehicle of the light class, as defined by the Department of General Services, unless excepted by the Director of General Services on the basis of unusual requirements, including, but not limited to, use by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, that would justify the need for a motor vehicle of a heavier class.(e) General use mobile equipment having an original purchase price of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more shall not be rented or leased from a nonstate source and payment therefor shall not be made from any appropriation for the use of the Department of Transportation, without the prior approval of the Department of General Services after a determination that comparable state-owned equipment is not available, unless obtaining approval would endanger life or property, in which case the transaction and the justification for not having sought prior approval shall be reported immediately thereafter to the Department of General Services.(f) For purposes of this section:(1) “General use mobile equipment” means equipment that is listed in the Mobile Equipment Inventory of the State Equipment Council and capable of being used by more than one state agency, and shall not be deemed to refer to equipment having a practical use limited to the controlling state agency only. Section 575 of the Vehicle Code shall have no application to this section.(2) “State agency” means a state agency, as defined pursuant to Section 11000. The University of California is requested and encouraged to have the Department of General Services perform the tasks identified in this section with respect to the acquisition or replacement of motor vehicles by the University of California. “State agency” does not include a district agricultural association, as defined in Section 3951 of the Food and Agricultural Code, or the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority as established by Section 2800 of the Penal Code.SEC. 13. Section 14612 of the Government Code is amended to read:14612. (a) The department shall commit itself to achieve improved levels of performance, as specified in this section, by focusing its efforts on enhancing the value of the services it delivers.(b) The department shall commit itself to providing both of the following:(1) Services that the Legislature or Governor requires state agencies to purchase from the department.(2) Services that state agencies are not required to purchase from the department, but that the department can provide on a cost-competitive basis.(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the director or the director’s designee, in lieu of the Director of Finance, may approve DGS Form 22 and DGS Form 220, including the extension of time to expend transferred funds, the transfer of funds from one work order to another, and the Return of Funds Document.(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13940) of Part 4, the director or the director’s designee may approve “relief from accountability” for debts owed to the department up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) when the department determines it cannot collect the debts or when the cost of collection exceeds the amount of the debt.(e) Notwithstanding Section 2807 of the Penal Code, the director or the director’s designee may procure goods from the private sector even though the goods may be available from the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority, when in the director’s discretion, it is cost beneficial to do so and if the director or the director’s designee continues to include the authority in soliciting quotations for goods.(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 948 and Section 965, the director or the director’s designee, in lieu of the Director of Finance, may certify funds for payment of all legal settlements and tort claims for which the department already has sufficient expenditure authority and funds without the need for augmentation.(g) Notwithstanding Section 965.2, the director or the director’s designee, in lieu of the Director of Finance, may certify funds for payment for all legal court settlements for projects funded from the Architecture Revolving Fund, if a sufficient fund balance exists in the work order to pay the claim and the payment does not require a budget augmentation to complete the project.(h) Notwithstanding Section 14957, the director or the director’s designee, in lieu of the Director of Finance, may approve the deposit of checks directly into the Architecture Revolving Fund. The department shall notify the Department of Finance within 30 days of the date that the department makes such a deposit.SEC. 14. Section 20403 of the Government Code is amended to read:20403. “State safety member” shall also include officers and employees in (a) the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation employed to perform the duties now performed in positions with the following class titles: Deputy Director, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation; Deputy Director, Institutions, Camps and Program Services Division; Deputy Director, Parole and Community Services; Warden; Warden—San Quentin; Superintendent II and III, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation; Deputy Superintendent; Correctional Administrator; Program Administrator, Correctional Institution; all classes of Correctional Program Supervisor; Correctional Captain; Correctional Lieutenant; Correctional Sergeant; Correctional Officer; all classes of Women’s Correctional Supervisor; Assistant Deputy Director, Parole and Community Services; all classes of Parole Administrator, Adult Parole; all classes of Parole Agent, Adult Parole; Assistant Director, Investigations and Law Enforcement Liaison; Senior Special Agent; Special Agent; all classes of Women’s Parole Agent; Medical Facility Superintendent; Superintendent, California Institution for Women; all classes of Correctional Counselor; Chief and Assistant Chief Transportation Officer, (b) the Department of the Youth Authority employed to perform the duties now performed in positions with the following class titles: Director, Department of the Youth Authority; Chief, Division of Parole and Community Services; Deputy Chief, Division of Parole and Community Services; Program Administrator, Correctional School; Assistant Superintendent, Correctional School; all classes of Superintendent, Correctional School; Youth Authority Camp Superintendent; Assistant Superintendent, Youth Authority Camp; Chief, Division of Institutions; Treatment Team Supervisor; all classes of Transportation Officers, Youth Authority; Security Officer; all classes of Group Supervisors; all classes of Parole Agent, Youth Authority; all classes of Youth Counselor; Supervisor Community Treatment Programs; Correctional Casework Training Supervisor; Correctional Casework Trainee; all classes of Correctional Counselor, (c) the Board of Prison Terms employed to perform duties now performed in positions with the following class titles: all classes of Parole Agent; all classes of Correctional Counselor and the Chief of Investigation, (d) the Youthful Offender Parole Board employed to perform duties now performed in positions with the following class titles: all classes of Parole Agent, and (e) the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority employed to perform duties now performed in positions with the following class titles: Director; Deputy Director, Administration; Deputy Director, Marketing; and Deputy Director, Workforce Development.SEC. 15. Section 1180.2 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1180.2. (a) This section shall apply to the state hospitals operated by the State Department of State Hospitals and facilities operated by the State Department of Developmental Services that utilize seclusion or behavioral restraints.(b) The State Department of State Hospitals and the State Department of Developmental Services shall develop technical assistance and training programs to support the efforts of facilities described in subdivision (a) to reduce or eliminate the use of seclusion and behavioral restraints in those facilities.(c) Technical assistance and training programs should be designed with the input of stakeholders, including clients and direct care staff, and should be based on best practices that lead to the avoidance of the use of seclusion and behavioral restraints, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1) Conducting an intake assessment that is consistent with facility policies and that includes issues specific to the use of seclusion and behavioral restraints as specified in Section 1180.4.(2) Utilizing strategies to engage clients collaboratively in assessment, avoidance, and management of crisis situations in order to prevent incidents of the use of seclusion and behavioral restraints.(3) Recognizing and responding appropriately to underlying reasons for escalating behavior.(4) Utilizing conflict resolution, effective communication, de-escalation, and client-centered problem solving strategies that diffuse and safely resolve emerging crisis situations.(5) Individual treatment planning that identifies risk factors, positive early intervention strategies, and strategies to minimize time spent in seclusion or behavioral restraints. Individual treatment planning should include input from the person affected.(6) While minimizing the duration of time spent in seclusion or behavioral restraints, using strategies to mitigate the emotional and physical discomfort and ensure the safety of the person involved in seclusion or behavioral restraints, including input from the person about what would alleviate their distress.(7) Training in conducting an effective debriefing meeting as specified in Section 1180.5, including the appropriate persons to involve, the voluntary participation of the person who has been in seclusion or behavioral restraints, and strategic interventions to engage affected persons in the process. The training should include strategies that result in maximum participation and comfort for the involved parties to identify factors that lead to the use of seclusion and behavioral restraints and factors that would reduce the likelihood of future incidents.(d) (1) The State Department of State Hospitals and the State Department of Developmental Services shall take steps to establish a system of mandatory, consistent, timely, and publicly accessible data collection regarding the use of seclusion and behavioral restraints in facilities described in this section. It is the intent of the Legislature that data be compiled in a manner that allows for standard statistical comparison.(2) The State Department of State Hospitals and the State Department of Developmental Services shall develop a mechanism for making this information publicly available on the Internet.(3) Data collected pursuant to this section shall include all of the following:(A) The number of deaths that occur while persons are in seclusion or behavioral restraints, or where it is reasonable to assume that a death was proximately related to the use of seclusion or behavioral restraints.(B) The number of serious injuries sustained by persons while in seclusion or subject to behavioral restraints.(C) The number of serious injuries sustained by staff that occur during the use of seclusion or behavioral restraints.(D) The number of incidents of seclusion.(E) The number of incidents of use of behavioral restraints.(F) The duration of time spent per incident in seclusion.(G) The duration of time spent per incident subject to behavioral restraints.(H) The number of times an involuntary emergency medication is used to control behavior, as defined by the State Department of State Hospitals.(e) A facility described in subdivision (a) shall report each death or serious injury of a person occurring during, or related to, the use of seclusion or behavioral restraints. This report shall be made to the agency designated in subdivision (i) of Section 4900 of the Welfare and Institutions Code no later than the close of the business day following the death or injury. The report shall include the encrypted identifier of the person involved, and the name, street address, and telephone number of the facility.(f) A facility described in subdivision (a) and that is operated by the State Department of Developmental Services shall not place any individual with a developmental disability in seclusion.(g) (1) On a monthly basis, a facility described in subdivision (a) that is operated by the State Department of Developmental Services shall report to the protection and advocacy agency described in subdivision (i) of Section 4900 all of the following:(A) The number of incidents of the use of behavioral restraints and the duration of time spent per incident of restraint.(B) The number of times an involuntary emergency medication is used to control behavior.(2) The reports required pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include the name, street address, and telephone number of the facility.SEC. 16. Section 1180.4 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1180.4. (a) A facility described in subdivision (a) of Section 1180.2 or subdivision (a) of Section 1180.3 shall conduct an initial assessment of each person prior to a placement decision or upon admission to the facility, or as soon thereafter as possible. This assessment shall include input from the person and from someone whom the person desires to be present, such as a family member, significant other, or authorized representative designated by the person, and if the desired third party can be present at the time of admission. This assessment shall also include, based on the information available at the time of initial assessment, all of the following:(1) A person’s advance directive regarding de-escalation or the use of seclusion or behavioral restraints.(2) Identification of early warning signs, triggers, and precipitants that cause a person to escalate, and identification of the earliest precipitant of aggression for persons with a known or suspected history of aggressiveness, or persons who are currently aggressive.(3) Techniques, methods, or tools that would help the person control the person’s behavior.(4) Preexisting medical conditions or any physical disabilities or limitations that would place the person at greater risk during restraint or seclusion.(5) Any trauma history, including any history of sexual or physical abuse that the affected person feels is relevant.(b) A facility described in subdivision (a) of Section 1180.2 or subdivision (a) of Section 1180.3 may use seclusion or behavioral restraints for behavioral emergencies only when a person’s behavior presents an imminent danger of serious harm to self or others.(c) A facility described in subdivision (a) of Section 1180.2 or subdivision (a) of Section 1180.3 shall not use either of the following:(1) A physical restraint or containment technique that obstructs a person’s respiratory airway or impairs the person’s breathing or respiratory capacity, including techniques in which a staff member places pressure on a person’s back or places the staff member’s body weight against the person’s torso or back.(2) A pillow, blanket, or other item covering the person’s face as part of a physical or mechanical restraint or containment process.(d) A facility described in subdivision (a) of Section 1180.2 or subdivision (a) of Section 1180.3 shall not use physical or mechanical restraint or containment on a person who has a known medical or physical condition and there is reason to believe that the use would endanger the person’s life or seriously exacerbate the person’s medical condition.(e) (1) A facility described in subdivision (a) of Section 1180.2 or subdivision (a) of Section 1180.3 shall not use prone mechanical restraint on a person at risk for positional asphyxiation as a result of one of the following risk factors that are known to the provider:(A) Obesity.(B) Pregnancy.(C) Agitated delirium or excited delirium syndromes.(D) Cocaine, methamphetamine, or alcohol intoxication.(E) Exposure to pepper spray.(F) Preexisting heart disease, including, but not limited to, an enlarged heart or other cardiovascular disorders.(G) Respiratory conditions, including emphysema, bronchitis, or asthma.(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply when written authorization has been provided by a physician, made to accommodate a person’s stated preference for the prone position or because the physician judges other clinical risks to take precedence. The written authorization may not be a standing order, and shall be evaluated on a case-by-case basis by the physician.(f) A facility described in subdivision (a) of Section 1180.2 or subdivision (a) of Section 1180.3 shall avoid the deliberate use of prone containment techniques whenever possible, utilizing the best practices in early intervention techniques, such as de-escalation. If prone containment techniques are used in an emergency situation, a staff member shall observe the person for any signs of physical duress throughout the use of prone containment. Whenever possible, the staff member monitoring the person shall not be involved in restraining the person.(g) A facility described in subdivision (a) of Section 1180.2 or subdivision (a) of Section 1180.3 shall not place a person in a facedown position with the person’s hands held or restrained behind the person’s back.(h) A facility described in subdivision (a) of Section 1180.2 or subdivision (a) of Section 1180.3 shall not use physical restraint or containment as an extended procedure. A facility described in subdivision (a) of Section 4684.80 or paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 4698 of the Welfare and Institutions Code that is licensed by the State Department of Social Services shall not use physical restraint or containment for more than 15 consecutive minutes. The department may, by regulation, authorize an exception to the 15-minute maximum duration if necessary to protect the immediate health and safety of residents or others from risk of imminent serious physical harm and the use of physical restraint or containment conforms to the facility program plan approved by the State Department of Developmental Services pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 4684.81 or subdivision (d) of Section 4698, as applicable, of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(i) A facility described in subdivision (a) of Section 1180.2 or subdivision (a) of Section 1180.3 shall keep under constant, face-to-face human observation a person who is in seclusion and in any type of behavioral restraint at the same time. Observation by means of video camera may be utilized only in facilities that are already permitted to use video monitoring under federal regulations specific to that facility.(j) A facility described in subdivision (a) of Section 1180.2 or subdivision (a) of Section 1180.3 shall afford to persons who are restrained the least restrictive alternative and the maximum freedom of movement, while ensuring the physical safety of the person and others, and shall use the least number of restraint points.(k) A person in a facility described in subdivision (a) of Section 1180.2 and subdivision (a) of Section 1180.3 has the right to be free from the use of seclusion and behavioral restraints of any form imposed as a means of coercion, discipline, convenience, or retaliation by staff. This right includes, but is not limited to, the right to be free from the use of a drug used in order to control behavior or to restrict the person’s freedom of movement, if that drug is not a standard treatment for the person’s medical or psychiatric condition.SEC. 17. Section 1250.10 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1250.10. (a) (1) “Psychiatric residential treatment facility” means a health facility licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services, that is operated by a public agency or private nonprofit organization that provides inpatient psychiatric services, as described in Subpart D (commencing with Section 441.150) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, to individuals under 21 years of age, in a nonhospital setting.(2) Psychiatric residential treatment facilities shall obtain and maintain certification to provide Medi-Cal inpatient psychiatric services for individuals under 21 years of age in compliance with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services requirements.(3) Psychiatric residential treatment facilities shall comply with applicable utilization control requirements in Part 456 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, including, but not limited to, Subpart D for Mental Hospitals. Psychiatric residential treatment facilities shall comply with utilization reviews, including, but not limited to, provisions specific to certification and recertification of need for inpatient care at least every 60 days, length of stay, continued stay, and length of stay modifications in order to ensure that patients are transitioned back to the community.(4) The department shall set a statewide bed limit based on an analysis to ensure that inpatient psychiatric services for individuals under 21 years of age are available and sufficient in amount, duration, and scope to reasonably achieve the purpose for which services are provided. The statewide bed limit shall comply with state and federal Medicaid requirements. The department shall notify the Legislature when the total number of beds in licensed psychiatric residential treatment facilities in the state reaches 250 beds, 500 beds, and 750 beds.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, and to the extent consistent with federal law, a psychiatric residential treatment facility shall be eligible to participate in the Medicare program under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq.), and the Medicaid program under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.), if all of the following conditions are met:(1) The facility is licensed as a psychiatric residential treatment facility by the State Department of Health Care Services to provide inpatient psychiatric services to Medicaid-eligible individuals under 21 years of age.(2) The facility is in compliance with all applicable state and federal Medicaid statutes, regulations, and guidance, including, but not limited to, inpatient initial and continued stay authorization criteria, individual plan of care requirements, documentation, and treatment plan review.(3) The facility meets the definition of a psychiatric residential treatment facility pursuant to Section 483.352 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(4) The facility provides inpatient psychiatric services to Medicaid-eligible individuals under 21 years of age in accordance with the requirements and standards developed by the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to the authority in Section 1905(a)(16) and (h) (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(a)(16) and (h)), Section 1902(a)(9)(A) (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(9)(A)), which authorizes the State Department of Health Care Services to establish and maintain health standards for institutions in which Medicaid beneficiaries may receive services, and Section 1902(a)(33)(B) (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a (a)(33)(B)) of the federal Social Security Act and the Medicaid State Plan.(5) The facility has a provider agreement with the State Department of Health Care Services or a mental health plan to provide the inpatient psychiatric services benefit to Medicaid-eligible individuals 21 years of age.(6) The facility obtains a certification for participation in the federal Medicaid program and maintains compliance with the conditions of participation for psychiatric residential treatment facilities pursuant to Subpart D of Part 441 and Subpart G of Part 483 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(7) For purposes of the requirements specified in Subpart G of Part 483 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, facility staff shall have training on engaging in trauma-informed prevention and de-escalation interventions with the goal of reducing seclusion and restraint.(8) The facility maintains accreditation from one of the following organizations identified in Section 441.151 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations:(A) Joint Commission on Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations.(B) The Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation Facilities.(C) The Council on Accreditation of Services for Families and Children.(D) Any other accrediting organization with comparable standards recognized by the State Department of Health Care Services.(9) The facility has guidelines for operation that include, at a minimum, each of the following:(A) Requirements that all services and programs align to the trauma-informed care standards.(B) Length of stay to be determined by medical necessity for the duration of time needed to stabilize, treat, and transition the patient to a less restrictive setting consistent with the patient individual plan of care.(C) Requirements that patients are connected to a continuum of care and services to promote healing and step down to community-based care in facility plans of operation, along with the identification of strategies, treatment, services, and supports that the facility will employ to connect the youth and their families to community-based services and to step down the youth to family-based care.(D) The implementation of an individual plan of care that is all of the following:(i) Developed and implemented no later than 72 hours after admission.(ii) Designed to achieve the patient’s discharge from inpatient status, step-down service, at the earliest possible time or as a diversion to admittance to a psychiatric hospital.(iii) The individual plan of care shall be based on a diagnostic evaluation that is developed by a treatment team in consultation with the patient and their parents, legal guardians, or others into whose care they will be released after discharge, and include discharge plans and after-care resources such as community services to ensure continuity of care with the patient’s family, school, and community upon discharge.(c) The facility shall annually, by July 1 of each year, provide the State Department of Health Care Services with all of the following data:(1) Total number of patients admitted, including the number of Medi-Cal beneficiaries and the number of patients under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.(2) Age, race or ethnicity, and gender of patients served, and, if available, sexual orientation and gender identity or expression of patients.(3) Duration of stay of each patient and the average and median lengths of stay for patients under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court and separately for those not subject to juvenile court jurisdiction.(4) For each patient, the type of placement the patient was in prior to admission, if any, the services and interventions provided to the patient prior to address the patient’s crisis needs, if any, and the number of prior hospitalizations, if any.(5) Professional classification of staff and contracted staff.(6) For each patient, the type of placement the client was discharged to.(7) The types of community-based services provided to patients during their stay to facilitate their transition back into the community, if any, including a breakdown of services provided to patients under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court and separately for those not subject to juvenile court jurisdiction.(8) Postdischarge plans and after care resources, including the type and intensity of mental health services, provided upon discharge.(9) The number of patients subjected to restraint, the number of times each patient was subjected to restraint, and the types and duration of restraint.(10) The facility’s policies regarding patient rules of conduct, behavioral incentives and discipline, and procedures for notifying patients of their rights.(11) A copy of the patient’s rights and facility complaint procedures provided to each patient upon admission.(d) The State Department of Health Care Services and the State Department of Social Services shall, by January 1 of each year, provide to the Senate and Assembly Committees on Health, Human Services, and Judiciary with a report summarizing the information provided under subdivision (c) including, at a minimum:(1) For each facility, all of the following:(A) The total number of patients admitted, including the number of Medi-Cal beneficiaries and the number of patients under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.(B) The age, race or ethnicity, and gender of patients served, and, if available, sexual orientation and gender identity or expression of patients served.(C) The average and median lengths of stay at the facility.(D) Professional classifications of staff and contracted staff.(E) The types of placements patients were discharged to.(F) The types of community-based services provided to patients during their stay to facilitate their transition back into the community, if any, including a breakdown of services provided to patients under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court and separately for those not subject to juvenile court jurisdiction.(G) The number of patients subjected to restraint, the number of times each patient was subjected to restraint, and the types and duration of restraint.(H) The number of patients who had previously been admitted to the same or a different psychiatric residential facility.(2) On a statewide basis, all of the following:(A) (i) The total number of patients admitted to psychiatric residential facilities, including the number of Medi-Cal beneficiaries and the number of patients under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.(ii) The total number of patients admitted to psychiatric residential facilities, including the number of Medi-Cal beneficiaries and the number of patients under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, from each county. For purposes of this clause, “from each county” refers to the county where the patient resided prior to admission to the facility.(B) (i) The age, race or ethnicity, and gender of patients served, and, if available, the gender expression of patients served.(ii) The age, race or ethnicity, and gender of patients served, and, if available, sexual orientation and gender identity or expression of patients served from each county. For purposes of this clause, “from each county” refers to the county where the patient resided prior to admission to the facility.(C) The average and median lengths of stay.(D) The types of placements patients were discharged to.(E) The number of patients subjected to restraint, the number of times each patient was subjected to restraint, and the types and duration of restraint.(F) The number of patients who had previously been admitted to the same or a different psychiatric residential treatment facility.(G) (i) The number of intensive services foster care homes, enhanced intensive services foster care homes, other family-based treatment settings, and other less-restrictive placement settings available by county.(ii) For the purposes of this data collection, “family-based treatment setting” means a licensed home-like setting to serve a child’s, minor’s, or youth’s behavioral health needs. These family-based treatment settings may utilize a range of applicable license types, so long as they provide enhanced care and supervision in a home-like setting, meet all requirements pursuant to their respective license type, and provide an integrated behavioral health treatment as an alternative to, or stepdown from, psychiatric residential facilities and short-term residential therapeutic programs.(e) (1) The State Department of Health Care Services shall, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, provider representatives, children’s rights advocates, disability rights advocates, and other relevant stakeholders, establish regulations for psychiatric residential treatment facilities. At a minimum, the regulations shall include all of the following:(A) Therapeutic programming shall be provided seven days per week, including weekends and holidays, with sufficient mental health professional and paraprofessional staff to maintain an appropriate treatment setting and services, based on individual client’s needs.(B) The established number of beds in the facility shall be consistent with the individual treatment needs of the clients served at the facility and shall meet the requirements developed pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 4081 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. At least 50 percent of the beds shall be in single-occupancy rooms.(C) (i) The length of stay shall be consistent with the individual plan of care developed by the interdisciplinary team.(ii) In the case of non-Medi-Cal beneficiaries, reauthorizations for admission shall be obtained using the process established by the entity providing coverage.(D) The length of stay shall be consistent with the individual plan of care developed by the interdisciplinary team. If a determination is made by a health care professional that a psychiatric residential treatment facility is medically necessary and is the appropriate level of care, reauthorization for admission shall be obtained using the process established by the entity providing coverage.(E) For voluntary admission of any minor patient subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, the facility shall obtain court authorization for the admission pursuant to Section 361.23 or 727.13, as applicable, and Section 6552 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Whenever consent for admission of a patient who is subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court is revoked, the facility shall immediately contact the county child welfare agency or probation department, as applicable, to arrange for the patient’s discharge.(F) Facilities shall include ample physical space for accommodating individuals who provide daily emotional and physical support to each client and for integrating family members into the day-to-day care of the youth. The facility shall provide patients with at least one hour per day of outdoor exercise or other time spent outside, weather permitting.(G) The facility shall collaborate with each client’s existing mental health team, if applicable, child and family team, as defined by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, if the patient is an Indian child, as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, who is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, the child’s tribe, if applicable, and other support persons or providers identified by the child or parents within three business days of intake and throughout the course of care and treatment, as appropriate.(H) The facility shall provide information, upon request, to the county child welfare agency or county probation department to assist the county with its implementation of the patient’s aftercare plan for transitioning each admitted child from the program.(I) The patient’s rights provisions contained in Sections 5325, 5325.1, 5325.2, and 5326 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be available to any patient admitted to, or eligible for admission to, the facility. Every patient shall have a right to a hearing by writ of habeas corpus, within two judicial days of the filing of a petition for the writ of habeas corpus with the superior court of the county in which the facility is located, for their release. Regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall specify the procedures by which this right shall be ensured. These regulations shall generally be consistent with the procedures contained in Article 5 (commencing with Section 5275) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code concerning habeas corpus for individuals, including children, subject to various involuntary holds.(J) The facility shall establish and implement an individual plan of care within 72 hours of the patient’s admission that is designed to achieve the patient’s discharge from inpatient status, step-down service, at the earliest possible time. The individual plan of care shall be based on a diagnostic evaluation that is developed by a treatment team in consultation with the patient and their parents, legal guardians, or others in whose care they will be released after discharge and include discharge plans and after-care resources such as community services to ensure continuity of care with the patient’s family, school, and community upon discharge. The plan of care shall be updated at least every 10 days, or more frequently if warranted by the patient’s change in acuity. For patients who are under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, the patient’s social worker or probation officer and, for Indian children, as defined by subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the child’s tribe shall be included in the consultation by the treatment team.(K) Guidelines for the use of physical restraints and seclusion providing protections and safeguards in addition to the requirements in Subpart G (commencing with Section 483.350) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. If a patient under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court under Section 300 or 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code has been restrained or secluded, the facility shall notify the patient’s counsel, social worker, or probation officer, as applicable, the patient’s tribe if the patient is an Indian child, as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and, except in cases in which parental rights or a legal guardianship has been terminated, the patient’s parent, legal guardian, or Indian custodian.(2) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific the provisions applicable to psychiatric residential treatment facilities in this chapter, Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 1180) of this code, and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, until regulations are adopted no later than December 31, 2027.(f) On or before June 1, 2027, the secretary or their designee, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, shall report to the Legislature on the use of psychiatric residential treatment facilities in the state. The report shall include evaluation metrics assessing the efficacy of facilities in treating the mental health of individuals under 21 years of age, including analyses of individuals under 21 years of age within and without the jurisdiction of the juvenile court and by age, race or ethnicity, and sexual orientation and gender identity, and shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(g) Information released or published pursuant to this section shall not contain data that may lead to the identification of patients receiving services in a psychiatric residential treatment facility or information that would otherwise allow an individual to link the published information to a specific person. Data published by the department shall be deidentified in compliance with Section 164.514(a) and (b) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.SEC. 18. Section 1522.41 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1522.41. (a) (1) The department, in consultation and collaboration with county placement officials, group home provider organizations, the Director of Health Care Services, and the Director of Developmental Services, shall develop and establish an administrator certification training program to ensure that administrators of group homes have appropriate training to provide the care and services for which a license or certificate is issued.(2) The department shall develop and establish an administrator certification training program to ensure that administrators of short-term residential therapeutic programs have appropriate training to provide the care and services for which a license or certificate is issued.(b) (1) In addition to any other requirements or qualifications required by the department, an administrator of a group home or short-term residential therapeutic program shall successfully complete a department-approved administrator certification training program, pursuant to subdivision (c), prior to employment.(2) If an individual is both the licensee and the administrator of a licensed facility, the individual shall comply with all of the licensee and administrator requirements of this section.(3) Failure to comply with this section shall constitute cause for revocation of the license of the facility.(4) The licensee shall notify the department within 10 days of any change in administrators.(c) (1) An administrator certification training program for group homes shall require a minimum of 40 hours of instruction conducive to learning, in which participants are able to simultaneously interact with each other as well as with the instructor, and that provides training on a uniform core of knowledge in each of the following areas:(A) Laws, regulations, and policies and procedural standards that impact the operations of a group home.(B) Business operations.(C) Management and supervision of staff.(D) Psychosocial and educational needs of the children, including, but not limited to, the information described in subdivision (d) of Section 16501.4 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(E) Community and support services.(F) Physical needs of the children.(G) Assistance with self-administration, storage, misuse, and interaction of medication used by the children.(H) Resident admission, retention, and assessment procedures, including the right of a foster child to have fair and equal access to all available services, placement, care, treatment, and benefits, and to not be subjected to discrimination or harassment on the basis of actual or perceived race, ethnic group identification, ancestry, national origin, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, mental or physical disability, or HIV status.(I) Instruction on cultural competency and sensitivity and related best practices for providing adequate care for children across diverse ethnic and racial backgrounds, as well as children identifying as lesbian, gay, bisexual, or transgender.(J) Nonviolent emergency intervention and reporting requirements.(K) Basic instruction on existing laws and procedures regarding the safety of foster youth at school and ensuring of a harassment- and violence-free school environment.(L) The information described in subdivision (i) of Section 16521.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The program may use the curriculum created pursuant to subdivision (h), and described in subdivision (i), of Section 16521.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(2) An administrator certification training program for short-term residential therapeutic programs shall require a minimum of 40 hours of instruction conducive to learning, in which participants are able to simultaneously interact with each other as well as with the instructor, and that provides training on a uniform core of knowledge in each of the following areas:(A) Laws, regulations, and policies and procedural standards that impact the operations of a short-term residential therapeutic program.(B) Business operations and management and supervision of staff, including staff training.(C) Physical and psychosocial needs of the children, including behavior management, de-escalation techniques, and trauma informed crisis management planning.(D) Permanence, well-being, and educational needs of the children.(E) Community and support services, including accessing local behavioral and mental health supports and interventions, substance use disorder treatments, and culturally relevant services, as appropriate.(F) Understanding the requirements and best practices regarding psychotropic medications, including, but not limited to, court authorization, uses, benefits, side effects, interactions, assistance with self-administration, misuse, documentation, storage, and metabolic monitoring of children prescribed psychotropic medications.(G) Admission, retention, and assessment procedures, including the right of a foster child to have fair and equal access to all available services, placement, care, treatment, and benefits, and to not be subjected to discrimination or harassment on the basis of actual or perceived race, ethnic group identification, ancestry, national origin, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, mental or physical disability, or HIV status.(H) The federal Indian Child Welfare Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), its historical significance, the rights of children covered by the act, and the best interests of Indian children as including culturally appropriate, child-centered practices that respect Native American history, culture, retention of tribal membership, and connection to the tribal community and traditions.(I) Instruction on cultural competency and sensitivity and related best practices for providing adequate care for children across diverse ethnic and racial backgrounds, as well as children identifying as lesbian, gay, bisexual, or transgender.(J) Nonviolent emergency intervention and reporting requirements.(K) Basic instruction on existing laws and procedures regarding the safety of foster youth at school and ensuring of a harassment- and violence-free school environment.(L) The information described in subdivision (i) of Section 16521.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The program may use the curriculum created pursuant to subdivision (h), and described in subdivision (i), of Section 16521.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(d) A group home administrator who possesses a group home license, issued by the department, is exempt from completing an approved administrator certification training program and taking an examination, provided the individual completes 12 hours of instruction conducive to learning, in which participants are able to simultaneously interact with each other as well as with the instructor, in the following uniform core of knowledge areas:(1) Laws, regulations, and policies and procedural standards that impact the operations of a short-term residential therapeutic program.(2) (A) Authorization, uses, benefits, side effects, interactions, assistance with self-administration, misuse, documentation, and storage of medications.(B) Metabolic monitoring of children prescribed psychotropic medications.(3) Admission, retention, and assessment procedures, including the right of a foster child to have fair and equal access to all available services, placement, care, treatment, and benefits, and to not be subjected to discrimination or harassment on the basis of actual or perceived race, ethnic group identification, ancestry, national origin, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, mental or physical disability, or HIV status.(4) The federal Indian Child Welfare Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), its historical significance, the rights of children covered by the act, and the best interests of Indian children as including culturally appropriate, child-centered practices that respect Native American history, culture, retention of tribal membership, and connection to the tribal community and traditions.(5) Instruction on cultural competency and sensitivity and related best practices for providing adequate care for children across diverse ethnic and racial backgrounds, as well as children identifying as lesbian, gay, bisexual, or transgender.(6) Physical and psychosocial needs of children, including behavior management, de-escalation techniques, and trauma informed crisis management planning.(e) Individuals applying for administrator certification under this section shall successfully complete an approved administrator certification training program, pass an examination administered by the department within 60 days of completing the program, submit to the department an administrator certification application, and submit to the department the documentation required by subdivision (f) within 30 days after being notified of having passed the examination. The department may extend these time deadlines for good cause. The department shall notify the applicant of their examination results within 30 days of administering the examination.(f) The department shall not begin the process of issuing an administrator certificate until receipt of all of the following:(1) An administrator certification application.(2) A certificate of completion of the administrator certification training program required pursuant to this section.(3) The fee for processing an administrator certification application, including the issuance of the administrator certificate, as specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (l).(4) Documentation that the applicant has passed the examination.(5) Submission of fingerprints pursuant to Section 1522. The department may waive the submission for those persons who have a current criminal record clearance or exemption on file.(6) Proof that the person is at least 21 years of age.(g) It is unlawful for a person not certified under this section to hold themselves out as a certified administrator of a group home or short-term residential therapeutic program. A person willfully making a false representation as being a certified administrator or facility manager is guilty of a misdemeanor.(h) (1) Administrator certificates issued under this section shall be renewed every two years and renewal shall be conditional upon the certificate holder submitting documentation of completion of 40 hours of continuing education related to the uniform core of knowledge specified in subdivision (c). No more than one-half of the required 40 hours of continuing education necessary to renew the certificate may be satisfied through self-paced courses. All other continuing education hours shall be completed in an instructional setting conducive to learning, in which participants are able to simultaneously interact with each other as well as with the instructor. For purposes of this section, an individual who is a group home or short-term residential therapeutic program administrator and who is required to complete the continuing education hours required by the regulations of the State Department of Developmental Services, and approved by the regional center, may have up to 24 of the required continuing education course hours credited toward the 40-hour continuing education requirement of this section. The department shall accept for certification, community college course hours approved by the regional centers.(2) Every administrator of a group home or short-term residential therapeutic program shall complete the continuing education requirements described in this subdivision.(3) An administrator certificate issued under this section shall expire every two years on the anniversary date of the initial issuance of the certificate, except that an administrator receiving an initial certification on or after July 1, 1999, shall make an irrevocable election to have their recertification date for a subsequent recertification either on the date two years from the date of issuance of the certificate or on the individual’s birthday during the second calendar year following certification. The department shall send a renewal notice to the certificate holder 90 days prior to the expiration date of the certificate. If the certificate is not renewed prior to its expiration date, reinstatement shall be permitted only after the certificate holder has paid a delinquency fee, as specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (l), has submitted to the department an administrator certification renewal application, and has provided evidence of completion of the continuing education required.(4) To renew an administrator certificate, the certificate holder shall, on or before the certificate expiration date, submit to the department an administrator certification renewal application and documentation of completion of the required continuing education courses and pay the renewal fee, as specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (l), irrespective of receipt of the department’s notification of the renewal. A renewal request postmarked on or before the expiration of the certificate shall be proof of compliance with this paragraph.(5) A suspended or revoked administrator certificate shall be subject to expiration as provided for in this section. If reinstatement of the certificate is approved by the department, the certificate holder, as a condition precedent to reinstatement, shall submit proof of compliance with paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subdivision, and shall pay a fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee, plus the delinquency fee, if any, as specified in subparagraphs (A) and (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (l), accrued at the time of its revocation or suspension. Delinquency fees, if any, accrued subsequent to the time of its revocation or suspension and prior to an order for reinstatement, shall be waived for a period of 12 months to allow the individual sufficient time to complete the required continuing education units and to submit the required documentation. Individuals whose certificates will expire within 90 days after the order for reinstatement may be granted a three-month extension to renew their certificates during which time the delinquency fees shall not accrue.(6) An administrator certificate that is not renewed within four years after its expiration shall not be renewed, restored, reissued, or reinstated except upon completion of an administrator certification training program, passing any examination that may be required of an applicant for a new certificate at that time, and paying the fee specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (l).(7) The department shall charge a fee for the reissuance of a lost administrator certificate, as specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (l).(8) A certificate holder shall inform the department of their employment status and change of mailing address within 30 days of any change.(i) Unless otherwise ordered by the department, an administrator certificate shall be considered forfeited under either of the following conditions:(1) The administrator has had a license revoked, suspended, or denied as authorized under Section 1550.(2) The department has issued an exclusion order against the administrator pursuant to Section 1558, 1568.092, 1569.58, or 1596.8897, after the department issued the certificate, and the administrator did not appeal the exclusion order or, after the appeal, the department issued a decision and order that upheld the exclusion order.(j) (1) The department, in consultation and collaboration with county placement officials, provider organizations, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the State Department of Developmental Services, shall establish, by regulation, the program content, the testing instrument, the process for approving administrator certification training programs, and criteria to be used in authorizing individuals, organizations, or educational institutions as vendors to conduct administrator certification training programs and continuing education courses. The department may also grant continuing education hours for courses offered by accredited educational institutions that are consistent with the requirements in this section. The department may deny vendor approval to any agency or person in any of the following circumstances:(A) The applicant has not provided the department with evidence satisfactory to the department of the ability of the applicant to satisfy the requirements of vendorization set out in the regulations adopted by the department.(B) The applicant person or agency has a conflict of interest in that the person or agency places its clients in group homes or short-term residential therapeutic programs.(C) The applicant public or private agency has a conflict of interest in that the agency is mandated to place clients in group homes or short-term residential therapeutic programs and to pay directly for the services. The department may deny vendorization to this type of agency only as long as there are other vendor programs available to conduct the administrator certification training programs and continuing education courses.(2) The department may authorize vendors to conduct administrator certification training programs and continuing education courses pursuant to this section. The department shall conduct the examination pursuant to regulations adopted by the department.(3) The department shall prepare and maintain an updated list of approved training vendors.(4) The department may inspect administrator certification training programs and continuing education courses, including online courses, at no charge to the department, to determine if content and teaching methods comply with this section and applicable regulations. If the department determines that any vendor is not complying with the requirements of this section, the department shall take appropriate action to bring the program into compliance, which may include removing the vendor from the approved training vendors list.(5) The department shall establish reasonable procedures and timeframes, not to exceed 30 days, for the approval of vendor training programs.(6) The department shall charge a fee for an administrator certification training program vendor application or renewal, as specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (l).(7) (A) A vendor of a self-paced online course shall ensure that each course contains all of the following:(i) An interactive portion in which the participant receives feedback, through online communication, based on input from the participant.(ii) Required use of a personal identification number or personal identification information to confirm the identity of the participant.(iii) A final screen displaying a printable statement, to be signed by the participant, certifying that the identified participant completed the course. The vendor shall obtain a copy of the final screen statement with the original signature of the participant prior to the issuance of a certificate of completion. The signed statement of completion shall be maintained by the vendor for a period of three years and be available to the department upon demand. A person who certifies as true any material matter pursuant to this clause that the person knows to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor.(B) This subdivision does not prohibit the department from approving online programs that do not meet the requirements of subparagraph (A) if the vendor demonstrates to the department’s satisfaction that, through advanced technology, the course and the course delivery meet the requirements of this section.(8) The department shall charge a fee for processing a continuing education training program vendor application or renewal, as specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (l).(9) The department shall charge a fee for processing a continuing education course, as specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (l).(k) The department shall establish a registry for certificate holders that shall include, at a minimum, information on employment status and criminal record clearance.(l) The department shall charge nonrefundable fees, as follows:(1) Commencing July 1, 2021, the fee amount in subparagraph (A) shall be incrementally increased by 10 percent each year, not to exceed 40 percent, over a four-year period. The current fee specified in subparagraph (A) shall be the base for each yearly increase, which shall be effective July 1 of each year.(A) The fee for processing an administrator certification application or renewal, including the issuance of the administrator certificate, is one hundred dollars ($100).(B) The fee for the reissuance of a lost administrator certificate is twenty-five dollars ($25).(C) The delinquency fee for processing a late administrator certification renewal application is three hundred dollars ($300), which shall be charged in addition to the fee specified in subparagraph (A).(2) Commencing July 1, 2021, the fee for the administrator certification examination is one hundred dollars ($100), for up to three attempts.(3) Commencing July 1, 2021, fee amounts in subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall be incrementally increased by 10 percent each year, not to exceed 40 percent, over a four-year period. The current fee specified in subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall be the base for each yearly increase and each increase shall be effective July 1 of each year.(A) The fee for processing an administrator certification training program vendor application or renewal is one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for each licensed facility type.(B) The fee for processing a continuing education training program vendor application or renewal is one hundred dollars ($100) for each licensed facility type.(4) Commencing July 1, 2021, the fee for processing a continuing education course is ten dollars ($10) per continuing education unit for each licensed facility type.(5) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, a fee charged pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed the reasonable costs to the department of conducting the certification training program.(m) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a vendor approved by the department who exclusively provides continuing education courses for administrators of a group home or short-term residential therapeutic program, as defined in Section 1502, shall be regulated solely by the department pursuant to this chapter. No other state or local governmental entity shall be responsible for regulating the activity of those vendors.SEC. 19. Section 1562.01 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1562.01. (a) The department shall license short-term residential therapeutic programs, as defined in paragraph (18) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502, pursuant to this chapter. A short-term residential therapeutic program shall comply with all requirements of this chapter that are applicable to group homes and to the requirements of this section.(b) (1) A short-term residential therapeutic program shall have national accreditation from an entity identified by the department pursuant to the process described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 11462 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(2) A short-term residential therapeutic program applicant shall submit documentation of accreditation or application for accreditation with its application for licensure.(3) A short-term residential therapeutic program shall have up to 24 months from the date of licensure to obtain accreditation.(4) A short-term residential therapeutic program shall provide documentation to the department reporting its accreditation status at 12 months and at 18 months after the date of licensure.(5) This subdivision does not preclude the department from requesting additional information from the short-term residential therapeutic program regarding its accreditation status.(6) The department may revoke a short-term residential therapeutic program’s license pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 1550) for failure to obtain accreditation within the timeframes specified in this subdivision.(c) (1) A short-term residential therapeutic program shall have up to 12 months from the date of licensure to obtain in good standing a mental health program approval and Medi-Cal mental health certification, as set forth in Sections 4096.5 and 11462.01 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(2) A short-term residential therapeutic program shall maintain the program approval described in paragraph (1) in good standing during its licensure.(3) The department shall track the number of licensed short-term residential therapeutic programs that were unable to obtain a mental health program approval and provide that information to the Legislature annually as part of the state budget process.(d) (1) A short-term residential therapeutic program shall prepare and maintain a current, written plan of operation as required by the department.(2) The plan of operation shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) A statement of purposes and goals.(B) A plan for the supervision, evaluation, and training of staff, designed to ensure the provision of trauma-informed services. The plan shall be appropriate to meet the needs of staff and children.(C) A program statement that includes all of the following:(i) On and after October 1, 2021, a description of how the short-term residential therapeutic program will meet standards, to be established by the department in collaboration with the State Department of Health Care Services, for both of the following:(I) A comprehensive trauma-informed treatment model designed to address the individualized needs of children.(II) A plan for how the short-term residential therapeutic program will make licensed nursing staff available, as set forth in subdivision (n).(ii) Description of the short-term residential therapeutic program’s ability to support the individual needs of children and their families with short-term, specialized, trauma-informed, and intensive treatment, including, but not limited to, treatment that implements child-specific short- and long-term needs and goals identified by the qualified individual’s assessment of the child pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 4096 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(iii) Description of the core services, as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 11462 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to be offered to children and their families, as appropriate or necessary.(iv) Procedures for the development, implementation, and periodic updating of the needs and services plan for children served by the short-term residential therapeutic program and procedures for collaborating with the child and family team described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, that include, but are not limited to, a description of the services to be provided or arranged to meet the short- and long-term needs and goals of the child as assessed by the qualified individual, pursuant to Sections 4096 and 11462.01 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, processes to ensure treatment is consistent with the short- and long-term needs and goals for the child, including, as specified in the child’s permanency plan, the anticipated duration of the treatment, and processes to ensure that consistent progress is made toward the timeframe and plan for transitioning the child to a less restrictive family environment.(v) A description of the population or populations to be served.(vi) A description of compliance with the requirements in subdivision (c). A short-term residential therapeutic program that has not satisfied the requirements in subdivision (c) shall demonstrate the ability to meet the mental health service needs of children.(vii) (I) A description of how the short-term residential therapeutic program, in accordance with the child’s case plan and the child and family team recommendations, will provide for, arrange for the provision of, or assist in, all of the following:(ia) Identification of home-based family care settings for a child who does not have a home-based caregiver identified for transition and pursuant to clause (viii).(ib) Development of an individualized family-based aftercare support plan that identifies necessary supports, services, and treatment to be provided for at least six months postdischarge as a child moves from their short-term residential therapeutic program placement to home-based family care setting or to a permanent living situation through reunification, adoption, or guardianship, or to a transitional housing program. This plan shall be developed, pursuant to Section 4096.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, in collaboration with the county placing agency, the child and family team, and other necessary agencies or individuals for at least six months postdischarge. Federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program shall only be available if all state and federal requirements are met and the treatment is medically necessary, regardless of the six months postdischarge requirement.(ic) Documentation of the process by which the short- and long-term, child-specific mental health goals identified by a qualified individual, as defined in Section 16501 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 4096 of the Welfare and institutions Code, will be implemented by the short-term residential therapeutic program.(II) This clause shall not be interpreted to supersede the placement and care responsibility vested in the county child welfare agency or probation department.(viii) (I) On and after October 1, 2021, a description of how the short-term residential therapeutic program will, to the extent clinically appropriate, consistent with any applicable court orders, and in accordance with the child’s best interest, do all of the following:(ia) Facilitate participation of family members in the child’s treatment program.(ib) Facilitate outreach to the family members of the child, including siblings, document how the outreach is made, including contact information, and maintain contact information for any known biological family and nonrelative extended family members of the child.(ic) Document how family members will be integrated into the treatment process for the child, including postdischarge, and how sibling connections are maintained.(II) This clause shall not be interpreted to supersede the placement and care responsibility vested in the county child welfare agency or probation department.(ix) Any other information that may be prescribed by the department for the proper administration of this section.(e) In addition to the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, a county licensed to operate a short-term residential therapeutic program shall describe, in the plan of operation, its conflict of interest mitigation plan, as set forth in subdivision (g) of Section 11462.02 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(f) (1) (A) (i) A short-term residential therapeutic program applicant shall submit an application to the department that includes a letter of recommendation in support of its program from a county placing agency.(ii) The letter of recommendation shall include a statement that the county placing agency reviewed a copy of the applicant’s program statement.(iii) If the letter of recommendation is not from the county in which the facility is located, the short-term residential therapeutic program applicant shall include, with its application, a statement that it provided the county in which the facility is located an opportunity for that county to review the program statement and notified that county that the facility has received a letter of recommendation from another county.(B) If the application does not contain a letter of recommendation as described in subparagraph (A), then the department shall cease review of the application. Nothing in this paragraph shall constitute a denial of the application for purposes of Section 1526 or any other law.(C) A new letter of recommendation is not required when a short-term residential therapeutic program moves locations.(2) A short-term residential therapeutic program shall submit a copy of its program statement to all county placing agencies from which the short-term residential therapeutic program accepts placements, including the county in which the facility is located, for optional review when the short-term residential therapeutic program updates its program statement.(g) (1) The department shall adopt regulations to establish requirements for the education, qualification, and training of facility managers and staff who provide care and supervision to children or who have regular, direct contact with children in the course of their responsibilities in short-term residential therapeutic programs consistent with the intended role of these facilities to provide short-term, specialized, and intensive treatment.(2) Requirements shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) Staff classifications.(B) Specification of the date by which employees shall be required to meet the education and qualification requirements.(C) Any other requirements that may be prescribed by the department for the proper administration of this section.(h) The department shall adopt regulations to specify training requirements for staff who provide care and supervision to children or who have regular, direct contact with children in the course of their responsibilities. These requirements shall include both of the following:(1) Timeframes for completion of training, including the following:(A) Training that shall be completed prior to unsupervised care of children.(B) Training to be completed within the first 180 days of employment.(C) Training to be completed annually.(2) Topics to be covered in the training shall include, but are not limited to, the following:(A) Child and adolescent development, including sexual orientation, gender identity, and gender expression.(B) The effects of trauma, including grief and loss, and child abuse and neglect on child development and behavior and methods to behaviorally support children impacted by that trauma or child abuse and neglect.(C) The rights of a child in foster care, including the right to have fair and equal access to all available services, placement, care, treatment, and benefits, and to not be subjected to discrimination or harassment on the basis of actual or perceived race, ethnic group identification, ancestry, national origin, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, mental or physical disability, or HIV status.(D) Positive discipline and the importance of self-esteem.(E) Core practice model.(F) An overview of the child welfare and probation systems.(G) Reasonable and prudent parent standard.(H) Instruction on cultural competency and sensitivity and related best practices for providing adequate care for children across diverse ethnic and racial backgrounds, as well as children identifying as lesbian, gay, bisexual, or transgender.(I) Awareness and identification of commercial sexual exploitation and best practices for providing care and supervision to commercially sexually exploited children.(J) The federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), its historical significance, the rights of children covered by the act, and the best interests of Indian children, including the role of the caregiver in supporting culturally appropriate, child-centered practices that respect Native American history, culture, retention of tribal membership, and connection to the tribal community and traditions.(K) Permanence, well-being, and educational needs of children.(L) Basic instruction on existing laws and procedures regarding the safety of foster youth at school; and ensuring a harassment and violence free school environment.(M) Best practices for providing care and supervision to nonminor dependents.(N) Health issues in foster care.(O) Physical and psychosocial needs of children, including behavior management, de-escalation techniques, and trauma-informed crisis management planning.(i) (1) Each person employed as a facility manager or staff member of a short-term residential therapeutic program, who provides direct care and supervision to children and youth residing in the short-term residential therapeutic program shall be at least 21 years of age.(2) This subdivision shall not apply to a facility manager or staff member employed, before October 1, 2014, at a short-term residential therapeutic program that was operating under a group home license prior to January 1, 2017.(j) Notwithstanding any other section of this chapter, the department may establish requirements for licensed group homes that are transitioning to short-term residential therapeutic programs, which may include, but not be limited to, requirements related to application and plan of operation.(k) A short-term residential therapeutic program shall have a qualified and certified administrator, as set forth in Section 1522.41.(l) A short-term residential therapeutic program shall provide trauma-informed support and transition services to foster youth as part of a planned or unplanned discharge. This shall include participation in any county-level or state-level meetings pursuant to Section 16521.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code with the goal of placement preservation whenever possible or, if necessary, identifying and working with alternative short-term residential therapeutic programs or other providers to directly transition the youth.(m) The department shall have the authority to inspect a short-term residential therapeutic program pursuant to the system of governmental monitoring and oversight developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11462 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(n) (1) On and after October 1, 2021, a short-term residential therapeutic program shall ensure the availability of licensed nursing staff, which may include the nursing resources established pursuant to Section 4096.55 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(2) Nursing staff shall be onsite according to the treatment model of the short-term residential therapeutic program and as otherwise required by the needs of any child residing in the facility.(3) Nursing staff shall be available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, and shall provide care within the scope of their practice.(4) If a child who is placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program by a county placing agency requires regular onsite nursing care and does not require inpatient care in a licensed health facility, the short-term residential therapeutic program shall provide the nursing care consistent with their treatment model, or shall partner with the county placing agency to arrange for the nursing care to be provided.(5) The department, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services, county agencies, providers, and other stakeholders, shall develop guidance to implement this subdivision.(o) The short-term residential therapeutic program shall maintain the interagency placement committee’s written determination and the qualified individual’s assessment of the child, required to be completed and provided to the short-term residential therapeutic program pursuant to subdivisions (f) and (g) of Section 4096 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, in the child’s record.(p) The short-term residential therapeutic program shall engage with the county placing agency in placement preservation strategies pursuant to Section 16010.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as applicable. Nothing in this subdivision shall be interpreted to supersede the placement and care responsibility vested in the county placing agency or their responsibilities under Section 16010.7 of the Welfare and Institution Code.(q) (1) The department shall adopt regulations to implement this section, collaborating with the State Department of Health Care Services, as necessary, to ensure alignment with mental health program approval requirements, as described in Section 4096.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(2) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of interim licensing standards until regulations are adopted. These interim licensing standards shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.SEC. 20. Section 1563 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1563. (a) The department shall ensure that licensing personnel at the department have appropriate training to properly carry out this chapter.(b) The department shall institute a staff development and training program to develop among departmental staff the knowledge and understanding necessary to successfully carry out this chapter. Specifically, the program shall do all of the following:(1) Provide staff with 36 hours of training per year that reflects the needs of persons served by community care facilities. This training shall, where appropriate, include specialized instruction in the needs of foster children, persons with mental disorders, or developmental or physical disabilities, or other groups served by specialized community care facilities.(2) Give priority to applications for employment from persons with experience as care providers to persons served by community care facilities.(3) Provide new staff with comprehensive training within the first six months of employment. This comprehensive training shall, at a minimum, include the following core areas: administrative action process, client populations, conducting facility visits, cultural awareness, documentation skills, facility operations, human relation skills, interviewing techniques, investigation processes, and regulation administration.(c) In addition to the requirements in subdivision (b), group home, short-term residential therapeutic program, and foster family agency licensing personnel shall receive a minimum of 24 hours of training per year to increase their understanding of children in group homes, short-term residential therapeutic programs, certified homes, and foster family homes. The training shall cover, but not be limited to, all of the following topics:(1) The types and characteristics of emotionally troubled children.(2) The high-risk behaviors they exhibit.(3) The biological, psychological, interpersonal, and social contributors to these behaviors.(4) The range of management and treatment interventions utilized for these children, including, but not limited to, nonviolent, emergency intervention techniques.(5) The right of a foster child to have fair and equal access to all available services, placement, care, treatment, and benefits, and to not be subjected to discrimination or harassment on the basis of actual or perceived race, ethnic group identification, ancestry, national origin, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, mental or physical disability, or HIV status.(d) The training described in subdivisions (b) and (c) may include the following topics:(1) An overview of the child protective and probation systems.(2) The effects of trauma, including grief and loss, and child abuse or neglect on child development and behavior, and methods to behaviorally support children impacted by that trauma or child abuse and neglect.(3) Positive discipline and the importance of self-esteem.(4) Health issues in foster care, including, but not limited to, the authorization, uses, risks, benefits, assistance with self-administration, oversight, and monitoring of psychotropic medications, and trauma, mental health, and substance use disorder treatments for children in foster care under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, including how to access those treatments.(5) Accessing the services and supports available to foster children to address educational needs, physical, mental, and behavioral health, substance use disorders, and culturally relevant services.(6) Instruction on cultural competency and sensitivity and related best practices for, providing adequate care for children across diverse ethnic and racial backgrounds, as well as for children identifying as lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender.(7) Understanding how to use best practices for providing care and supervision to commercially sexually exploited children.(8) Understanding the federal Indian Child Welfare Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), its historical significance, the rights of children covered by the act, and the best interests of Indian children, including the role of the caregiver in supporting culturally appropriate, child-centered practices that respect Native American history, culture, retention of tribal membership, and connection to the tribal community and traditions.(9) Understanding how to use best practices for providing care and supervision to nonminor dependents.(10) Understanding how to use best practices for providing care and supervision to children with special health care needs.(11) Basic instruction on existing laws and procedures regarding the safety of foster youth at school; and ensuring a harassment and violence free school environment pursuant to Article 3.6 (commencing with Section 32228) of Chapter 2 of Part 19 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code.(12) Permanence, well-being, and educational needs of children.(13) Child and adolescent development, including sexual orientation, gender identity, and gender expression.(14) The role of foster parents, including working cooperatively with the child welfare or probation agency, the child’s family, and other service providers implementing the case plan.(15) A foster parent’s responsibility to act as a reasonable and prudent parent, and to provide a family setting that promotes normal childhood experiences that serve the needs of the child.(16) Physical and psychosocial needs of children, including behavior management, de-escalation techniques, and trauma informed crisis management planning.SEC. 21. Section 127825 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:127825. (a) As a component of the Children and Youth Behavioral Health Initiative established pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5961) of Part 7 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the office is hereby authorized to award competitive grants to entities and individuals it deems qualified to expand the supply of behavioral health counselors, coaches, peer supports, and other allied health care providers serving children and youth, including those at schoolsites.(b) For the purposes of this chapter, “behavioral health coach” means a new category of behavioral health provider trained specifically to help address the unmet mental health and substance use needs of children and youth. Recognizing that unmet mental health and substance use needs create learning barriers, behavioral health coaches shall engage and support children and youth in cultural, linguistic, and age-appropriate services, with the ability to refer and link to higher levels of care, as needed. As members of a care team, behavioral health professionals serving as a coach receive appropriate supervision from licensed staff. Training and qualifications include, but are not limited to, psychoeducation, system navigation, crisis de-escalation, safety planning, coping skills, and motivational interviewing.SEC. 22. Section 6401.8 of the Labor Code is amended to read:6401.8. (a) The standards board, no later than July 1, 2016, shall adopt standards developed by the division that require a hospital licensed pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (f) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, except as exempted by subdivision (e), to adopt a workplace violence prevention plan as a part of its injury and illness prevention plan to protect health care workers and other facility personnel from aggressive and violent behavior.(b) The standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:(1) A requirement that the workplace violence prevention plan be in effect at all times in all patient care units, including inpatient and outpatient settings and clinics on the hospital’s license.(2) A definition of workplace violence that includes, but is not limited to, both of the following:(A) The use of physical force against a hospital employee by a patient or a person accompanying a patient that results in, or has a high likelihood of resulting in, injury, psychological trauma, or stress, regardless of whether the employee sustains an injury.(B) An incident involving the use of a firearm or other dangerous weapon, regardless of whether the employee sustains an injury.(3) A requirement that a workplace violence prevention plan include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) Personnel education and training policies that require all health care workers who provide direct care to patients to, at least annually, receive education and training that is designed to provide an opportunity for interactive questions and answers with a person knowledgeable about the workplace violence prevention plan. The education and training shall cover topics that include, but are not limited to, the following topics:(i) How to recognize potential for violence, and when and how to seek assistance to prevent or respond to violence.(ii) How to report violent incidents to law enforcement.(iii) Any resources available to employees for coping with incidents of violence, including, but not limited to, critical incident stress debriefing or employee assistance programs.(B) A system for responding to, and investigating violent incidents and situations involving violence or the risk of violence.(C) A system to, at least annually, assess and improve upon factors that may contribute to, or help prevent workplace violence, including, but not limited to, the following factors:(i) Staffing, including staffing patterns and patient classification systems that contribute to, or are insufficient to address, the risk of violence.(ii) Sufficiency of security systems, including alarms, emergency response, and security personnel availability.(iii) Job design, equipment, and facilities.(iv) Security risks associated with specific units, areas of the facility with uncontrolled access, late-night or early morning shifts, and employee security in areas surrounding the facility such as employee parking areas.(4) A requirement that all workplace violence prevention plans be developed in conjunction with affected employees, including their recognized collective bargaining agents, if any.(5) A requirement that all temporary personnel be oriented to the workplace violence prevention plan.(6) Provisions prohibiting hospitals from disallowing an employee from, or taking punitive or retaliatory action against an employee for, seeking assistance and intervention from local emergency services or law enforcement when a violent incident occurs.(7) A requirement that hospitals document, and retain for a period of five years, a written record of any violent incident against a hospital employee, regardless of whether the employee sustains an injury, and regardless of whether the report is made by the employee who is the subject of the violent incident or any other employee.(8) A requirement that a hospital report violent incidents to the division. If the incident results in injury, involves the use of a firearm or other dangerous weapon, or presents an urgent or emergent threat to the welfare, health, or safety of hospital personnel, the hospital shall report the incident to the division within 24 hours. All other incidents of violence shall be reported to the division within 72 hours.(c) The standards board shall, by March 1, 2027, amend the standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) to include all of the following:(1) (A) A requirement that a hospital implement a weapons detection screening policy that requires the use of weapons detection devices that automatically screen a person’s body, as described in clause (iii), at the hospital’s main public entrance, at the entrance to the hospital’s emergency department, and at the hospital’s labor and delivery entrance if separately accessible to the public.(i) For purposes of this paragraph, a weapons detection screening policy shall include security mechanisms, devices, or technology designed to screen and identify instruments capable of inflicting death or serious bodily injury.(ii) The use of handheld metal detector wands, while they may be used in connection with other weapons detection devices, may not be the sole equipment used. This clause does not apply to the following:(I) Small and rural hospitals.(II) Entrances with existing spacing limitations where the use of a weapons detection device other than a handheld metal detector wand would result in a violation of the standards in Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.(III) Hospitals that exclusively provide extended hospital care to patients with complex medical and rehabilitative needs, such as hospitals that are currently federally certified as long-term care hospitals or inpatient rehabilitation facilities.(iii) The standards board shall define the list of applicable security mechanisms, devices, or technologies that meet the standard in this subparagraph.(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the following definitions shall apply:(i) “Main public entrance” means a singular entrance, as designated by the hospital, that serves as the primary point of access that patients and visitors use to enter the main hospital building.(ii) “Small and rural hospital” has the same meaning as in subdivision (d) of Section 130076 of the Health and Safety Code for purposes of the Small and Rural Hospital Relief Program.(C) The requirement described in this paragraph may not apply to the ambulance entrance.(2) (A) A requirement that a hospital assign appropriate personnel, other than a health care provider, who meet training standards described in subparagraph (C), to implement the weapon detection screening policy, including the monitoring and operation of the weapons detection devices at each specified public entrance at all times the entrance is open to the public.(B) A “health care provider” includes any health care professional licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code.(C) (i) A hospital shall implement training for personnel responsible for implementing the weapons detection screening policy that includes a minimum of eight hours of training on all of the following:(I) The hospital’s policies and procedures on how to respond if a dangerous weapon is detected at the point of screening.(II) How to operate the hospital’s weapons detection devices.(III) De-escalation.(IV) Implicit bias.(ii) A hospital shall determine how the training described in this subparagraph is satisfied. The training topics described in clause (i) may be satisfied individually and on separate occasions or through one comprehensive training course, provided that the total amount of training received meets the minimum amount of time required in this subparagraph.(D) No one other than trained personnel who have completed the requirements in subparagraph (C) shall search personal belongings at any hospital entrance or confiscate weapons if the hospital’s policies include weapons confiscation by trained personnel.(3) (A) A provision permitting a hospital to exclude current hospital employees or health care providers who enter a hospital wearing an identification badge bearing their name and title from undergoing weapons detection screening as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this subdivision.(B) A requirement that the weapons detection screening policy include reasonable protocols addressing how the hospital will respond if a dangerous weapon is detected and reasonable protocols for alternative search and screening for patients, family, or visitors who refuse to undergo weapons detection device screening.(C) If an individual triggers the weapons detection device, the individual shall have the right to leave the facility with the object and the right to return without the object and without being denied entry to the facility solely for the reason of previously possessing the detected object.(4) A requirement that a hospital post, in a conspicuous location in a size and manner determined by the standards board, within reasonable proximity of any public entrances where weapons detection devices are utilized, a notice advising the public that the hospital conducts screenings for weapons upon entry but that no person shall be refused medical care, pursuant to the federal Emergency Medical Treatment and Active Labor Act (EMTALA).(5) The division shall set an effective date that is no longer than 90 days after the standard is adopted for hospitals to comply with the requirements of this subdivision.(d) By January 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, the division, in a manner that protects patient and employee confidentiality, shall post a report on its internet website containing information regarding violent incidents at hospitals, that includes, but is not limited to, the total number of reports, and which specific hospitals filed reports, pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (b), the outcome of any related inspection or investigation, the citations levied against a hospital based on a violent incident, and recommendations of the division on the prevention of violent incidents at hospitals.(e) This section shall not apply to a hospital operated by the State Department of State Hospitals, the State Department of Developmental Services, or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.(f) This section does not limit the authority of the standards board to adopt standards to protect employees from workplace violence. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to preclude the standards board from adopting standards that require other employers, including, but not limited to, employers exempted from this section by subdivision (e), to adopt plans to protect employees from workplace violence. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to preclude the standards board from adopting standards that require an employer subject to this section, or any other employer, to adopt a workplace violence prevention plan that includes elements or requirements additional to, or broader in scope than, those described in this section.SEC. 23. Section 311.2 of the Penal Code is amended to read:311.2. (a) Every person who knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for sale or distribution, or in this state possesses, prepares, publishes, produces, or prints, with intent to distribute or to exhibit to others, or who offers to distribute, distributes, or exhibits to others, any obscene matter is for a first offense, guilty of a misdemeanor. If the person has previously been convicted of any violation of this section, the court may, in addition to the punishment authorized in Section 311.9, impose a fine not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).(b) Every person who knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for sale or distribution, or in this state possesses, prepares, publishes, produces, develops, duplicates, or prints any representation of information, data, or image, including, but not limited to, any film, filmstrip, photograph, negative, slide, photocopy, videotape, video laser disc, computer hardware, computer software, computer floppy disc, data storage media, CD-ROM, or computer-generated equipment or any other computer-generated image that contains or incorporates in any manner, any film, filmstrip, or any digitally altered or artificial-intelligence-generated matter, with intent to distribute or to exhibit to, or to exchange with, others for commercial consideration, or who offers to distribute, distributes, or exhibits to, or exchanges with, others for commercial consideration, any obscene matter, knowing that the matter depicts a person under 18 years of age personally engaging in or personally simulating sexual conduct, as defined in Section 311.4, or that it contains a digitally altered or artificial-intelligence-generated depiction of what appears to be a person under 18 years of age engaging in such conduct, is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or six years, or by a fine not exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), in the absence of a finding that the defendant would be incapable of paying that fine, or by both that fine and imprisonment.(c) (1) Every person who knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for sale or distribution, or in this state possesses, prepares, publishes, produces, develops, duplicates, or prints any representation of information, data, or image, including, but not limited to, any film, filmstrip, photograph, negative, slide, photocopy, videotape, video laser disc, computer hardware, computer software, computer floppy disc, data storage media, CD-ROM, or computer-generated equipment or any other computer-generated image that contains or incorporates in any manner, any film, filmstrip, or any digitally altered or artificial-intelligence-generated matter, with intent to distribute or exhibit to, or to exchange with, a person 18 years of age or older, or who offers to distribute, distributes, or exhibits to, or exchanges with, a person 18 years of age or older any matter, knowing that the matter depicts a person under 18 years of age personally engaging in or personally simulating sexual conduct, as defined in Section 311.4, or any obscene matter that contains a digitally altered or artificial-intelligence-generated depiction of what appears to be a person under 18 years of age engaging in such conduct, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for up to one year, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, or by imprisonment in the state prison. If a person has been previously convicted of a violation of this subdivision, they are guilty of a felony.(2) It is not necessary to prove commercial consideration in order to establish a violation of this subdivision.(3) It is not necessary to prove that matter that depicts a real person under 18 years of age is obscene or lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value in order to establish a violation of this subdivision.(d) (1) Every person who knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for sale or distribution, or in this state possesses, prepares, publishes, produces, develops, duplicates, or prints any representation of information, data, or image, including, but not limited to, any film, filmstrip, photograph, negative, slide, photocopy, videotape, video laser disc, computer hardware, computer software, computer floppy disc, data storage media, CD-ROM, or computer-generated equipment or any other computer-generated image that contains or incorporates in any manner any film, filmstrip, or any digitally altered or artificial-intelligence-generated matter, with intent to distribute or exhibit to, or to exchange with, a person under 18 years of age, or who offers to distribute, distributes, or exhibits to, or exchanges with, a person under 18 years of age any matter, knowing that the matter depicts a person under 18 years of age personally engaging in or personally simulating sexual conduct, as defined in Section 311.4, or any obscene matter that contains a digitally altered or artificial-intelligence-generated depiction of what appears to be a person under 18 years of age engaging in such conduct, is guilty of a felony.(2) It is not necessary to prove commercial consideration in order to establish a violation of this subdivision.(3) It is not necessary to prove that matter that depicts a real person under 18 years of age is obscene or lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value in order to establish a violation of this subdivision.(e) Subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, do not apply to the activities of law enforcement and prosecuting agencies in the investigation and prosecution of criminal offenses, to legitimate medical, scientific, or educational activities, or to lawful conduct between spouses.(f) This section does not apply to matter that depicts a legally emancipated child under 18 years of age or to lawful conduct between spouses when one or both are under 18 years of age.(g) It does not constitute a violation of this section for a telephone corporation, as defined by Section 234 of the Public Utilities Code, to carry or transmit messages described in this chapter or to perform related activities in providing telephone services.SEC. 24. Section 835a of the Penal Code is amended to read:835a. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) That the authority to use physical force, conferred on peace officers by this section, is a serious responsibility that shall be exercised judiciously and with respect for human rights and dignity and for the sanctity of every human life. The Legislature further finds and declares that every person has a right to be free from excessive use of force by officers acting under color of law.(2) As set forth below, it is the intent of the Legislature that peace officers use deadly force only when necessary in defense of human life. In determining whether deadly force is necessary, officers shall evaluate each situation in light of the particular circumstances of each case, and shall use other available resources and techniques if reasonably safe and feasible to an objectively reasonable officer.(3) That the decision by a peace officer to use force shall be evaluated carefully and thoroughly, in a manner that reflects the gravity of that authority and the serious consequences of the use of force by peace officers, in order to ensure that officers use force consistent with law and agency policies.(4) That the decision by a peace officer to use force shall be evaluated from the perspective of a reasonable officer in the same situation, based on the totality of the circumstances known to or perceived by the officer at the time, rather than with the benefit of hindsight, and that the totality of the circumstances shall account for occasions when officers may be forced to make quick judgments about using force.(5) That individuals with physical, mental health, developmental, or intellectual disabilities are significantly more likely to experience greater levels of physical force during police interactions, as their disability may affect their ability to understand or comply with commands from peace officers. It is estimated that individuals with disabilities are involved in between one-third and one-half of all fatal encounters with law enforcement.(b) Any peace officer who has reasonable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has committed a public offense may use objectively reasonable force to effect the arrest, to prevent escape, or to overcome resistance.(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a peace officer is justified in using deadly force upon another person only when the officer reasonably believes, based on the totality of the circumstances, that such force is necessary for either of the following reasons:(A) To defend against an imminent threat of death or serious bodily injury to the officer or to another person.(B) To apprehend a fleeing person for any felony that threatened or resulted in death or serious bodily injury, if the officer reasonably believes that the person will cause death or serious bodily injury to another unless immediately apprehended. Where feasible, a peace officer shall, prior to the use of force, make reasonable efforts to identify themselves as a peace officer and to warn that deadly force may be used, unless the officer has objectively reasonable grounds to believe the person is aware of those facts.(2) A peace officer shall not use deadly force against a person based on the danger that person poses to themselves, if an objectively reasonable officer would believe the person does not pose an imminent threat of death or serious bodily injury to the peace officer or to another person.(d) A peace officer who makes or attempts to make an arrest need not retreat or desist from their efforts by reason of the resistance or threatened resistance of the person being arrested. A peace officer shall not be deemed an aggressor or lose the right to self-defense by the use of objectively reasonable force in compliance with subdivisions (b) and (c) to effect the arrest or to prevent escape or to overcome resistance. For the purposes of this subdivision, “retreat” does not mean tactical repositioning or other de-escalation tactics.(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Deadly force” means any use of force that creates a substantial risk of causing death or serious bodily injury, including, but not limited to, the discharge of a firearm.(2) A threat of death or serious bodily injury is “imminent” when, based on the totality of the circumstances, a reasonable officer in the same situation would believe that a person has the present ability, opportunity, and apparent intent to immediately cause death or serious bodily injury to the peace officer or another person. An imminent harm is not merely a fear of future harm, no matter how great the fear and no matter how great the likelihood of the harm, but is one that, from appearances, must be instantly confronted and addressed.(3) “Totality of the circumstances” means all facts known to the peace officer at the time, including the conduct of the officer and the subject leading up to the use of deadly force.SEC. 25. Section 1171 of the Penal Code is amended to read:1171. (a) For the purposes of this section, “postconviction proceeding” means a proceeding to modify a sentence or conviction pursuant to an ameliorative statute. Ameliorative statutes include, but are not limited to, Sections 1170.18, 1172.1, 1172.6, 1172.7, and 1172.75.(b) On or before March 1, 2025, the presiding judge of each county superior court, or their designee, shall convene a meeting to develop a plan for fair and efficient handling of postconviction proceedings. The presiding judge shall invite to the meeting a representative from the district attorney, the public defender or other representative of indigent defense services, and other entities that the presiding judge deems necessary in order to ensure timely and efficient postconviction proceedings. At the meeting, the presiding judge or their designee shall determine how postconviction proceedings will be assigned to individual judges, including whether they will take place before the original sentencing judge or designated judge. The presiding judge may set further meetings at their discretion.(c) The following shall apply for all postconviction proceedings unless there is a conflict with a more specific rule established in statute, in which case the more specific statute shall apply:(1) Upon receiving a request to begin a postconviction proceeding that is authorized in law, the court shall consider whether to appoint counsel to represent the defendant. This section does not prevent the court from assigning counsel at a later time.(2) The court shall consider any pertinent circumstances that have arisen since the prior sentence was imposed and has jurisdiction to modify every aspect of the defendant’s sentence, including if it was imposed after a guilty plea.(3) Any changes to a sentence shall not be a basis for a prosecutor or court to rescind a plea agreement.(4) The court shall state on the record the reasons for its decision to grant or deny the initial request to begin a postconviction proceeding and shall provide notice to the defendant of its decision.(5) After ruling on a request, the court shall advise the defendant of their right to appeal and the necessary steps and time for taking an appeal.(6) The parties may waive a hearing and proceed directly to the resentencing. A defendant may waive their personal presence at a resentencing hearing and may appear via remote technology. If a victim of a crime wishes to be heard pursuant to the provisions of Section 28 of Article I of the California Constitution, or pursuant to any other provision of law applicable to the hearing, the victim shall notify the prosecution of their request to be heard within 15 days of being notified that resentencing is being sought and the court shall provide an opportunity for the victim to be heard.(7) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, including Sections 13201 and 11081, and Sections 1798.24 and 1798.34 of the Civil Code, upon request from the defendant’s attorney, the district attorney of the county in which the defendant was sentenced, or the Attorney General if the Department of Justice originally prosecuted the case, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall, in accordance with this subparagraph and subparagraph (C), provide to the requesting party a case summary, disciplinary records, programming records, chronos, and any other material the department deems relevant to a postconviction proceeding.(B) For requests submitted on or after January 1, 2026, the records shall be provided within 45 days of the request unless the requestor agrees to extend this period. The records shall be provided in a secure electronic format. This section does not diminish the ability of parties or the court to request additional records, which shall be provided by the department as soon as is practicable.(C) If the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation has in its possession relevant records it has determined are confidential under the department’s regulations, the department shall redact such portions before producing the records to the requestor.(D) Any party may file a motion with the court presiding over a postconviction proceeding seeking disclosure of anything redacted under subparagraph (C). In addition to the parties required to be served such a motion, service is required upon the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation through the person designated under subdivision (d). The court shall determine whether good cause exists for in-camera review of the redacted material. If the court determines that good cause exists for in-camera review, the department shall provide the unredacted material for in-camera review within seven days. After an in-camera review, the court shall order disclosure of any redacted material that may be relevant to the postconviction proceeding and issue an appropriate protective order limiting the use and scope of the disclosure.(E) To protect personal privacy and other legitimate interests, each party shall redact sensitive information as required by state and federal law and rules of court from all pleadings and other papers filed in the court’s public file, whether filed in paper or electronic form, under this section.(F) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall promulgate regulations to implement subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive.(d) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall designate a person for each prison as a point of contact for records, transportation, or inquiries pursuant to this section. The department shall regularly maintain a public directory of each person designated pursuant to this subdivision, including contact information.(e) This section does not diminish the ability of the prosecution to oppose relief requested in a postconviction proceeding.(f) This section shall not be interpreted to authorize anything prohibited by an initiative statute.SEC. 26. Section 1370 of the Penal Code is amended to read:1370. (a) (1) (A) If the defendant is found mentally competent, the criminal process shall resume, the trial on the offense charged or hearing on the alleged violation shall proceed, and judgment may be pronounced.(B) If the defendant is found mentally incompetent and is not charged with an offense listed in subdivision (d) of Section 1001.36, the trial, the hearing on the alleged violation, or the judgment shall be suspended, and the court shall do all of the following:(i) (I) Determine whether restoring the person to mental competence is in the interests of justice.(II) In exercising its discretion pursuant to this clause, the court shall consider the relevant circumstances of the charged offense, including the harm done to the victim, the defendant’s mental health condition, including, without limitation, any intellectual or developmental disability, the history of treatment, the criminal history of the defendant, whether the defendant is likely to face incarceration if convicted, whether the defendant has previously been found incompetent to stand trial, whether restoring the person to mental competence will enhance public safety, and any other relevant considerations. The court shall provide the defense and prosecution an opportunity to be heard on whether restoration is in the interests of justice.(ii) If restoring the person to mental competence is in the interests of justice, the court shall state its reasons orally on the record and the case shall proceed as provided in subparagraph (C).(iii) If restoring the person to mental competence is not in the interests of justice, the court shall conduct a hearing, pursuant to Section 1001.36, and, if the court deems the defendant eligible, grant diversion pursuant to that section for a period not to exceed two years from the date the individual is accepted into diversion or the maximum term of imprisonment provided by law for the most serious offense charged in the complaint, whichever is shorter.(I) The hearing shall be held no later than 30 days after the finding of incompetence. If the hearing is delayed beyond 30 days, the court shall order the defendant to be released on their own recognizance pending the hearing.(II) If the defendant performs satisfactorily on diversion pursuant to this subclause, at the end of the period of diversion, the court shall dismiss the criminal charges that were the subject of the criminal proceedings at the time of the initial diversion.(III) If the court finds the defendant ineligible or unsuitable for diversion based on the circumstances set forth in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 1001.36, or if any of the conditions described in subdivision (g) of Section 1001.36 are present, the court may, after notice to the defendant, defense counsel, and the prosecution, hold a hearing to determine whether to do any of the following:(ia) Order modification of the treatment plan in accordance with a recommendation from the treatment provider.(ib) Refer the defendant to assisted outpatient treatment pursuant to Section 5346 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. A referral to assisted outpatient treatment may only occur in a county where services are available pursuant to Section 5348 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the agency agrees to accept responsibility for treatment of the defendant. A hearing to determine eligibility for assisted outpatient treatment shall be held within 45 days after the finding of incompetence. If the hearing is delayed beyond 45 days, the court shall order the defendant, if confined in county jail, to be released on their own recognizance pending that hearing. If the defendant is accepted into assisted outpatient treatment, the charges shall be dismissed pursuant to Section 1385.(ic) Refer the defendant to the county conservatorship investigator in the county of commitment for possible conservatorship proceedings for the defendant pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. A defendant shall only be referred to the conservatorship investigator if it appears to the court or a qualified mental health expert that the defendant appears to be gravely disabled, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Any hearings required in the conservatorship proceedings shall be held in the superior court in the county of commitment. The court shall transmit a copy of the order directing initiation of conservatorship proceedings to the county mental health director or the director’s designee and shall notify the county mental health director or their designee of the outcome of the proceedings. Before establishing a conservatorship, the public guardian shall investigate all available alternatives to conservatorship pursuant to Section 5354 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. If a petition is not filed within 30 days of the referral, the court shall order the defendant, if confined in county jail, to be released on their own recognizance pending conservatorship proceedings. The charges shall be dismissed pursuant to Section 1385 upon the filing of either a temporary or permanent conservatorship petition unless the basis for the petition is that the defendant is gravely disabled as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(id) Refer the defendant to the CARE program pursuant to Section 5978 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. A hearing to determine eligibility for the CARE program shall be held within 14 court days after the date on which the petition for the referral is filed. If the hearing is delayed beyond 14 court days, the court shall order the defendant, if confined in county jail, to be released on their own recognizance pending that hearing. If the defendant is accepted into the CARE program, the charges shall be dismissed pursuant to Section 1385.(ie) Reinstate competency proceedings, in which case the court shall credit any time spent in mental health diversion against the maximum term of commitment as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).(C) If the defendant is found mentally incompetent and restoring the defendant to competence is in the interests of justice or they are charged with an offense listed in subdivision (d) of Section 1001.36, the trial, the hearing on the alleged violation, or the judgment shall be suspended until the person becomes mentally competent.(i) The court shall order that the mentally incompetent defendant be delivered by the sheriff to a State Department of State Hospitals facility, as defined in Section 4100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as directed by the State Department of State Hospitals, or to any other available public or private treatment facility, including a community-based residential treatment system approved by the community program director, or their designee, that will promote the defendant’s speedy restoration to mental competence, or placed on outpatient status as specified in Section 1600.(ii) (I) If a defendant has been found mentally incompetent, and the court has ordered commitment to a State Department of State Hospitals facility as described in Section 4100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and is not in the custody of the local sheriff, the department shall inform the sheriff when a placement in a facility becomes available and make reasonable efforts to coordinate a delivery by the sheriff to transport the defendant to the facility. If the department has made reasonable attempts for 90 days, starting with the date of commitment, and the defendant has not been transported, as originally ordered under clause (i), the department shall inform the court and sheriff in writing.(II) If the sheriff has not delivered the defendant to a State Department of State Hospitals facility within 90 days after the department’s written notice, the commitment to the State Department of State Hospitals shall be automatically stayed and the department may remove the defendant from the pending placement list until the court notifies the department in writing that the defendant is available for transport and the defendant shall regain their place on the pending placement list.(iii) However, if the action against the defendant who has been found mentally incompetent is on a complaint charging a felony offense specified in Section 290, the prosecutor shall determine whether the defendant previously has been found mentally incompetent to stand trial pursuant to this chapter on a charge of a Section 290 offense, or whether the defendant is currently the subject of a pending Section 1368 proceeding arising out of a charge of a Section 290 offense. If either determination is made, the prosecutor shall notify the court and defendant in writing. After this notification, and opportunity for hearing, the court shall order that the defendant be delivered by the sheriff to a State Department of State Hospitals facility, as directed by the State Department of State Hospitals, or other secure treatment facility for the care and treatment of persons with a mental health disorder, unless the court makes specific findings on the record that an alternative placement would provide more appropriate treatment for the defendant and would not pose a danger to the health and safety of others.(iv) If the action against the defendant who has been found mentally incompetent is on a complaint charging a felony offense specified in Section 290 and the defendant has been denied bail pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12 of Article I of the California Constitution because the court has found, based upon clear and convincing evidence, a substantial likelihood that the person’s release would result in great bodily harm to others, the court shall order that the defendant be delivered by the sheriff to a State Department of State Hospitals facility, as directed by the State Department of State Hospitals, unless the court makes specific findings on the record that an alternative placement would provide more appropriate treatment for the defendant and would not pose a danger to the health and safety of others.(v) (I) If, at any time after the court finds that the defendant is mentally incompetent and before the defendant is transported to a facility pursuant to this section, the court is provided with any information that the defendant may benefit from diversion pursuant to Chapter 2.8A (commencing with Section 1001.35) of Title 6, the court may make a finding that the defendant is an appropriate candidate for diversion.(II) Notwithstanding subclause (I), if a defendant is found mentally incompetent and is transferred to a facility described in Section 4361.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the court may, at any time upon receiving any information that the defendant may benefit from diversion pursuant to Chapter 2.8A (commencing with Section 1001.35) of Title 6, make a finding that the defendant is an appropriate candidate for diversion.(vi) If a defendant is found by the court to be an appropriate candidate for diversion pursuant to clause (v), the defendant’s eligibility shall be determined pursuant to Section 1001.36. A defendant granted diversion may participate for the lesser of the period specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) or the applicable period described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 1001.36. If, during that period, the court determines that criminal proceedings should be reinstated pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1001.36, the court shall, pursuant to Section 1369, appoint a psychiatrist, licensed psychologist, or any other expert the court may deem appropriate, to determine the defendant’s competence to stand trial.(vii) Upon the dismissal of charges at the conclusion of the period of diversion, pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1001.36, a defendant shall no longer be deemed incompetent to stand trial pursuant to this section.(viii) The clerk of the court shall notify the Department of Justice, in writing, of a finding of mental incompetence with respect to a defendant who is subject to clause (iii) or (iv) for inclusion in the defendant’s state summary criminal history information.(D) If at any time after the finding of mental incompetence, but before the defendant begins treatment in a program or facility to promote the defendant’s speedy restoration of mental competence pursuant to this section, there is a change in circumstance that affects the likelihood that the defendant will be able to be attain competence, either party may instead petition the court to proceed in accordance with subdivision (b).(E) Upon the filing of a certificate of restoration to competence, the court shall order that the defendant be returned to court in accordance with Section 1372. The court shall transmit a copy of its order to the community program director or a designee.(F) A defendant charged with a violent felony may not be delivered to a State Department of State Hospitals facility or treatment facility pursuant to this subdivision unless the State Department of State Hospitals facility or treatment facility has a secured perimeter or a locked and controlled treatment facility, and the judge determines that the public safety will be protected.(G) For purposes of this paragraph, “violent felony” means an offense specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.(H) A defendant charged with a violent felony may be placed on outpatient status, as specified in Section 1600, only if the court finds that the placement will not pose a danger to the health or safety of others. If the court places a defendant charged with a violent felony on outpatient status, as specified in Section 1600, the court shall serve copies of the placement order on defense counsel, the sheriff in the county where the defendant will be placed, and the district attorney for the county in which the violent felony charges are pending against the defendant.(I) If, at any time after the court has declared a defendant incompetent to stand trial pursuant to this section, counsel for the defendant or a jail medical or mental health staff provider provides the court with substantial evidence that the defendant’s psychiatric symptoms have changed to such a degree as to create a doubt in the mind of the judge as to the defendant’s current mental incompetence, the court may appoint a psychiatrist or a licensed psychologist to opine as to whether the defendant has attained competence. If, in the opinion of that expert, the defendant has attained competence, the court shall proceed as if a certificate of restoration of competence has been returned pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1372.(J) (i) The State Department of State Hospitals may, pursuant to Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, conduct an evaluation of the defendant in county custody to determine any of the following:(I) The defendant has attained competence.(II) There is no substantial likelihood that the defendant will attain competence in the foreseeable future.(III) The defendant should be referred to the county for further evaluation for potential participation in a county diversion program, if one exists, or to another outpatient treatment program.(ii) If, in the opinion of the department’s expert, the defendant has attained competence, the court shall proceed as if a certificate of restoration of competence has been returned pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1372.(iii) If, in the opinion of the department’s expert, there is no substantial likelihood that the defendant will attain mental competence in the foreseeable future, the committing court shall proceed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) no later than 10 days following receipt of the report.(2) Prior to making the order directing that the defendant be committed to the State Department of State Hospitals or other treatment facility or placed on outpatient status, the court shall proceed as follows:(A) (i) The court shall order the community program director or a designee to evaluate the defendant and to submit to the court within 15 judicial days of the order a written recommendation as to whether the defendant should be required to undergo outpatient treatment, or be committed to the State Department of State Hospitals or to any other treatment facility. A person shall not be admitted to a State Department of State Hospitals facility or other treatment facility or placed on outpatient status under this section without having been evaluated by the community program director or a designee. The community program director or designee shall evaluate the appropriate placement for the defendant between a State Department of State Hospitals facility or the community-based residential treatment system based upon guidelines provided by the State Department of State Hospitals.(ii) A defendant shall first be considered for placement in an outpatient treatment program, a community treatment program, or a diversion program, if any such program is available, unless a court, based upon the recommendation of the community program director or their designee, finds that either the clinical needs of the defendant or the risk to community safety, warrant placement in a State Department of State Hospitals facility.(B) The court shall hear and determine whether the defendant lacks the capacity to make decisions regarding the administration of antipsychotic medication. The court shall consider opinions in the reports prepared pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, as applicable to the issue of whether the defendant lacks the capacity to make decisions regarding the administration of antipsychotic medication, and shall proceed as follows:(i) The court shall hear and determine whether any of the following is true:(I) Based upon the opinion of the psychiatrist or licensed psychologist offered to the court pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, the defendant lacks the capacity to make decisions regarding antipsychotic medication, the defendant’s mental disorder requires medical treatment with antipsychotic medication, and, if the defendant’s mental disorder is not treated with antipsychotic medication, it is probable that serious harm to the physical or mental health of the defendant will result. Probability of serious harm to the physical or mental health of the defendant requires evidence that the defendant is presently suffering adverse effects to their physical or mental health, or the defendant has previously suffered these effects as a result of a mental disorder and their condition is substantially deteriorating. The fact that a defendant has a diagnosis of a mental disorder does not alone establish probability of serious harm to the physical or mental health of the defendant.(II) Based upon the opinion of the psychiatrist or licensed psychologist offered to the court pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, the defendant is a danger to others, in that the defendant has inflicted, attempted to inflict, or made a serious threat of inflicting substantial physical harm on another while in custody, or the defendant had inflicted, attempted to inflict, or made a serious threat of inflicting substantial physical harm on another that resulted in the defendant being taken into custody, and the defendant presents, as a result of mental disorder or mental defect, a demonstrated danger of inflicting substantial physical harm on others. Demonstrated danger may be based on an assessment of the defendant’s present mental condition, including a consideration of past behavior of the defendant within six years prior to the time the defendant last attempted to inflict, inflicted, or threatened to inflict substantial physical harm on another, and other relevant evidence.(III) The people have charged the defendant with a serious crime against the person or property, and based upon the opinion of the psychiatrist offered to the court pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication is substantially likely to render the defendant competent to stand trial, the medication is unlikely to have side effects that interfere with the defendant’s ability to understand the nature of the criminal proceedings or to assist counsel in the conduct of a defense in a reasonable manner, less intrusive treatments are unlikely to have substantially the same results, and antipsychotic medication is medically necessary and appropriate in light of their medical condition.(ii) (I) If the court finds the conditions described in subclause (I) or (II) of clause (i) to be true, and if pursuant to the opinion offered to the court pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, a psychiatrist has opined that treatment with antipsychotic medications is appropriate for the defendant, the court shall issue an order authorizing the administration of antipsychotic medication as needed, including on an involuntary basis, to be administered under the direction and supervision of a licensed psychiatrist.(II) If the court finds the conditions described in subclause (I) or (II) of clause (i) to be true, and if pursuant to the opinion offered to the court pursuant subdivision (b) of Section 1369, a licensed psychologist has opined that treatment with antipsychotic medication may be appropriate for the defendant, the court shall issue an order authorizing treatment by a licensed psychiatrist on an involuntary basis. That treatment may include the administration of antipsychotic medication as needed, to be administered under the direction and supervision of a licensed psychiatrist.(III) If the court finds the conditions described in subclause (III) of clause (i) to be true, and if pursuant to the opinion offered to the court pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, a psychiatrist has opined that it is appropriate to treat the defendant with antipsychotic medication, the court shall issue an order authorizing the administration of antipsychotic medication as needed, including on an involuntary basis, to be administered under the direction and supervision of a licensed psychiatrist.(iii) An order authorizing involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication to the defendant when and as prescribed by the defendant’s treating psychiatrist at any facility housing the defendant for purposes of this chapter, including a county jail, shall remain in effect when the defendant returns to county custody pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), or pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1372, but shall be valid for no more than one year, pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (7). The court shall not order involuntary administration of psychotropic medication under subclause (III) of clause (i) unless the court has first found that the defendant does not meet the criteria for involuntary administration of psychotropic medication under subclause (I) of clause (i) and does not meet the criteria under subclause (II) of clause (i).(iv) In all cases, the treating hospital, county jail, facility, or program may administer medically appropriate antipsychotic medication prescribed by a psychiatrist in an emergency as described in subdivision (m) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(v) If the court has determined that the defendant has the capacity to make decisions regarding antipsychotic medication, and if the defendant, with advice of their counsel, consents, the court order of commitment shall include confirmation that antipsychotic medication may be given to the defendant as prescribed by a treating psychiatrist pursuant to the defendant’s consent. The commitment order shall also indicate that, if the defendant withdraws consent for antipsychotic medication, after the treating psychiatrist complies with the provisions of subparagraph (C), the defendant shall be returned to court for a hearing in accordance with subparagraphs (C) and (D) regarding whether antipsychotic medication shall be administered involuntarily.(vi) If the court has determined that the defendant has the capacity to make decisions regarding antipsychotic medication and if the defendant, with advice from their counsel, does not consent, the court order for commitment shall indicate that, after the treating psychiatrist complies with the provisions of subparagraph (C), the defendant shall be returned to court for a hearing in accordance with subparagraphs (C) and (D) regarding whether antipsychotic medication shall be administered involuntarily.(vii) A report made pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall include a description of antipsychotic medication administered to the defendant and its effects and side effects, including effects on the defendant’s appearance or behavior that would affect the defendant’s ability to understand the nature of the criminal proceedings or to assist counsel in the conduct of a defense in a reasonable manner. During the time the defendant is confined in a State Department of State Hospitals facility or other treatment facility or placed on outpatient status, either the defendant or the people may request that the court review any order made pursuant to this subdivision. The defendant, to the same extent enjoyed by other patients in the State Department of State Hospitals facility or other treatment facility, shall have the right to contact the patients’ rights advocate regarding the defendant’s rights under this section.(C) If the defendant consented to antipsychotic medication as described in clause (iv) of subparagraph (B), but subsequently withdraws their consent, or, if involuntary antipsychotic medication was not ordered pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (B), and the treating psychiatrist determines that antipsychotic medication has become medically necessary and appropriate, the treating psychiatrist shall make efforts to obtain informed consent from the defendant for antipsychotic medication. If informed consent is not obtained from the defendant, and the treating psychiatrist is of the opinion that the defendant lacks the capacity to make decisions regarding antipsychotic medication based on the conditions described in subclause (I) or (II) of clause (i) of subparagraph (B), the treating psychiatrist shall certify whether the lack of capacity and any applicable conditions described above exist. That certification shall contain an assessment of the current mental status of the defendant and the opinion of the treating psychiatrist that involuntary antipsychotic medication has become medically necessary and appropriate.(D) (i) If the treating psychiatrist certifies that antipsychotic medication has become medically necessary and appropriate pursuant to subparagraph (C), antipsychotic medication may be administered to the defendant for not more than 21 days, provided, however, that, within 72 hours of the certification, the defendant is provided a medication review hearing before an administrative law judge to be conducted at the facility where the defendant is receiving treatment. The treating psychiatrist shall present the case for the certification for involuntary treatment and the defendant shall be represented by an attorney or a patients’ rights advocate. The attorney or patients’ rights advocate shall be appointed to meet with the defendant no later than one day prior to the medication review hearing to review the defendant’s rights at the medication review hearing, discuss the process, answer questions or concerns regarding involuntary medication or the hearing, assist the defendant in preparing for the hearing and advocating for the defendant’s interests at the hearing, review the panel’s final determination following the hearing, advise the defendant of their right to judicial review of the panel’s decision, and provide the defendant with referral information for legal advice on the subject. The defendant shall also have the following rights with respect to the medication review hearing:(I) To be given timely access to the defendant’s records.(II) To be present at the hearing, unless the defendant waives that right.(III) To present evidence at the hearing.(IV) To question persons presenting evidence supporting involuntary medication.(V) To make reasonable requests for attendance of witnesses on the defendant’s behalf.(VI) To a hearing conducted in an impartial and informal manner.(ii) If the administrative law judge determines that the defendant either meets the criteria specified in subclause (I) of clause (i) of subparagraph (B), or meets the criteria specified in subclause (II) of clause (i) of subparagraph (B), antipsychotic medication may continue to be administered to the defendant for the 21-day certification period. Concurrently with the treating psychiatrist’s certification, the treating psychiatrist shall file a copy of the certification and a petition with the court for issuance of an order to administer antipsychotic medication beyond the 21-day certification period. For purposes of this subparagraph, the treating psychiatrist shall not be required to pay or deposit any fee for the filing of the petition or other document or paper related to the petition.(iii) If the administrative law judge disagrees with the certification, medication may not be administered involuntarily until the court determines that antipsychotic medication should be administered pursuant to this section.(iv) The court shall provide notice to the prosecuting attorney and to the attorney representing the defendant, and shall hold a hearing, no later than 18 days from the date of the certification, to determine whether antipsychotic medication should be ordered beyond the certification period.(v) If, as a result of the hearing, the court determines that antipsychotic medication should be administered beyond the certification period, the court shall issue an order authorizing the administration of that medication.(vi) The court shall render its decision on the petition and issue its order no later than three calendar days after the hearing and, in any event, no later than the expiration of the 21-day certification period.(vii) If the administrative law judge upholds the certification pursuant to clause (ii), the court may, for a period not to exceed 14 days, extend the certification and continue the hearing pursuant to stipulation between the parties or upon a finding of good cause. In determining good cause, the court may review the petition filed with the court, the administrative law judge’s order, and any additional testimony needed by the court to determine if it is appropriate to continue medication beyond the 21-day certification and for a period of up to 14 days.(viii) The district attorney, county counsel, or representative of a facility where a defendant found incompetent to stand trial is committed may petition the court for an order to administer involuntary medication pursuant to the criteria set forth in subclauses (II) and (III) of clause (i) of subparagraph (B). The order is reviewable as provided in paragraph (7).(3) (A) When the court orders that the defendant be committed to a State Department of State Hospitals facility or other public or private treatment facility, the court shall provide copies of the following documents prior to the admission of the defendant to the State Department of State Hospitals or other treatment facility where the defendant is to be committed:(i) The commitment order, which shall include a specification of the charges, an assessment of whether involuntary treatment with antipsychotic medications is warranted, and any orders by the court, pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2), authorizing involuntary treatment with antipsychotic medications.(ii) A computation or statement setting forth the maximum term of commitment in accordance with subdivision (c).(iii) (I) A computation or statement setting forth the amount of credit for time served, if any, to be deducted from the maximum term of commitment.(II) If a certificate of restoration of competency was filed with the court pursuant to Section 1372 and the court subsequently rejected the certification, a copy of the court order or minute order rejecting the certification shall be provided. The court order shall include a new computation or statement setting forth the amount of credit for time served, if any, to be deducted from the defendant’s maximum term of commitment based on the court’s rejection of the certification.(iv) State summary criminal history information.(v) Jail classification records for the defendant’s current incarceration.(vi) Arrest reports prepared by the police department or other law enforcement agency.(vii) Court-ordered psychiatric examination or evaluation reports.(viii) The community program director’s placement recommendation report.(ix) Records of a finding of mental incompetence pursuant to this chapter arising out of a complaint charging a felony offense specified in Section 290 or a pending Section 1368 proceeding arising out of a charge of a Section 290 offense.(x) Medical records, including jail mental health records.(B) If a defendant is committed to a State Department of State Hospitals facility, and the department determines that additional medical or mental health treatment records are needed for continuity of care, any private or public entity holding medical or mental health treatment records of that defendant shall release those records upon receiving a written request from the State Department of State Hospitals within 10 calendar days after the request. The private or public entity holding the medical or mental health treatment records shall comply with all applicable federal and state privacy laws prior to disclosure. The State Department of State Hospitals shall not release records obtained during the admission process under this subdivision, pursuant to Section 1798.68 of the Civil Code, or subdivision (b) of Section 5328 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(4) When the defendant is committed to a treatment facility pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) or the court makes the findings specified in clause (iii) or (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) to assign the defendant to a treatment facility other than a State Department of State Hospitals facility or other secure treatment facility, the court shall order that notice be given to the appropriate law enforcement agency or agencies having local jurisdiction at the placement facility of a finding of mental incompetence pursuant to this chapter arising out of a charge of a Section 290 offense.(5) When directing that the defendant be confined in a State Department of State Hospitals facility pursuant to this subdivision, the court shall commit the defendant to the State Department of State Hospitals.(6) (A) If the defendant is committed or transferred to the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to this section, the court may, upon receiving the written recommendation of the medical director of the State Department of State Hospitals facility and the community program director that the defendant be transferred to a public or private treatment facility approved by the community program director, order the defendant transferred to that facility. If the defendant is committed or transferred to a public or private treatment facility approved by the community program director, the court may, upon receiving the written recommendation of the community program director, transfer the defendant to the State Department of State Hospitals or to another public or private treatment facility approved by the community program director. In the event of dismissal of the criminal charges before the defendant recovers competence, the person shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code). If either the defendant or the prosecutor chooses to contest either kind of order of transfer, a petition may be filed in the court for a hearing, which shall be held if the court determines that sufficient grounds exist. At the hearing, the prosecuting attorney or the defendant may present evidence bearing on the order of transfer. The court shall use the same standards as are used in conducting probation revocation hearings pursuant to Section 1203.2.Prior to making an order for transfer under this section, the court shall notify the defendant, the attorney of record for the defendant, the prosecuting attorney, and the community program director or a designee.(B) If the defendant is initially committed to a State Department of State Hospitals facility or secure treatment facility pursuant to clause (iii) or (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) and is subsequently transferred to any other facility, copies of the documents specified in paragraph (3) shall be electronically transferred or taken with the defendant to each subsequent facility to which the defendant is transferred. The transferring facility shall also notify the appropriate law enforcement agency or agencies having local jurisdiction at the site of the new facility that the defendant is a person subject to clause (iii) or (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).(7) (A) An order by the court authorizing involuntary medication of the defendant shall be valid for no more than one year. The court shall review the order at the time of the review of the initial report and the six-month progress reports pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) to determine if the grounds for the authorization remain. In the review, the court shall consider the reports of the treating psychiatrist or psychiatrists and the defendant’s patients’ rights advocate or attorney. The court may require testimony from the treating psychiatrist and the patients’ rights advocate or attorney, if necessary. The court may continue the order authorizing involuntary medication for up to another six months, or vacate the order, or make any other appropriate order.(B) Within 60 days before the expiration of the one-year involuntary medication order, the district attorney, county counsel, or representative of any facility where a defendant found incompetent to stand trial is committed may petition the committing court for a renewal, subject to the same conditions and requirements as in subparagraph (A). The petition shall include the basis for involuntary medication set forth in clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2). Notice of the petition shall be provided to the defendant, the defendant’s attorney, and the district attorney. The court shall hear and determine whether the defendant continues to meet the criteria set forth in clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2). The hearing on a petition to renew an order for involuntary medication shall be conducted prior to the expiration of the current order.(8) For purposes of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) and paragraph (7), if the treating psychiatrist determines that there is a need, based on preserving their rapport with the defendant or preventing harm, the treating psychiatrist may request that the facility medical director designate another psychiatrist to act in the place of the treating psychiatrist. If the medical director of the facility designates another psychiatrist to act pursuant to this paragraph, the treating psychiatrist shall brief the acting psychiatrist of the relevant facts of the case and the acting psychiatrist shall examine the defendant prior to the hearing.(b) (1) Within 90 days after a commitment made pursuant to subdivision (a), the medical director of the State Department of State Hospitals facility or other treatment facility to which the defendant is confined shall make a written report to the court and the community program director for the county or region of commitment, or a designee, concerning the defendant’s progress toward recovery of mental competence and whether the administration of antipsychotic medication remains necessary.If the defendant is in county custody, the county jail shall provide access to the defendant for purposes of the State Department of State Hospitals conducting an evaluation of the defendant pursuant to Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Based upon this evaluation, the State Department of State Hospitals may make a written report to the court within 90 days of a commitment made pursuant to subdivision (a) concerning the defendant’s progress toward recovery of mental competence and whether the administration of antipsychotic medication is necessary. If the defendant remains in county custody after the initial 90-day report, the State Department of State Hospitals may conduct an evaluation of the defendant pursuant to Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and make a written report to the court concerning the defendant’s progress toward recovery of mental competence and whether the administration of antipsychotic medication is necessary.If the defendant is on outpatient status, the outpatient treatment staff shall make a written report to the community program director concerning the defendant’s progress toward recovery of mental competence. Within 90 days of placement on outpatient status, the community program director shall report to the court on this matter. If the defendant has not recovered mental competence, but the report discloses a substantial likelihood that the defendant will attain mental competence in the foreseeable future, the defendant shall remain in the State Department of State Hospitals facility or other treatment facility or on outpatient status. Thereafter, at six-month intervals or until the defendant becomes mentally competent, if the defendant is confined in a treatment facility, the medical director of the State Department of State Hospitals facility or person in charge of the facility shall report, in writing, to the court and the community program director or a designee regarding the defendant’s progress toward recovery of mental competence and whether the administration of antipsychotic medication remains necessary. If the defendant is on outpatient status, after the initial 90-day report, the outpatient treatment staff shall report to the community program director on the defendant’s progress toward recovery, and the community program director shall report to the court on this matter at six-month intervals. A copy of these reports shall be provided to the prosecutor and defense counsel by the court.(A) If the report indicates that there is no substantial likelihood that the defendant will attain mental competence in the foreseeable future, custody of the defendant shall be transferred without delay to the committing county and shall remain with the county until further order of the court. The defendant shall be returned to the court for proceedings pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) no later than 10 days following receipt of the report. The court shall not order the defendant returned to the custody of the State Department of State Hospitals under the same commitment. The court shall transmit a copy of its order to the community program director or a designee.(B) If the report indicates that there is no substantial likelihood that the defendant will attain mental competence in the foreseeable future, the medical director of the State Department of State Hospitals facility or other treatment facility to which the defendant is confined shall do both of the following:(i) Promptly notify and provide a copy of the report to the defense counsel and the district attorney.(ii) Provide a separate notification, in compliance with applicable privacy laws, to the committing county’s sheriff that immediate transportation will be needed for the defendant pursuant to subparagraph (A).(C) If a county does not take custody of a defendant committed to the State Department of State Hospitals within 10 calendar days following notification made pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (B), the county shall be charged the daily rate for a state hospital bed, as established by the State Department of State Hospitals.(2) The reports made pursuant to paragraph (1) concerning the defendant’s progress toward attaining competency shall also consider the issue of involuntary medication. Each report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) Whether or not the defendant has the capacity to make decisions concerning antipsychotic medication.(B) If the defendant lacks the capacity to make decisions concerning antipsychotic medication, whether the defendant risks serious harm to their physical or mental health if not treated with antipsychotic medication.(C) Whether or not the defendant presents a danger to others if the defendant is not treated with antipsychotic medication.(D) Whether the defendant has a mental disorder for which medications are the only effective treatment.(E) Whether there are any side effects from the medication currently being experienced by the defendant that would interfere with the defendant’s ability to collaborate with counsel.(F) Whether there are any effective alternatives to medication.(G) How quickly the medication is likely to bring the defendant to competency.(H) Whether the treatment plan includes methods other than medication to restore the defendant to competency.(I) A statement, if applicable, that no medication is likely to restore the defendant to competency.(3) After reviewing the reports, the court shall determine if grounds for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication exist, whether or not an order was issued at the time of commitment, and shall do one of the following:(A) If the original grounds for involuntary medication still exist, any order authorizing the treating facility to involuntarily administer antipsychotic medication to the defendant shall remain in effect.(B) If the original grounds for involuntary medication no longer exist, and there is no other basis for involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication, any order for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication shall be vacated.(C) If the original grounds for involuntary medication no longer exist, and the report states that there is another basis for involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication, the court shall determine whether to vacate the order or issue a new order for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication. The court shall consider the opinions in reports submitted pursuant to paragraph (1), including any opinions rendered pursuant to Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The court may, upon a showing of good cause, set a hearing within 21 days to determine whether the order for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication shall be vacated or whether a new order for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication shall be issued. The hearing shall proceed as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). The court shall require witness testimony to occur remotely, including clinical testimony pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. In-person witness testimony shall only be allowed upon a court’s finding of good cause.(D) If the report states a basis for involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication and the court did not issue such order at the time of commitment, the court shall determine whether to issue an order for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication. The court shall consider the opinions in reports submitted pursuant to paragraph (1), including any opinions rendered pursuant to Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The court may, upon a finding of good cause, set a hearing within 21 days to determine whether an order for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication shall be issued. The hearing shall proceed as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). The court shall require witness testimony to occur remotely, including clinical testimony pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. In-person witness testimony shall only be allowed upon a court’s finding of good cause.(E) This paragraph also applies to recommendations submitted pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1372, when a recommendation is included as to whether an order for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medications should be extended or issued.(4) If it is determined by the court that treatment for the defendant’s mental impairment is not being conducted, the defendant shall be returned to the committing court, and, if the defendant is not in county custody, returned to the custody of the county. The court shall transmit a copy of its order to the community program director or a designee.(5) At each review by the court specified in this subdivision, the court shall determine if the security level of housing and treatment is appropriate and may make an order in accordance with its determination. If the court determines that the defendant shall continue to be treated in the State Department of State Hospitals facility or on an outpatient basis, the court shall determine issues concerning administration of antipsychotic medication, as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).(c) (1) At the end of two years from the date of commitment or a period of commitment equal to the maximum term of imprisonment provided by law for the most serious offense charged in the information, indictment, or complaint, or the maximum term of imprisonment provided by law for a violation of probation or mandatory supervision, whichever is shorter, but no later than 90 days prior to the expiration of the defendant’s term of commitment, a defendant who has not recovered mental competence shall be returned to the committing court, and custody of the defendant shall be transferred without delay to the committing county and shall remain with the county until further order of the court. The court shall not order the defendant returned to the custody of the State Department of State Hospitals under the same commitment. The court shall notify the community program director or a designee of the return and of any resulting court orders. The maximum term of commitment applies to the aggregate of all previous commitments.(2) (A) The medical director of the State Department of State Hospitals facility or other treatment facility to which the defendant is confined shall provide notification, in compliance with applicable privacy laws, to the committing county’s sheriff that immediate transportation will be needed for the defendant pursuant to paragraph (1).(B) If a county does not take custody of a defendant committed to the State Department of State Hospitals within 10 calendar days following notification pursuant to subparagraph (A), the county shall be charged the daily rate for a state hospital bed, as established by the State Department of State Hospitals.(3) Whenever a defendant is returned to the court pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subdivision, subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), or paragraph (1) or (4) of subdivision (b), and it appears to the court that the defendant is gravely disabled, as defined in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the court shall order the conservatorship investigator of the county of commitment of the defendant to initiate conservatorship proceedings for the defendant pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Hearings required in the conservatorship proceedings shall be held in the superior court in the county that ordered the commitment. The court shall transmit a copy of the order directing initiation of conservatorship proceedings to the community program director or a designee, the sheriff and the district attorney of the county in which criminal charges are pending, and the defendant’s counsel of record. The court shall notify the community program director or a designee, the sheriff and district attorney of the county in which criminal charges are pending, and the defendant’s counsel of record of the outcome of the conservatorship proceedings.(4) If a defendant is returned to court pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subdivision, subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), or paragraph (1) or (4) of subdivision (b), and the prosecution elects to dismiss and refile charges pursuant to Section 1387, the court shall presume that the defendant is incompetent unless the court is presented with relevant and credible evidence that the defendant is competent. This evidence may include medical records, witness statements, or reports by qualified medical experts. If the court is satisfied that it has received substantial evidence that the defendant is competent, the court shall proceed as provided in Section 1369. Otherwise, the court shall find that the defendant is not mentally competent to stand trial and shall proceed as provided in paragraphs (1) and (3). The court shall not order the defendant returned to the custody of the State Department of State Hospitals for the purpose of restoration of competency.(5) If a change in placement is proposed for a defendant who is committed pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the court shall provide notice and an opportunity to be heard with respect to the proposed placement of the defendant to the sheriff and the district attorney of the county in which the criminal charges or revocation proceedings are pending.(6) If the defendant is confined in a treatment facility, a copy of any report to the committing court regarding the defendant’s progress toward recovery of mental competence shall be provided by the committing court to the prosecutor and to the defense counsel.(d) With the exception of proceedings alleging a violation of mandatory supervision, or in those instances where the defendant has been placed under a conservatorship pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the criminal action remains subject to dismissal pursuant to Section 1385. If the criminal action is dismissed, the court shall transmit a copy of the order of dismissal to the community program director or a designee. In a proceeding alleging a violation of mandatory supervision, if the person is not placed under a conservatorship as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), or if a conservatorship is terminated, the court shall reinstate mandatory supervision and may modify the terms and conditions of supervision to include appropriate mental health treatment or refer the matter to a local mental health court, reentry court, or other collaborative justice court available for improving the mental health of the defendant.(e) If the criminal action against the defendant is dismissed, the defendant shall be released from commitment ordered under this section, but without prejudice to the initiation of proceedings that may be appropriate under the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).(f) As used in this chapter, “community program director” means the person, agency, or entity designated by the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to Section 1605 of this code and Section 4360 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(g) For the purpose of this section, “secure treatment facility” does not include, except for State Department of State Hospitals facilities, state developmental centers, and correctional treatment facilities, any facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of, or Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 1569) of, Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, or any community board and care facility.(h) This section does not preclude a defendant from filing a petition for habeas corpus to challenge the continuing validity of an order authorizing a treatment facility or outpatient program to involuntarily administer antipsychotic medication to a person being treated as incompetent to stand trial.SEC. 27. Section 1370.01 of the Penal Code is amended to read:1370.01. (a) If the defendant is found mentally competent, the criminal process shall resume, and the trial on the offense charged or hearing on the alleged violation shall proceed.(b) (1) (A) If the defendant is found mentally incompetent, the trial, judgment, or hearing on the alleged violation shall be suspended and the court shall conduct a hearing, pursuant to Chapter 2.8A (commencing with Section 1001.35) of Title 6, and, if the court deems the defendant eligible, grant diversion pursuant to Section 1001.36 for a period not to exceed one year from the date the individual is accepted into diversion or the maximum term of imprisonment provided by law for the most serious offense charged in the misdemeanor complaint, whichever is shorter.(B) Notwithstanding any other law, including Section 23640 of the Vehicle Code, a misdemeanor offense for which a defendant may be placed in a mental health diversion program in accordance with this section includes a misdemeanor violation of Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code. However, this section does not limit the authority of the Department of Motor Vehicles to take administrative action concerning the driving privileges of a person arrested for a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code.(2) The hearing shall be held no later than 30 days after the finding of incompetence. If the hearing is delayed beyond 30 days, the court shall order the defendant to be released on their own recognizance pending the hearing.(3) If the defendant performs satisfactorily on diversion pursuant to this section, at the end of the period of diversion, the court shall dismiss the criminal charges that were the subject of the criminal proceedings at the time of the initial diversion.(4) If the court finds the defendant ineligible or unsuitable for diversion pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 1001.36 or if any of the conditions described in subdivision (g) of Section 1001.36 are present, the court shall, after notice to the defendant, defense counsel, and the prosecution, hold a hearing to determine which one of the following actions the court will take:(A) Order modification of an existing mental health diversion treatment plan in accordance with a recommendation from the treatment provider.(B) Refer the defendant to assisted outpatient treatment pursuant to Section 5346 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. A referral to assisted outpatient treatment may only occur in a county where services are available pursuant to Section 5348 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the agency agrees to accept responsibility for treatment of the defendant. A hearing to determine eligibility for assisted outpatient treatment shall be held within 45 days after the finding of incompetency. If the hearing is delayed beyond 45 days, the court shall order the defendant, if confined in county jail, to be released on their own recognizance pending that hearing. If the defendant is accepted into assisted outpatient treatment, the charges shall be dismissed pursuant to Section 1385 six months after the date of the referral to assisted outpatient treatment, unless the defendant’s case has been referred back to the court prior to the expiration of that time period. This section does not alter the confidential nature of assisted outpatient treatment.(C) Refer the defendant to the county conservatorship investigator in the county of commitment for possible conservatorship proceedings for the defendant pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. A defendant shall only be referred to the conservatorship investigator if, based on the opinion of a qualified mental health expert, the defendant appears to be gravely disabled, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Any hearings required in the conservatorship proceedings shall be held in the superior court in the county of commitment. The court shall transmit a copy of the order directing initiation of conservatorship proceedings to the county mental health director or the director’s designee and shall notify the county mental health director or their designee of the outcome of the proceedings. Before establishing a conservatorship, the public guardian shall investigate all available alternatives to conservatorship pursuant to Section 5354 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. If a petition is not filed within 30 days of the referral, the court shall order the defendant, if confined in county jail, to be released on their own recognizance pending conservatorship proceedings. If the outcome of the conservatorship proceedings results in the filing of a petition for the establishment of a temporary or permanent conservatorship, the charges shall be dismissed pursuant to Section 1385 90 days after the date of the filing of the petition, unless the defendant’s case has been referred back to the court prior to the expiration of that time period. This section does not alter the confidential nature of conservatorship proceedings.(D) Refer the defendant to the CARE program pursuant to Section 5978 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. A hearing to determine eligibility for CARE shall be held within 14 court days after the date on which the petition for the referral is filed. If the hearing is delayed beyond 14 court days, the court shall order the defendant, if confined in county jail, to be released on their own recognizance pending that hearing. If the defendant is accepted into CARE, the charges shall be dismissed pursuant to Section 1385 six months after the date of the referral to CARE, unless the defendant’s case has been referred back to the court prior to the expiration of that time period. This section does not alter the confidential nature of CARE program proceedings.(E) If the defendant does not qualify for services pursuant to subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, dismiss the charges.(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that a defendant subject to the terms of this section receive mental health treatment in a treatment facility and not a jail. A term of four days will be deemed to have been served for every two days spent in actual custody against the maximum period of treatment pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), if applicable. A defendant not in actual custody shall otherwise receive day for day credit against the term of treatment from the date the defendant is accepted into treatment in the event that the criminal charges have not previously been dismissed. “Actual custody” has the same meaning as in Section 4019.(d) This section shall apply only as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 1367.(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the court shall consider all treatment options as provided in this section prior to dismissing criminal charges. However, nothing in this section limits a court’s discretion pursuant to Section 1385.SEC. 28. Section 1463.007 of the Penal Code is amended to read:1463.007. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a county or court that operates a comprehensive collection program may deduct the costs of operating that program, excluding capital expenditures, from any revenues collected under that program. The costs shall be deducted before any distribution of revenues to other governmental entities required by any other law. A county or court operating a comprehensive collection program may establish a minimum base fee, fine, forfeiture, penalty, or assessment amount for inclusion in the program.(b) Once debt becomes delinquent, it continues to be delinquent and may be subject to collection by a comprehensive collection program. Debt is delinquent and subject to collection by a comprehensive collection program if any of the following conditions is met:(1) A defendant does not post bail or appear on or before the date on which the defendant promised to appear, or any lawful continuance of that date, if that defendant was eligible to post and forfeit bail.(2) A defendant does not pay the amount imposed by the court on or before the date ordered by the court, or any lawful continuance of that date.(3) A defendant has failed to make an installment payment on the date specified by the court.(c) For the purposes of this section, a “comprehensive collection program” is a separate and distinct revenue collection activity that meets each of the following criteria:(1) The program identifies and collects amounts arising from delinquent court-ordered debt, whether or not a warrant has been issued against the alleged violator.(2) The program complies with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 1463.010.(3) The program engages in each of the following activities:(A) Attempts telephone contact with delinquent debtors for whom the program has a telephone number to inform them of their delinquent status and payment options.(B) Notifies delinquent debtors for whom the program has an address in writing of their outstanding obligation within 95 days of delinquency.(C) Generates internal monthly reports to track collections data, such as age of debt and delinquent amounts outstanding.(D) Uses Department of Motor Vehicles information to locate delinquent debtors.(E) Accepts payment of delinquent debt by credit card.(4) The program engages in at least five of the following activities:(A) Sends delinquent debt to the Franchise Tax Board’s Court-Ordered Debt Collections Program.(B) Sends delinquent debt to the Franchise Tax Board’s Interagency Intercept Collections Program.(C) Contracts with one or more private debt collectors to collect delinquent debt.(D) Sends monthly bills or account statements to all delinquent debtors.(E) Contracts with local, regional, state, or national skip tracing or locator resources or services to locate delinquent debtors.(F) Coordinates with the probation department to locate debtors who may be on formal or informal probation.(G) Uses Employment Development Department employment and wage information to collect delinquent debt.(H) Establishes wage and bank account garnishments where appropriate.(I) Places liens on real property owned by delinquent debtors when appropriate.(J) Uses an automated dialer or automatic call distribution system to manage telephone calls.(d) A comprehensive collection program shall also administer nondelinquent installment payment plans ordered pursuant to Section 68645.2 of the Government Code, and may recover up to and including thirty-five dollars ($35) per nondelinquent installment plan.SEC. 29. Section 1473.1 of the Penal Code is amended to read:1473.1. The Judicial Council shall promulgate standards for appointment of private counsel in superior court for claims filed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1473 by individuals who are not sentenced to death. These standards shall include a minimum requirement of 10 hours of training in the California Racial Justice Act of 2020. The training required by this section shall meet the requirements for Minimum Continuing Legal Education credit approved by the State Bar of California. Appointment standards for counsel where an individual has been sentenced to death shall be consistent with existing standards set forth in the California Rules of Court.SEC. 30. Section 2052 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2052. (a) The department shall have power to contract for the supply of electricity, gas and water for the prisons, upon terms the department deems in the best interests of the state, or to manufacture gas or electricity, or furnish water itself, at its option. It shall also have power to erect and construct or cause to be erected and constructed, electrical apparatus or other illuminating works in its discretion with or without contracting therefor, on terms it deems just. The department shall have full power to erect any building or structure deemed necessary by it, or to alter or improve the same, and to pay for the same from the fund appropriated for the use or support of the prisons, or from the earnings thereof, without advertising or contracting therefor.(b) With respect to any facility under the jurisdiction of the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority, the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority shall have the same powers that are vested in the department pursuant to subdivision (a).SEC. 31. Section 2056 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2056. If any of the shops or buildings in which convicts are employed require rebuilding or repair for any reason, they may be rebuilt or repaired immediately, under the direction of the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority.SEC. 32. Section 2700 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2700. (a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall require of every able-bodied prisoner imprisoned in any state prison as many hours of faithful labor in each day and every day during the prisoner’s term of imprisonment as shall be prescribed by the rules and regulations of the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.(b) When any statute requires a price to be fixed for any services to be performed in connection with the work program of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the compensation paid to prisoners shall be included as an item of cost in fixing the final statutory price.(c) Prisoners not engaged on work programs under the jurisdiction of the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority, but who are engaged in productive labor outside of such programs may be compensated in like manner. The compensation of the prisoners shall be paid either out of funds appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose or out of such other funds available to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation for expenditure, as the Director of Finance may direct.(d) When a prisoner escapes, the secretary shall determine what portion of the prisoner’s earnings shall be forfeited and the forfeiture shall be deposited in the State Treasury in a fund known as the Inmate Welfare Fund of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.SEC. 33. Section 2701 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2701. (a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is hereby authorized and empowered to cause the prisoners in the state prisons of this state to be employed in the rendering of services as are now, or may hereafter be, needed by the state, or any political subdivision thereof, or that may be needed for any state, county, district, municipal, school, or other public use, or that may be needed by any public institution of the state or of any political subdivision thereof, or that may be needed for use by the federal government, or any department, agency, or corporation thereof, or that may be needed for use by the government of any other state, or any department, agency, or corporation thereof, except for services provided by enterprises under the jurisdiction of the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may enter into contracts for the purposes of this article.(b) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may cause prisoners in the prisons of this state to be employed in the rendering of emergency services for the preservation of life or property within the state, whether that property is owned by public entities or private citizens, when a county level state of emergency has been declared due to a natural disaster and the local governing board has requested the assistance of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.SEC. 34. Section 2716.5 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2716.5. (a) There is hereby established the Prerelease Construction Trades Certificate Program, hereinafter referred to in this section as “the program,” in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, hereinafter referred to in this section as the “department,” to increase employment opportunities in the construction trades for inmates upon release.(b) The department shall establish a joint advisory committee for the purpose of implementation of the program. The committee shall be composed of representatives from building and construction trades employee organizations, the State Building and Construction Trades Council of California, joint apprenticeship training programs, the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority, the Division of Apprenticeship Standards, the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, and any other representatives the department determines appropriate. The responsibilities of the committee shall include, but are not be limited to, the following:(1) Develop guidelines for the participation of inmates in preapprenticeship training programs, as described in subdivision (e) of Section 14230 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. The guidelines shall provide for the integration, for all inmate preapprenticeship training programs in the building and construction trades, of the multicraft core curriculum implemented by the State Department of Education for its California Partnership Academies pilot project and by the California Workforce Development Board and local boards.(2) Develop and implement a prerelease construction trades certification that validates that an inmate completed instruction, skills, and competencies required by and recognized by the participating building and construction trades.(3) Ensure compliance with any applicable requirements and regulations of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards.(4) Evaluate prerelease on-the-job training opportunities to compare and match competencies with those of registered apprentices in the building and construction trades.(5) Explore the feasibility of the electronic tracking of each participating inmate’s relevant activities to efficiently capture competencies related to the certification.(6) Explore the prerelease awarding of formal credit for apprenticeship hours recognized by joint apprenticeship training programs and the Division of Apprenticeship Standards.(7) Facilitate the admission of graduates of inmate preapprenticeship programs, after release, into state-approved apprenticeship programs and for apprenticeship programs to evaluate such individuals for admission with advanced standing based on prior coursework and work experience.SEC. 35. Section 2800 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2800. There is hereby continued in existence within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority. As used in this article, “authority” means the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority. Any reference to the Department of Corrections shall refer to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.SEC. 36. Section 2800.5 is added to the Penal Code, to read:2800.5. The Prison Industry Authority shall be known as the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority. Any reference to the Prison Industry Authority in this or any other code shall be construed to mean the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority.SEC. 37. Section 2801 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2801. The purposes of the authority are:(a) To develop and operate industrial, agricultural, and service enterprises employing prisoners in institutions under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, which enterprises may be located either within those institutions or elsewhere, all as may be determined by the authority.(b) To create and maintain working conditions within the enterprises as much like those which prevail in private industry as possible, to ensure prisoners employed therein the opportunity to work productively, to earn funds, and to acquire or improve effective work habits and occupational skills.(c) To operate a work program for prisoners that will ultimately be self-supporting by generating sufficient funds from the sale of products and services to pay all the expenses of the program, and one that will provide goods and services that are or will be used by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, thereby reducing the cost of its operation.(1) This subdivision does not require immediate cash availability for funding retiree health care and pension liabilities above amounts established in the Budget Act, or as determined by the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, or the Director of Finance for the fiscal year.(2) The California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority shall not establish cash reserves to support funding retiree health care and pension liabilities above the amounts specified in paragraph (1).SEC. 38. Section 2802 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2802. Commencing July 1, 2005, there is hereby continued in existence within the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation a California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Board. The board shall consist of the following 11 members:(a) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or their designee.(b) The Director of the Department of General Services, or their designee.(c) The Secretary of Transportation, or their designee.(d) The Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint two members to represent the general public.(e) The Senate Committee on Rules shall appoint two members to represent the general public.(f) The Governor shall appoint four members. Of these, two shall be representatives of organized labor, and two shall be representatives of industry. The initial term of one of the members appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly shall be two years, and the initial term of the other shall be three years. The initial term of one of the members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules shall be two years, and the initial term of the other shall be three years. The initial terms of the four members appointed by the Governor shall be four years. All subsequent terms of all members shall be for four years. Each member’s term shall continue until the appointment and qualification of their successor.SEC. 39. Section 2804 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2804. The appointed members of the board shall receive a per diem to be determined by the chairperson, but not less than the usual per diem rate allowed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation employees during travel out of state. All members, including the chairperson, shall also receive their actual and necessary expenses of travel incurred in attending meetings of the commission and in making investigations, either as a board or individually as members of the board at the request of the chairperson. All the expenses shall be paid from the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Revolving Fund.SEC. 40. Section 2806 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2806. (a) There is hereby constituted a permanent revolving fund in the sum of not less than seven hundred thirty thousand dollars ($730,000), to be known as the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Revolving Fund, and to be used to meet the expenses necessary in the purchasing of materials and equipment, salaries, construction and cost of administration of the prison industries program. The fund may also be used to refund deposits either erroneously made or made in cases where delivery of products cannot be consummated. The fund shall at all times contain the amount of at least seven hundred thirty thousand dollars ($730,000), either in cash or in receivables, consisting of raw materials, finished or unfinished products, inventory at cost, equipment, or any combination of the above. Money received from the rendering of services or the sale of products in the prisons and institutions under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation pursuant to this article shall be paid to the State Treasurer monthly and shall be credited to the fund. At any time that the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the Director of Finance jointly determine that the balance in that revolving fund is greater than is necessary to carry out the purposes of the authority, they shall so inform the Controller and request a transfer of the unneeded balance from the revolving fund to the General Fund of the State of California. The Controller is authorized to transfer balances upon request. Funds deposited in the revolving fund are not subject to annual appropriation by the Legislature and may be used without a time limit by the authority.(b) The California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Revolving Fund is not subject to the provisions of Articles 2 (commencing with Section 13320) and 3 (commencing with Section 13335) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(c) Any major capital outlay project undertaken by the authority pursuant to this article shall be subject to review by the Public Works Board pursuant to the provisions of Part 10.5 (commencing with Section 15752) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 41. Section 2808 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2808. The board, in the exercise of its duties, shall have all of the powers and do all of the things that the board of directors of a private corporation would do, except as specifically limited in this article, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(a) To enter into contracts and leases, execute leases, pledge the equipment, inventory, and supplies under the control of the authority and the anticipated future receipts of any enterprise under the jurisdiction of the authority as collateral for loans, and execute other necessary instruments and documents.(b) To ensure that all funds received by the authority are kept in commercial accounts according to standard accounting practices.(c) To arrange for an independent annual audit.(d) To review and approve the annual budget for the authority, in order to ensure that the solvency of the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Revolving Fund is maintained.(1) This subdivision does not require immediate cash availability for funding retiree health care and pension liabilities above amounts established in the Budget Act, or as determined by the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, or the Director of Finance for the fiscal year.(2) The California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority shall not establish cash reserves to support funding retiree health care and pension liabilities above the amounts specified in paragraph (1).(e) To contract to employ a director to serve as the chief administrative officer of the authority. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the chairperson. The director shall have wide and successful experience with a productive enterprise, and have a demonstrated appreciation of the problems associated with prison management.(f) To apply for and administer grants and contracts of all kinds.(g) To establish, notwithstanding any other law, procedures governing the purchase of raw materials, component parts, and any other goods and services that may be needed by the authority or in the operation of any enterprise under its jurisdiction. Those procedures shall contain provisions for appeal to the board from any action taken in connection with them.(h) To establish, expand, diminish, or discontinue industrial, agricultural, and service enterprises under the authority’s jurisdiction to enable it to operate as a self-supporting enterprise, to provide as much employment for inmates as is feasible, and to provide diversified work activities to minimize the impact on existing private industry in the state.(i) To hold public hearings pursuant to subdivision (h) to provide an opportunity for persons or organizations who may be affected to appear and present testimony concerning the plans and activities of the authority. The authority shall ensure adequate public notice of those hearings. A new industrial, agricultural, or service enterprise that involves a gross annual production of more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall not be established unless and until a hearing concerning the enterprise has been held by a committee of persons designated by the board including at least two board members. The board shall take into consideration the effect of a proposed enterprise on California industry and shall not approve the establishment of the enterprise if the board determines it would have a comprehensive and substantial adverse impact on California industry that cannot be mitigated.(j) To periodically determine the prices at which activities, supplies, and services shall be sold.(k) To report to the Legislature in writing, on or before February 1 of each year, regarding:(1) The financial activity and condition of each enterprise under its jurisdiction.(2) The plans of the board regarding any significant changes in existing operations.(3) The plans of the board regarding the development of new enterprises.(4) A breakdown, by institution, of the number of prisoners at each institution, working in enterprises under the jurisdiction of the authority, said number to indicate the number of prisoners who are not working full time.SEC. 42. Section 2810.5 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2810.5. Notwithstanding any other law, commencing July 1, 2005, the Pooled Money Investment Board, or its successor, may grant loans to the authority when money is appropriated for that purpose by the Legislature, upon application by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, in order to finance the establishment of a new industrial, agricultural, or service enterprise. All loans shall bear the same interest rate as the pooled money market investment rate and shall have a maximum repayment period of 20 years from the date of approval of the loan.Prior to making its decision to grant a loan, the Pooled Money Investment Board, or its successor, shall require the authority to demonstrate all of the following:(a) The proposed industry project cannot be feasibly financed from private sources under Section 2810. The authority shall present proposed loan conditions from at least two private sources.(b) The proposed industry project cannot feasibly be financed from proceeds from other California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority enterprises.(c) The proceeds from the proposed project provide for a reasonable payback schedule to the General Fund.SEC. 43. Section 2811 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2811. (a) Commencing July 1, 2005, the director shall adopt and maintain a compensation schedule for inmate employees. That compensation schedule shall be based on quantity and quality of work performed and shall be required for its performance, but in no event shall that compensation exceed one-half the minimum wage provided in Section 1182 of the Labor Code, except as otherwise provided in this code. This compensation shall be credited to the account of the inmate.(b) Inmate compensation shall be paid from the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Revolving Fund.SEC. 44. Section 2816 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2816. (a) With the approval of the Department of Finance, there shall be transferred to, or deposited in, the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Revolving Fund for purposes authorized by this section, money appropriated from any source including sources other than state appropriations.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (i) of Section 2808, the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may order any authorized public works project involving the construction, renovation, or repair of prison facilities to be performed by inmate labor or juvenile justice facilities to be performed by ward labor, when the total expenditure does not exceed the project limit established by the first paragraph of Section 10108 of the Public Contract Code. Projects entailing expenditure of greater than the project limit established by the first paragraph of Section 10108 of the Public Contract Code shall be reviewed and approved by the chairperson, in consultation with the board.(c) Money so transferred or deposited shall be available for expenditure by the department for the purposes for which appropriated, contributed, or made available, without regard to fiscal years and irrespective of the provisions of Sections 13340 and 16304 of the Government Code. Money transferred or deposited pursuant to this section shall be used only for purposes authorized in this section.SEC. 45. Section 2817 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2817. The Inmate and Ward Construction Revolving Account is hereby created in the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Revolving Fund, established in Section 2806, to receive funds transferred or deposited for the purposes described in Section 2816.SEC. 46. Section 2818 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2818. The New Industries Revolving Account is hereby created in the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Revolving Fund to receive General Fund or other public money transferred or deposited for the purpose of financing new enterprises or the expansion of existing enterprises. Money in the fund may be disbursed by the board subject to the conditions prescribed in Section 2810.5.SEC. 47. Section 4497.50 of the Penal Code is amended to read:4497.50. In order to be eligible to receive funds derived from the issuance of General Obligation Bonds under the County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Bond Act of 1988, a county or city and county shall do all of the following:(a) In the design and planning of facilities whose construction, reconstruction, or remodeling is financed under the County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Bond Act of 1988, products for construction, renovation, equipment, and furnishings produced and sold by the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority or local Jail Industry Authority shall be utilized in the plans and specifications unless the county or city and county demonstrates either of the following to the satisfaction of the Board of State and Community Corrections or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice.(1) The products cannot be produced and delivered without causing delay to the construction of the property.(2) The products are not suitable for the facility or competitively priced and cannot otherwise be reasonably adapted.(b) Counties and cities and counties shall consult with the staff of the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority or local Jail Industry Authority to develop new products and adapt existing products to their needs.(c) The Board of State and Community Corrections or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, shall not enter into any contract with any county or city and county until that county’s or city and county’s plan for purchase from and consultation with the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority or local jail industry program is reviewed and approved by the Board of State and Community Corrections or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice.SEC. 48. Section 4497.52 of the Penal Code is amended to read:4497.52. Notwithstanding any other law, a county or city and county may contract for the purchase of products as specified in Section 4497.50 with the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority or local Jail Industry Authority without the formality of obtaining bids or otherwise complying with provisions of the Public Contract Code.SEC. 49. Section 4497.54 of the Penal Code is amended to read:4497.54. The California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority shall designate an individual as County Jail and Juvenile Facility Liaison who shall work with counties to maximize the utilization of California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority products for construction, renovation, equipment, and furnishing, to ensure that manufactured products meet the contract specifications and delivery dates, and to ensure consultation with counties for development of new products and adaption of existing products to meet their needs.SEC. 50. Section 4497.56 of the Penal Code is amended to read:4497.56. It is the intent of the Legislature to maximize the utilization of California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority products for jail construction, renovation, equipment, and furnishings to ensure that prisoners work productively and contribute to reducing the cost to the taxpayers of their incarceration.SEC. 51. Section 6025 of the Penal Code is amended to read:6025. (a) Commencing July 1, 2012, the Board of State and Community Corrections shall be composed of 12 members, as follows:(1) The Chair of the Board of State and Community Corrections, who shall be the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.(2) The Director of the Division of Adult Parole Operations for the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.(3) A county sheriff in charge of a local detention facility which has a Corrections Standards Authority rated capacity of 200 or fewer inmates, appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.(4) A county sheriff in charge of a local detention facility which has a Corrections Standards Authority rated capacity of over 200 inmates, appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.(5) A county supervisor or county administrative officer. This member shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.(6) A chief probation officer from a county with a population over 200,000, appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.(7) A chief probation officer from a county with a population under 200,000, appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.(8) A judge appointed by the Judicial Council of California.(9) A chief of police, appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.(10) A community provider of rehabilitative treatment or services for adult offenders, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.(11) A community provider or advocate with expertise in effective programs, policies, and treatment of at-promise youth and juvenile offenders, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.(12) A public member, appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.(b) Commencing July 1, 2013, the Board of State and Community Corrections shall be composed of 13 members, as follows:(1) The Chair of the Board of State and Community Corrections, who shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.(2) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.(3) The Director of the Division of Adult Parole Operations for the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.(4) The individuals listed in paragraphs (3) to (12), inclusive, of subdivision (a), who shall serve or continue to serve terms as provided in subdivision (e).(c) Commencing July 1, 2024, the Board of State and Community Corrections shall be composed of 15 members, as follows:(1) The individuals described in subdivision (b), who shall serve or continue to serve terms as provided in subdivision (e).(2) A licensed health care provider, appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.(3) A licensed mental or behavioral health care provider, appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation.(d) The Chair of the Board of State and Community Corrections shall serve full time.(e) Members shall hold office for terms of three years, each term to commence on the expiration date of the predecessor. Any appointment to a vacancy that occurs for any reason other than expiration of the term shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term. Members are eligible for reappointment.(f) The board shall select a vice chairperson from among its members, who shall be either a chief probation officer or a sheriff. Eight members of the board shall constitute a quorum.(g) When the board is hearing charges against any member, the individual concerned shall not sit as a member of the board for the period of hearing of charges and the determination of recommendations to the Governor.(h) If any appointed member is not in attendance for three meetings in any calendar year, the board shall inform the appointing authority, which may remove that member and make a new appointment, as provided in this section, for the remainder of the term.SEC. 52. Section 6202 of the Penal Code is amended to read:6202. (a) Work of inmates assigned to the conservation centers may be performed at the conservation centers or branches thereof or in or from permanent, temporary, and mobile camps established pursuant to this chapter or pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 2780) of Chapter 5 of Title 1 of Part 3. The provisions of Sections 2780.1 to 2786, inclusive, and Sections 2788 to 2791, inclusive, are applicable to camps established pursuant to this article as well as those established pursuant to that Article 5. The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may, at such times as the secretary deems proper and on such terms as the secretary deems wise, enter into contracts or cooperative agreements with any public agency, local, state, or federal, for the performance of other conservation projects that are appropriate for the public agencies under policies which shall be established by the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority.(b) Inmates and wards may be assigned to perform public conservation projects, including, but not limited to, forest fire prevention and control, forest and watershed management, recreational area development, fish and game management, soil conservation, and forest watershed revegetation.(c) No productive industrial enterprise subject to the jurisdiction of the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority shall be established at any center or branch thereof or camp established pursuant to this chapter except in compliance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 5085) of Title 7 of Part 3.SEC. 53. Section 13511.1 of the Penal Code is amended to read:13511.1. (a) The commission, stakeholders from law enforcement, including representatives of law enforcement administration and law enforcement employees, the California State University, including administration and faculty members, and community organizations shall serve as advisors to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to develop a modern policing degree program. By June 1, 2023, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in consultation with the stakeholders, shall submit a report on recommendations to the Legislature outlining a plan to implement this program. The recommendations in the report shall:(1) Focus on courses pertinent to law enforcement, which shall include, but not be limited to, psychology, communications, history, ethnic studies, law, and those determined to develop necessary critical thinking skills and emotional intelligence.(2) Include allowances for prior law enforcement experience, and appropriate work experience, postsecondary education experience, or military experience to satisfy a portion of the employment eligibility requirements.(A) It is the intent of the Legislature that allowances for prior experience in this paragraph for those with military experience may be provided to those with military specializations pertinent to law enforcement, including those specializations in community relations, de-escalation, foreign language translators, and those determined to require necessary critical thinking skills and emotional intelligence.(B) It is the intent of the Legislature that allowances for prior experience specified in this paragraph shall be granted to those of good moral character, and shall not be granted to those with prior sustained disciplinary actions taken against them, except that the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training may, after considering the severity of the sustained misconduct or violation, grant a partial allowance.(3) Include both the modern policing degree program and bachelor’s degree in the discipline of their choosing as minimum education requirements for employment as a peace officer.(4) Include recommendations to adopt financial assistance for students of historically underserved and disadvantaged communities with barriers to higher education access that fulfill the minimum education requirements to be adopted, pursuant to this section, for employment as a peace officer.(b) The report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(c) Within two years of the submission of the report to the Legislature, the commission shall approve and adopt the education criteria for peace officers, based on the recommendations in the report by the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges in consultation with the stakeholders specified in subdivision (a).SEC. 54. Section 13515.26 of the Penal Code is amended to read:13515.26. (a) The commission shall review the training module in the regular basic course relating to persons with a mental illness, intellectual disability, or substance use disorder, and analyze existing training curricula in order to identify areas where additional training is needed to better prepare law enforcement to effectively address incidents involving mentally disabled persons.(b) Upon identifying what additional training is needed, the commission shall update the training in consultation with appropriate community, local, and state organizations, and agencies that have expertise in the area of mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders, and with appropriate consumer and family advocate groups.(c) The training shall address issues related to stigma, shall be culturally relevant and appropriate, and shall include all of the following topics:(1) Recognizing indicators of mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(2) Conflict resolution and de-escalation techniques for potentially dangerous situations.(3) Use of force options and alternatives.(4) The perspective of individuals or families who have experiences with persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(5) Mental health resources available to the first responders to events that involve mentally disabled persons.(d) The course of instruction shall be at least 15 hours, and shall include training scenarios and facilitated learning activities relating to law enforcement interaction with persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(e) The course shall be presented within the existing hours allotted for the regular basic course.(f) The commission shall implement this section on or before August 1, 2016.SEC. 55. Section 13515.27 of the Penal Code is amended to read:13515.27. (a) The commission shall establish and keep updated a classroom-based continuing training course that includes instructor-led active learning, such as scenario-based training, relating to behavioral health and law enforcement interaction with persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(b) This course shall be at least three consecutive hours, may include training scenarios and facilitated learning activities, shall address issues related to stigma, shall be culturally relevant and appropriate, and shall include all of the following topics:(1) The cause and nature of mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(2) Indicators of mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(3) Appropriate responses to a variety of situations involving persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(4) Conflict resolution and de-escalation techniques for potentially dangerous situations.(5) Appropriate language usage when interacting with potentially emotionally distressed persons.(6) Resources available to serve persons with mental illness or intellectual disability.(7) The perspective of individuals or families who have experiences with persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(c) The course described in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be made available by the commission to each law enforcement officer with a rank of supervisor or below and who is assigned to patrol duties or to supervise officers who are assigned to patrol duties.(d) The commission shall implement this section on or before August 1, 2016.SEC. 56. Section 13515.28 of the Penal Code is amended to read:13515.28. (a) (1) The commission shall require the field training officers who provide instruction in the field training program to have at least eight hours of crisis intervention behavioral health training to better train new peace officers on how to effectively interact with persons with mental illness or intellectual disability. This course shall include classroom instruction and instructor-led active learning, such as scenario-based training, and shall be taught in segments that are at least four hours long.(2) If a field training officer has completed eight hours of crisis intervention behavioral health training within the past 24 months, or if a field training officer has completed 40 hours of crisis intervention behavioral health training, the requirement described in paragraph (1) shall not apply.(b) The crisis intervention behavioral health training shall address issues relating to stigma, shall be culturally relevant and appropriate, and shall include all of the following topics:(1) The cause and nature of mental illnesses and intellectual disabilities.(2) (A) How to identify indicators of mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(B) How to distinguish between mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(C) How to respond appropriately in a variety of situations involving persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(3) Conflict resolution and de-escalation techniques for potentially dangerous situations.(4) Appropriate language usage when interacting with potentially emotionally distressed persons.(5) Community and state resources available to serve persons with mental illness or intellectual disability, and how these resources can be best utilized by law enforcement.(6) The perspective of individuals or families who have experiences with persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(c) Field training officers assigned or appointed before January 1, 2017, shall complete the crisis intervention behavioral health training by June 30, 2017. Field training officers assigned or appointed on or after January 1, 2017, shall complete the crisis intervention behavioral health training within 180 days of assignment or appointment.(d) This section does not prevent an agency from requiring its field training officers to complete additional hours of crisis intervention behavioral health training or requiring its field training officers to complete that training earlier than as required by this section.SEC. 57. Section 13515.295 of the Penal Code is amended to read:13515.295. (a) The commission shall, by May 1, 2016, conduct a review and evaluation of the required competencies of the field training program and police training program to identify areas where additional training is necessary to better prepare law enforcement officers to effectively address incidents involving persons with a mental illness or intellectual disability.(b) Upon identifying what additional training is needed, the commission shall update the training in consultation with appropriate community, local, and state organizations, and agencies that have expertise in the area of mental illness, intellectual disabilities, and substance abuse disorders, and with appropriate consumer and family advocate groups.(c) The training shall address issues related to stigma, shall be culturally relevant and appropriate, and shall include all of the following topics:(1) How to identify indicators of mental illness, intellectual disability, substance use disorders, neurological disorders, traumatic brain injury, post-traumatic stress disorder, and dementia.(2) Autism spectrum disorder.(3) Genetic disorders, including, but not limited to, Down syndrome.(4) Conflict resolution and de-escalation techniques for potentially dangerous situations.(5) Alternatives to the use of force when interacting with potentially dangerous persons with mental illness or intellectual disabilities.(6) The perspective of individuals or families who have experiences with persons with mental illness, intellectual disability, and substance use disorders.(7) Involuntary holds.(8) Community and state resources available to serve persons with mental illness or intellectual disability, and how these resources can be best utilized by law enforcement.SEC. 58. Section 13515.30 of the Penal Code is amended to read:13515.30. (a) By July 1, 2015, the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training shall establish and keep updated a continuing education training course relating to law enforcement interaction with mentally disabled and developmentally disabled persons living within a state mental hospital or state developmental center. The training course shall be developed by the commission in consultation with appropriate community, local, and state organizations and agencies that have expertise in the area of mental illness and developmental disability, and with appropriate consumer and family advocate groups. In developing the course, the commission shall also examine existing courses certified by the commission that relate to mentally disabled and developmentally disabled persons. The commission shall make the course available to all law enforcement agencies in California, and the course shall be required for law enforcement personnel serving in law enforcement agencies with jurisdiction over state mental hospitals and state developmental centers, as part of the agency’s officer training program.(b) The course described in subdivision (a) may consist of video-based or classroom instruction. The course shall include, at a minimum, core instruction in all of the following:(1) The prevalence, cause, and nature of mental illnesses and developmental disabilities.(2) The unique characteristics, barriers, and challenges of individuals who may be a victim of abuse or exploitation living within a state mental hospital or state developmental center.(3) How to accommodate, interview, and converse with individuals who may require assistive devices in order to express themselves.(4) Capacity and consent of individuals with cognitive and intellectual barriers.(5) Conflict resolution and de-escalation techniques for potentially dangerous situations involving mentally disabled or developmentally disabled persons.(6) Appropriate language usage when interacting with mentally disabled or developmentally disabled persons.(7) Community and state resources and advocacy support and services available to serve mentally disabled or developmentally disabled persons, and how these resources can be best utilized by law enforcement to benefit the mentally disabled or developmentally disabled community.(8) The fact that a crime committed in whole or in part because of an actual or perceived disability of the victim is a hate crime punishable under Title 11.6 (commencing with Section 422.55) of Part 1.(9) Information on the state mental hospital system and the state developmental center system.(10) Techniques in conducting forensic investigations within institutional settings where jurisdiction may be shared.(11) Examples of abuse and exploitation perpetrated by caregivers, staff, contractors, or administrators of state mental hospitals and state developmental centers, and how to conduct investigations in instances where a perpetrator may also be a caregiver or provider of therapeutic or other services.SEC. 59. Section 13519.10 of the Penal Code is amended to read:13519.10. (a) (1) The commission shall implement a course or courses of instruction for the regular and periodic training of law enforcement officers in the use of force and shall also develop uniform, minimum guidelines for adoption and promulgation by California law enforcement agencies for use of force. The guidelines and course of instruction shall stress that the use of force by law enforcement personnel is of important concern to the community and law enforcement and that law enforcement should safeguard life, dignity, and liberty of all persons, without prejudice to anyone. These guidelines shall be a resource for each agency executive to use in the creation of the use of force policy that the agency is required to adopt and promulgate pursuant to Section 7286 of the Government Code, and that reflects the needs of the agency, the jurisdiction it serves, and the law.(2) As used in this section, “law enforcement officer” includes any peace officer of a local police or sheriff’s department or the California Highway Patrol, or of any other law enforcement agency authorized by law to use force to effectuate an arrest.(b) The course or courses of the regular basic course for law enforcement officers and the guidelines shall include all of the following:(1) Legal standards for use of force.(2) Duty to intercede.(3) The use of objectively reasonable force.(4) Supervisory responsibilities.(5) Use of force review and analysis.(6) Guidelines for the use of deadly force.(7) State required reporting.(8) De-escalation and interpersonal communication training, including tactical methods that use time, distance, cover, and concealment, to avoid escalating situations that lead to violence.(9) Implicit and explicit bias and cultural competency.(10) Skills including de-escalation techniques to effectively, safely, and respectfully interact with people with disabilities or behavioral health issues.(11) Use of force scenario training including simulations of low-frequency, high-risk situations and calls for service, shoot-or-don’t-shoot situations, and real-time force option decisionmaking.(12) Alternatives to the use of deadly force and physical force, so that de-escalation tactics and less lethal alternatives are, where reasonably feasible, part of the decisionmaking process leading up to the consideration of deadly force.(13) Mental health and policing, including bias and stigma.(14) Using public service, including the rendering of first aid, to provide a positive point of contact between law enforcement officers and community members to increase trust and reduce conflicts.(c) Law enforcement agencies are encouraged to include, as part of their advanced officer training program, periodic updates and training on use of force. The commission shall assist where possible.(d) (1) The course or courses of instruction, the learning and performance objectives, the standards for the training, and the guidelines shall be developed by the commission in consultation with appropriate groups and individuals having an interest and expertise in the field on use of force. The groups and individuals shall include, but not be limited to, law enforcement agencies, police academy instructors, subject matter experts, and members of the public.(2) The commission, in consultation with these groups and individuals, shall review existing training programs to determine the ways in which use of force training may be included as part of ongoing programs.(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that each law enforcement agency adopt, promulgate, and require regular and periodic training consistent with an agency’s specific use of force policy that, at a minimum, complies with the guidelines developed under subdivisions (a) and (b).SEC. 60. Section 13652 of the Penal Code is amended to read:13652. (a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), kinetic energy projectiles and chemical agents shall not be used by any law enforcement agency to disperse any assembly, protest, or demonstration.(b) Kinetic energy projectiles and chemical agents shall only be deployed by a peace officer that has received training on their proper use by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training for crowd control if the use is objectively reasonable to defend against a threat to life or serious bodily injury to any individual, including any peace officer, or to bring an objectively dangerous and unlawful situation safely and effectively under control, and only in accordance with all of the following requirements:(1) De-escalation techniques or other alternatives to force have been attempted, when objectively reasonable, and have failed.(2) Repeated, audible announcements are made announcing the intent to use kinetic energy projectiles and chemical agents and the type to be used, when objectively reasonable to do so. The announcements shall be made from various locations, if necessary, and delivered in multiple languages, if appropriate.(3) Persons are given an objectively reasonable opportunity to disperse and leave the scene.(4) An objectively reasonable effort has been made to identify persons engaged in violent acts and those who are not, and kinetic energy projectiles or chemical agents are targeted toward those individuals engaged in violent acts. Projectiles shall not be aimed indiscriminately into a crowd or group of persons.(5) Kinetic energy projectiles and chemical agents are used only with the frequency, intensity, and in a manner that is proportional to the threat and objectively reasonable.(6) Officers shall minimize the possible incidental impact of their use of kinetic energy projectiles and chemical agents on bystanders, medical personnel, journalists, or other unintended targets.(7) An objectively reasonable effort has been made to extract individuals in distress.(8) Medical assistance is promptly provided, if properly trained personnel are present, or procured, for injured persons, when it is reasonable and safe to do so.(9) Kinetic energy projectiles shall not be aimed at the head, neck, or any other vital organs.(10) Kinetic energy projectiles or chemical agents shall not be used by any law enforcement agency solely due to any of the following:(A) A violation of an imposed curfew.(B) A verbal threat.(C) Noncompliance with a law enforcement directive.(11) If the chemical agent to be deployed is tear gas, only a commanding officer at the scene of the assembly, protest, or demonstration may authorize the use of tear gas.(c) This section does not prevent a law enforcement agency from adopting more stringent policies.(d) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Kinetic energy projectiles” means any type of device designed as less lethal, to be launched from any device as a projectile that may cause bodily injury through the transfer of kinetic energy and blunt force trauma. For purposes of this section, the term includes, but is not limited to, items commonly referred to as rubber bullets, plastic bullets, beanbag rounds, and foam tipped plastic rounds.(2) “Chemical agents” means any chemical that can rapidly produce sensory irritation or disabling physical effects in humans, which disappear within a short time following termination of exposure. For purposes of this section, the term includes, but is not limited to, chloroacetophenone tear gas, commonly known as CN tear gas; 2-chlorobenzalmalononitrile gas, commonly known as CS gas; and items commonly referred to as pepper balls, pepper spray, or oleoresin capsicum.(e) This section does not apply within any county detention facility or any correctional facility of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.SEC. 61. Section 13652.1 of the Penal Code is amended to read:13652.1. (a) Each law enforcement agency shall, within 60 days of each incident, publish a summary on its internet website of all instances in which a peace officer employed by that agency uses a kinetic energy projectile or chemical agent, as those terms are defined in Section 13652, for crowd control. However, an agency may extend that period for another 30 days if they demonstrate just cause, but in no case longer than 90 days from the time of the incident.(b) For each incident reported under subdivision (a), the summary shall be limited to that information known to the agency at the time of the report and shall include only the following:(1) A description of the assembly, protest, demonstration, or incident, including the approximate crowd size and the number of officers involved.(2) The type of kinetic energy projectile or chemical agent deployed.(3) The number of rounds or quantity of chemical agent dispersed, as applicable.(4) The number of documented injuries as a result of the kinetic energy projectile or chemical agent deployment.(5) The justification for using the kinetic energy projectile or chemical agent, including any de-escalation tactics or protocols and other measures that were taken at the time of the event to de-escalate tensions and avoid the necessity of using the kinetic energy projectile or chemical agent.(c) The Department of Justice shall post on its internet website a compiled list linking each law enforcement agency’s reports posted pursuant to subdivision (a).SEC. 62. Section 18108 of the Penal Code is amended to read:18108. (a) Each municipal police department and county sheriff’s department, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and the University of California and California State University Police Departments shall, on or before January 1, 2021, develop, adopt, and implement written policies and standards relating to gun violence restraining orders. The policies and standards shall be updated, as necessary, to incorporate changes in the law governing gun violence restraining orders.(b) (1) The policies and standards shall instruct officers on the use of gun violence restraining orders in appropriate situations to prevent future violence involving a firearm and shall encourage the use of de-escalation practices for officer and civilian safety when responding to incidents involving a firearm.(2) The policies and standards shall instruct officers on the types of evidence a court considers in determining whether grounds exist for issuance of a gun violence restraining order pursuant to Section 18155.(3) The policies and standards shall instruct officers to consider whether a gun violence restraining order may be necessary during a response to any residence that is associated with a firearm registration or record, during a response in which a firearm is present, or during a response in which one of the involved parties owns or possesses a firearm, or expressed an intent to acquire a firearm. The policies and standards should also inform officers about the different procedures and protections afforded by different types of firearm-prohibiting emergency protective orders that are available to law enforcement petitioners and provide examples of situations in which each type of emergency protective order is most appropriate.(4) The policies and standards should also instruct officers to consider whether a gun violence restraining order may be necessary during a contact with a person exhibiting mental health issues, including suicidal thoughts, statements, or actions, if that person owns or possesses a firearm or expressed an intent to acquire a firearm. The policies and standards shall encourage officers encountering situations in which there is reasonable cause to believe that the person poses an immediate and present danger of causing personal injury to themselves or another person by having custody or control of a firearm to consider obtaining a mental health evaluation of the person by a medically trained professional or to detain the person for mental health evaluation pursuant to agency policy relating to Section 5150 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The policies and standards should reflect the policy of the agency to prevent access to firearms by persons who, due to mental health issues, pose a danger to themselves or to others by owning or possessing a firearm. The policies and standards should encourage officers to provide information about mental health referral services during a contact with a person exhibiting mental health issues.(c) The written policies and standards developed pursuant to this section shall be consistent with any gun violence restraining order training administered by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, and shall include all of the following:(1) Standards and procedures for requesting and serving a temporary emergency gun violence restraining order, including standards and procedures for determining prior to the expiration of a temporary emergency gun violence restraining order whether the subject of the temporary emergency gun violence restraining order presents an ongoing increased risk for violence so that a gun violence restraining order issued after notice and hearing may be necessary.(2) Standards and procedures for requesting and serving an ex parte gun violence restraining order, including standards and procedures for determining prior to the expiration of an ex parte gun violence restraining order whether the subject of the ex parte gun violence restraining order presents an ongoing increased risk for violence so that a gun violence restraining order issued after notice and hearing may be necessary.(3) Standards and procedures for requesting and serving a gun violence restraining order issued after notice and hearing.(4) Standards and procedures for the seizure of firearms and ammunition at the time of issuance of a temporary emergency gun violence restraining order.(5) Standards and procedures for verifying or ensuring the removal of firearms and ammunition from the subject of a gun violence restraining order.(6) Standards and procedures for obtaining and serving a search warrant for firearms and ammunition.(7) Responsibility of officers to attend gun violence restraining order hearings and diligently participate in the evidence presentation process.(8) Standards and procedures for requesting renewals of expiring gun violence restraining orders.(9) Standards and procedures for storing firearms surrendered pursuant to a gun violence restraining order.(10) Standards and procedures for returning firearms upon the termination of a gun violence restraining order, including verification that the respondent is not otherwise legally prohibited from possessing firearms.(11) Standards and procedures for addressing violations of a gun violence restraining order.(d) Municipal police departments, county sheriff’s departments, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and the University of California and California State University Police Departments are encouraged, but not required by this section, to train officers on standards and procedures implemented pursuant to this section, and may incorporate these standards and procedures into an academy course, preexisting annual training, or other continuing education program. Municipal police departments, county sheriff’s departments, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and the University of California and California State University police departments shall make information about standards and policies implemented pursuant to this section available to all officers.(e) In developing and updating these policies and standards, law enforcement agencies are encouraged to consult with gun violence prevention experts, mental health professionals, domestic violence service providers, and other community-based organizations.(f) Policies developed pursuant to this section shall be made available to the public upon request.SEC. 63. Section 6108 of the Public Contract Code is amended to read:6108. (a) (1) Every contract entered into by any state agency for the procurement or laundering of apparel, garments, or corresponding accessories, or the procurement of equipment, materials, or supplies, other than procurement related to a public works contract, shall require that a contractor certify that no apparel, garments, corresponding accessories, equipment, materials, or supplies furnished to the state pursuant to the contract have been laundered or produced in whole or in part by sweatshop labor, forced labor, convict labor, indentured labor under penal sanction, abusive forms of child labor, or exploitation of children in sweatshop labor, or with the benefit of sweatshop labor, forced labor, convict labor, indentured labor under penal sanction, abusive forms of child labor, or exploitation of children in sweatshop labor. The contractor shall agree to comply with this provision of the contract.(2) The contract shall specify that the contractor is required to cooperate fully in providing reasonable access to the contractor’s records, documents, agents, employees, or premises if reasonably required by authorized officials of the contracting agency, the Department of Industrial Relations, or the Department of Justice determine the contractor’s compliance with the requirements under paragraph (1).(b) (1) Any contractor contracting with the state who knew or should have known that the apparel, garments, corresponding accessories, equipment, materials, or supplies furnished to the state were laundered or produced in violation of the conditions specified in subdivision (a) when entering into a contract pursuant to subdivision (a), may, subject to subdivision (c), have any or all of the following sanctions imposed:(A) The contract under which the prohibited apparel, garments, or corresponding accessories, equipment, materials, or supplies were laundered or provided may be voided at the option of the state agency to which the equipment, materials, or supplies were provided.(B) The contractor may be assessed a penalty that shall be the greater of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or an amount equaling 20 percent of the value of the apparel, garments, corresponding accessories, equipment, materials, or supplies that the state agency demonstrates were produced in violation of the conditions specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and that were supplied to the state agency under the contract.(C) The contractor may be removed from the bidder’s list for a period not to exceed 360 days.(2) Any moneys collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited into the General Fund.(c) (1) When imposing the sanctions described in subdivision (b), the contracting agency shall notify the contractor of the right to a hearing, if requested, within 15 days of the date of the notice. The hearing shall be before an administrative law judge of the Office of Administrative Hearings in accordance with the procedures specified in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The administrative law judge shall take into consideration any measures the contractor has taken to ensure compliance with this section, and may waive any or all of the sanctions if it is determined that the contractor has acted in good faith.(2) The agency shall be assessed the cost of the administrative hearing, unless the agency has prevailed in the hearing, in which case the contractor shall be assessed the cost of the hearing.(d) (1) Any state agency that investigates a complaint against a contractor for violation of this section may limit its investigation to evaluating the information provided by the person or entity submitting the complaint and the information provided by the contractor.(2) Whenever a contracting officer of the contracting agency has reason to believe that the contractor failed to comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the agency shall refer the matter for investigation to the head of the agency and, as the head of the agency determines appropriate, to either the Director of Industrial Relations or the Department of Justice.(e) (1) For purposes of this section, “forced labor” shall have the same meaning as in Section 1307 of Title 19 of the United States Code.(2) “Abusive forms of child labor” means any of the following:(A) All forms of slavery or practices similar to slavery, such as the sale and trafficking of children, debt bondage, and serfdom and forced or compulsory labor, including forced or compulsory recruitment of children for use in armed conflict.(B) The use, procuring, or offering of a child for prostitution, for the production of pornography, or for pornographic performances.(C) The use, procuring, or offering of a child for illicit activities, in particular for the production and trafficking of illicit drugs.(D) All work or service exacted from or performed by any person under the age of 18 years either under the menace of any penalty for its nonperformance and for which the worker does not offer oneself voluntarily, or under a contract, the enforcement of which can be accomplished by process or penalties.(E) All work or service exacted from or performed by a child in violation of all applicable laws of the country of manufacture governing the minimum age of employment, compulsory education, and occupational health and safety.(3) “Exploitation of children in sweatshop labor” means all work or service exacted from or performed by any person under the age of 18 years in violation of more than one law of the country of manufacture governing wage and benefits, occupational health and safety, nondiscrimination, and freedom of association.(4) “Sweatshop labor” means all work or service exacted from or performed by any person in violation of more than one law of the country of manufacture governing wages, employee benefits, occupational health, occupational safety, nondiscrimination, or freedom of association.(5) “Apparel, garments, or corresponding accessories” includes, but is not limited to, uniforms.(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, “forced labor” and “convict labor” do not include work or services performed by an inmate or a person employed by the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority.(7) “State agency” means any state agency in this state.(f) (1) On or before February 1, 2004, the Department of Industrial Relations shall establish a contractor responsibility program, including a Sweatfree Code of Conduct, to be signed by all bidders on state contracts and subcontracts. Any state agency responsible for procurement shall ensure that the Sweatfree Code of Conduct is available for public review at least 30 calendar days between the dates of receipt and the final award of the contract. The Sweatfree Code of Conduct shall list the requirements that contractors are required to meet, as set forth in subdivision (g).(2) Upon implementation in the manner described in paragraph (4), every contract entered into by any state agency for the procurement or laundering of apparel, garments, or corresponding accessories, or for the procurement of equipment or supplies, shall require that the contractor certify in accordance with the Sweatfree Code of Conduct that no apparel, garments, or corresponding accessories, or equipment, materials, or supplies, furnished to the state pursuant to the contract have been laundered or produced, in whole or in part, by sweatshop labor.(3) The appropriate procurement agency, in consultation with the Director of Industrial Relations, shall employ a phased and targeted approach to implementing the Sweatfree Code of Conduct. Sweatfree Code of Conduct procurement policies involving apparel, garments, and corresponding accessories may be permitted a phasein period of up to one year for purposes of feasibility and providing sufficient notice to contractors and the general public. The appropriate procurement agency, in consultation with the Director of Industrial Relations, shall target other procurement categories based on the magnitude of verified sweatshop conditions and the feasibility of implementation, and may set phasein goals and timetables of up to three years to achieve compliance with the principles of the Sweatfree Code of Conduct.(4) In order to facilitate compliance with the Sweatfree Code of Conduct, the Department of Industrial Relations shall explore mechanisms employed by other governmental entities, including, but not limited to, New Jersey Executive Order No. 20, of 2002, to ensure that businesses that contract with this state are in compliance with this section and any regulations or requirements promulgated in conformance with this section, as amended by Section 2 of Chapter 711 of the Statutes of 2003. The mechanisms explored may include, but not be limited to, authorization to contract with a competent nonprofit organization that is neither funded nor controlled, in whole or in part, by a corporation that is engaged in the procurement or laundering of apparel, garments, or corresponding accessories, or the procurement of equipment, materials, or supplies. The Department of Industrial Relations, in complying with this paragraph, shall also consider any feasible and cost-effective monitoring measures that will encourage compliance with the Sweatfree Code of Conduct.(5) To ensure public access and confidence, the Department of Industrial Relations shall ensure public awareness and access to proposed contracts by postings on the Internet and through communication to advocates for garment workers, unions, and other interested parties. The appropriate agencies shall establish a mechanism for soliciting and reviewing any information indicating violations of the Sweatfree Code of Conduct by prospective or current bidders, contractors, or subcontractors. The agencies shall make their findings public when they reject allegations against bidding or contracting parties.(6) Contractors shall ensure that their subcontractors comply in writing with the Sweatfree Code of Conduct, under penalty of perjury. Contractors shall attach a copy of the Sweatfree Code of Conduct to the certification required by subdivision (a).(g) No state agency may enter into a contract with any contractor unless the contractor meets the following requirements:(1) Contractors and subcontractors in California shall comply with all appropriate state laws concerning wages, workplace safety, rights to association and assembly, and nondiscrimination standards as well as appropriate federal laws. Contractors based in other states in the United States shall comply with all appropriate laws of their states and appropriate federal laws. For contractors whose locations for manufacture or assembly are outside the United States, those contractors shall ensure that their subcontractors comply with the appropriate laws of countries where the facilities are located.(2) Contractors and subcontractors shall maintain a policy of not terminating any employee except for just cause, and employees shall have access to a mediator or to a mediation process to resolve certain workplace disputes that are not regulated by the National Labor Relations Board.(3) Contractors and subcontractors shall ensure that workers are paid, at a minimum, wages and benefits in compliance with applicable local, state, and national laws of the jurisdiction in which the labor, on behalf of the contractor or subcontractor, is performed. Whenever a state agency expends funds for the procurement or laundering of apparel, garments, or corresponding accessories, or the procurement of equipment, materials, or supplies, other than procurement related to a public works contract, the applicable labor standards established by the local jurisdiction through the exercise of either local police powers or local spending powers in which the labor, in compliance with the contract or purchase order for which the expenditure is made, is performed shall apply with regard to the contract or purchase order for which the expenditure is made, unless the applicable local standards are in conflict with, or are explicitly preempted by, state law. A state agency may not require, as a condition for the receipt of state funds or assistance, that a local jurisdiction refrain from applying the labor standards that are otherwise applicable to that local jurisdiction. The Department of Industrial Relations may, without incurring additional expenses, access information from any nonprofit organization, including, but not limited to, the World Bank, that gathers and disseminates data with respect to wages paid throughout the world, to allow the Department of Industrial Relations to determine whether contractors and subcontractors are compensating their employees at a level that enables those employees to live above the applicable poverty level.(4) All contractors and subcontractors shall comply with the overtime laws and regulations of the country in which their employees are working.(5) All overtime hours shall be worked voluntarily. Workers shall be compensated for overtime at either (A) the rate of compensation for regular hours of work, or (B) as legally required in the country of manufacture, whichever is greater.(6) No person may be employed who is younger than the legal age for children to work in the country in which the facility is located. In no case may children under the age of 15 years be employed in the manufacturing process. Where the age for completing compulsory education is higher than the standard for the minimum age of employment, the age for completing education shall apply to this section.(7) There may be no form of forced labor of any kind, including slave labor, prison labor, indentured labor, or bonded labor, including forced overtime hours.(8) The work environment shall be safe and healthy and, at a minimum, be in compliance with relevant local, state, and national laws. If residential facilities are provided to workers, those facilities shall be safe and healthy as well.(9) There may be no discrimination in hiring, salary, benefits, performance evaluation, discipline, promotion, retirement, or dismissal on the basis of age, sex, pregnancy, maternity leave status, marital status, race, nationality, country of origin, ethnic origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, or political opinion.(10) No worker may be subjected to any physical, sexual, psychological, or verbal harassment or abuse, including corporal punishment, under any circumstances, including, but not limited to, retaliation for exercising their right to free speech and assembly.(11) No worker may be forced to use contraceptives or take pregnancy tests. No worker may be exposed to chemicals, including glues and solvents, that endanger reproductive health.(12) Contractors and bidders shall list the names and addresses of each subcontractor to be utilized in the performance of the contract, and list each manufacturing or other facility or operation of the contractor or subcontractor for performance of the contract. The list, which shall be maintained and updated to show any changes in subcontractors during the term of the contract, shall provide company names, owners or officers, addresses, telephone numbers, e-mail addresses, and the nature of the business association.(h) Any person who certifies as true any material matter pursuant to this section that they know to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor.(i) The provisions of this section, as amended by Section 2 of Chapter 711 of the Statutes of 2003, shall be in addition to any other provisions that authorize the prosecution and enforcement of local labor laws and may not be interpreted to prohibit a local prosecutor from bringing a criminal or civil action against an individual or business that violates the provisions of this section.(j) (1) The certification requirements set forth in subdivisions (a) and (f) do not apply to a credit card purchase of goods of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less.(2) The total amount of exemption authorized herein shall not exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per year for each company from which a state agency is purchasing goods by credit card. It shall be the responsibility of each state agency to monitor the use of this exemption and adhere to these restrictions on these purchases.SEC. 64. Section 10103.5 of the Public Contract Code is amended to read:10103.5. Work performed by prisoners pursuant to an order by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or by the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority is not subject to this chapter, provided that the total cost of a project for the construction of new, previously unoccupied prison facilities or additions to an existing facility shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) unless it is first approved by the State Public Works Board.SEC. 65. Section 10332 of the Public Contract Code is amended to read:10332. Any state agency that receives delegated authority to acquire goods shall be authorized, at a minimum, to make the following types of acquisitions:(a) Acquisitions not exceeding the dollar value established pursuant to Section 10330.(b) Acquisitions in any amount of goods available under an unexpired statewide or regional contract. Acquisitions of goods for which a valid statewide or regional contract is in effect may not be made, without the approval of the office, from a supplier other than the supplier with whom the state has a valid contract.(c) Acquisitions in any amount of goods that state agencies are required, by Section 2807 of the Penal Code, to acquire from the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority.(d) Acquisitions not exceeding the dollar amount, established pursuant to Section 10330, of goods designated in price schedules that the office has established with suppliers. Acquisitions not exceeding the dollar amount, established pursuant to Section 10330, of goods designated in price schedules may be made from a supplier other than the supplier specified on a price schedule if another supplier offers the same or equivalent goods at a price lower than the price established in the price schedule. The agency shall notify the office prior to making the acquisition. The acquisition may be made 48 hours after receipt of the notice by the office unless the office advises the agency that the goods to be acquired are not the same or equivalent to the goods specified on a price schedule.(e) Acquisitions not exceeding the dollar value, established pursuant to Section 10330, of goods that are available from the state warehouses but which the state agency can acquire from another supplier at a price lower than the price charged by the department. The agency shall notify the office prior to making the acquisition. The acquisition may be made 48 hours after receipt of the notice by the office unless the office advises the agency that the goods to be acquired are not the same or equivalent to the goods available from the state warehouses.SEC. 66. Section 12217 of the Public Contract Code is amended to read:12217. (a) State agency procurement and contracting officers, or their designees, from all agencies shall participate in annual mandatory training that is conducted by CalRecycle. The training may be web-based and shall provide a complete review of the benefits of SABRC purchases, how to locate qualifying products, how to report information, and how to explain benefits and requirements to other employees making purchasing decisions.(b) If a state agency does not meet SABRC purchasing requirements in each product category, CalRecycle shall report the state agency to the department.(c) In determining purchasing specifications, with the exception of any specifications that have been established to preserve the public health and safety, all state purchasing specifications shall be established in a manner that results in the maximum state purchase of recycled products.(d) (1) If a recycled product, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 12200, costs more than the same product made with virgin material, the state agency shall, if feasible, purchase fewer of those more costly products or apply the cost savings, if any, gained from buying other recycled products towards the purchase of those more costly products to meet the solid waste diversion goals of Section 41780.(2) If a recycled product, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 12200 has special performance requirements necessary for the protection of public safety, as defined by the Department of General Services, the state agency may purchase that product made with virgin material. For the purposes of this paragraph, public safety includes, but is not limited to, structural steel coatings, traffic paint applications, and roadway safety devices.(e) Each state agency shall establish purchasing practices that ensure the purchase of goods and materials that may be recycled or reused. Each state agency shall continue activities for the collection, separation, and recycling of recyclable materials and may appoint a recycling coordinator to assist in implementing this section. Alternatively, a state contract may require that the vendor take back the product for proper management after it has been used. Upon request by a state agency, CalRecycle shall offer advice and recommendations regarding products and situations in which a take-back requirement is appropriate.(f) To assist the state in meeting the requirements of this article, each state agency, and the department, in consultation with CalRecycle, may also establish recycled product-only bids, cooperative purchasing arrangements, or other mechanisms to meet the requirements for recycled products and to encourage the maximum state purchase of recycled products.(g) The department, in consultation with CalRecycle, shall review and revise the purchasing specifications and contract documents used by state agencies in order to eliminate restrictive specifications and discrimination against the purchase of remanufactured or recycled products and to ensure that they are drafted in a manner that results in the maximum state purchase of remanufactured recycled products. All contract provisions impeding the consideration of recycled products shall be deleted in favor of performance standards. Remanufactured products shall conform to performance standards to ensure they are essentially equivalent to new products that perform the same function.(h) (1) In order for state agencies to easily procure SABRC-compliant products, ensure their success in the program, and support the recycled content industry, the department and the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority shall prioritize the use of recycled content products.(2) The department shall continue to make products that meet the SABRC postconsumer minimum percentage requirements available through statewide contracts, and provide information to state agencies regarding contracted products that meet these requirements.(3) The California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority, in collaboration with CalRecycle, shall make every attempt to procure parts that meet the SABRC postconsumer minimum percentage requirements for the products it creates and sells to state agencies.(i) Any state agency that is required to submit an SABRC report to CalRecycle, pursuant to Section 12211, is subject to a review conducted by CalRecycle or its designee.SEC. 67. Section 4953 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4953. (a) The department shall utilize inmates and wards assigned to conservation camps in performing fire prevention, fire control, and other work of the department. At times it deems proper and on terms it deems wise, the department may enter into contracts or cooperative agreements with a public agency, local, state, or federal, or with a qualified nonprofit organization that has a demonstrated ability to plan, implement, and complete a conservation project and meets other criteria, as determined by the department, for the performance of other conservation projects that are appropriate for those public agencies or that nonprofit organization under policies that shall be established by the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority. The charge for the service shall be determined by the director. All these contracts are subject to the approval of the director and the Director of General Services.(b) For the purposes of this section, “nonprofit organization” means any California corporation exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), or 501(c)(5) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.SEC. 68. Section 42989.2.1 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:42989.2.1. (a) Mattresses manufactured by the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority and purchased by the state or its agencies are exempt from collecting and remitting the mattress recycling charge and from any end-of-life financial incentive established by the mattress recycling organization for used mattresses pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 42987.1. Mattresses sold subject to this exemption shall be permanently marked or labeled to clearly identify them as having been manufactured by the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority.(b) The California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority shall, upon the request of the department or mattress recycling organization, report how many mattresses it manufactured and sold in the previous fiscal year and the customers that purchased those mattresses. To the extent reasonably possible, the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority, upon request by the department or the mattress recycling organization, shall report how its customers are disposing of their used mattresses and estimate what percentage are being landfilled and recycled or renovated.(c) The mattress recycling organization’s obligation under this chapter to recycle mattresses manufactured by the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority is limited to any services for which the authority has specifically contracted with the mattress recycling organization for that purpose. The mattress recycling organization may refuse to recycle or pay financial incentives on any California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority-manufactured mattress that is exempted from collecting and remitting the mattress recycling fee.(d) Mattresses exempt pursuant to subdivision (a) and all discards of mattresses previously manufactured by the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority shall be excluded from the goal-setting analysis required by Section 42987.5.SEC. 69. Section 99243 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:99243. (a) The Controller, in cooperation with the department and the operators, shall design and adopt a uniform system of accounts and records, from which the operators shall prepare and submit annual reports of their operation to transportation planning agencies, county transportation commissions, or the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board having jurisdiction over them and to the Controller within seven months after the end of the fiscal year. The report shall contain underlying data from audited financial statements prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, if this data is available. The report shall specify (1) the amount of revenue generated from each source and its application for the prior fiscal year, and (2) the data necessary to determine which section, with respect to Sections 99268.1, 99268.2, 99268.3, 99268.4, 99268.5, and 99268.9, the operator is required to be in compliance in order to be eligible for funds under this article.(b) (1) For the purposes of the State Transit Assistance Program, which is governed by Sections 99312 to 99314.9, inclusive, the Controller shall provide a mechanism for each transportation planning agency, county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board to report to the Controller those operators within its jurisdiction that are STA-eligible operators, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 99312.2.(2) The mechanism shall require each transportation planning agency, county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board to report to the Controller those STA-eligible operators within its jurisdiction that are both:(A) Eligible to claim local transportation funds under either Article 4 (commencing with Section 99260) or Article 8 (commencing with Section 99400), or under both articles.(B) A public transportation operator, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 99312.2.(3) The Controller shall rely upon that verification to determine whether or not an operator is an STA-eligible operator pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 99312.2. The transportation planning agency, county transportation commission, and the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board shall provide this information to the Controller within seven months after the end of each fiscal year.(c) As a supplement to the annual report prepared pursuant to subdivision (a), each operator shall include an estimate of the amount of revenues to be generated from each source and its proposed application for the next fiscal year, and a report on the extent to which it has contracted with the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority, including the nature and dollar amounts of all contracts entered into during the reporting period and proposed for the next reporting period.(d) The Controller shall instruct the county auditor to withhold payments from the fund to an operator that has not submitted its annual report to the Controller within the time specified by subdivision (a).(e) In establishing the uniform system of accounts and records, the Controller shall include the data required by the United States Department of Transportation and the department.(f) Notwithstanding any other law or any regulation, including any California Code of Regulations provision, the City of El Segundo, the City of Huntington Beach, the City of Inglewood, the City of Long Beach, or the City of South Lake Tahoe may select, for purposes of this chapter, on a one-time basis, a fiscal year that does not end on June 30. After the city has sent a written notice to the Secretary of Transportation and the Controller that the city has selected a fiscal year other than one ending on June 30, the fiscal year selected by the city shall be its fiscal year for all reports required by the state under this chapter.SEC. 70. Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code is amended to read:1095. The director shall permit the use of any information in the director’s possession to the extent necessary for any of the following purposes, and may require reimbursement for all direct costs incurred in providing any and all information specified in this section, except information specified in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive:(a) To enable the director or the director’s representative to carry out their responsibilities under this code.(b) To properly present a claim for benefits.(c) To acquaint a worker or their authorized agent with the worker’s existing or prospective right to benefits.(d) To furnish an employer or their authorized agent with information to enable the employer to fully discharge their obligations or safeguard their rights under this division or Division 3 (commencing with Section 9000).(e) To enable an employer to receive a reduction in contribution rate.(f) To enable federal, state, or local governmental departments or agencies, subject to federal law, to verify or determine the eligibility or entitlement of an applicant for, or a recipient of, public social services provided pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or Part A of Subchapter IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.), and state or federal subsidies offered through the California Health Benefit Exchange provided pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code, when the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of public social services.(g) To enable county administrators of general relief or assistance, or their representatives, to determine entitlement to locally provided general relief or assistance, when the determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of general relief or assistance.(h) To enable state or local governmental departments or agencies to seek criminal, civil, or administrative remedies in connection with the unlawful application for, or receipt of, relief provided under Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code or to enable the collection of expenditures for medical assistance services pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000) of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(i) To provide any law enforcement agency with the name, address, telephone number, birth date, social security number, physical description, and names and addresses of present and past employers, of any victim, suspect, missing person, potential witness, or person for whom a felony arrest warrant has been issued, when a request for this information is made by any investigator or peace officer as defined by Sections 830.1 and 830.2 of the Penal Code, or by any federal law enforcement officer to whom the Attorney General has delegated authority to enforce federal search warrants, as defined under Sections 60.2 and 60.3 of Title 28 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended, and when the requesting officer has been designated by the head of the law enforcement agency and requests this information in the course of and as a part of an investigation into the commission of a crime when there is a reasonable suspicion that the crime is a felony and that the information would lead to relevant evidence. The information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, and to the extent the information is available and accessible within the constraints and configurations of existing department records. Any person who receives any information under this subdivision shall make a written report of the information to the law enforcement agency that employs the person, for filing under the normal procedures of that agency.(1) This subdivision shall not be construed to authorize the release to any law enforcement agency of a general list identifying individuals applying for or receiving benefits.(2) The department shall maintain records pursuant to this subdivision only for periods required under regulations or statutes enacted for the administration of its programs.(3) This subdivision shall not be construed as limiting the information provided to law enforcement agencies to that pertaining only to applicants for, or recipients of, benefits.(4) The department shall notify all applicants for benefits that release of confidential information from their records will not be protected should there be a felony arrest warrant issued against the applicant or in the event of an investigation by a law enforcement agency into the commission of a felony.(j) To provide public employee retirement systems in California with information relating to the earnings of any person who has applied for or is receiving a disability income, disability allowance, or disability retirement allowance, from a public employee retirement system. The earnings information shall be released only upon written request from the governing board specifying that the person has applied for or is receiving a disability allowance or disability retirement allowance from its retirement system. The request may be made by the chief executive officer of the system or by an employee of the system so authorized and identified by name and title by the chief executive officer in writing.(k) To enable the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement in the Department of Industrial Relations to seek criminal, civil, or administrative remedies in connection with the failure to pay, or the unlawful payment of, wages pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1 of Division 2 of, and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of, the Labor Code.(l) To enable federal, state, or local governmental departments or agencies to administer child support enforcement programs under Part D of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 651 et seq.).(m) To provide federal, state, or local governmental departments or agencies with wage and claim information in its possession that will assist those departments and agencies in the administration of the Victims of Crime Program or in the location of victims of crime who, by state mandate or court order, are entitled to restitution that has been or can be recovered.(n) To provide federal, state, or local governmental departments or agencies with information concerning any individuals who are or have been:(1) Directed by state mandate or court order to pay restitution, fines, penalties, assessments, or fees as a result of a violation of law.(2) Delinquent or in default on guaranteed student loans or who owe repayment of funds received through other financial assistance programs administered by those agencies. The information released by the director for the purposes of this paragraph shall not include unemployment insurance benefit information.(o) To provide an authorized governmental agency with any and all relevant information that relates to any specific workers’ compensation insurance fraud investigation. The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations. For purposes of this subdivision, “authorized governmental agency” means the district attorney of any county, the office of the Attorney General, the Contractors State License Board, the Department of Industrial Relations, and the Department of Insurance. An authorized governmental agency may disclose this information to the State Bar of California, the Medical Board of California, or any other licensing board or department whose licensee is the subject of a workers’ compensation insurance fraud investigation. This subdivision shall not prevent any authorized governmental agency from reporting to any board or department the suspected misconduct of any licensee of that body.(p) To enable the Director of Consumer Affairs, or the director’s representative, to access unemployment insurance quarterly wage data on a case-by-case basis to verify information on school administrators, school staff, and students provided by those schools who are being investigated for possible violations of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 94800) of Part 59 of Division 10 of Title 3 of the Education Code.(q) To provide employment tax information to the tax officials of Mexico, if a reciprocal agreement exists. For purposes of this subdivision, “reciprocal agreement” means a formal agreement to exchange information between national taxing officials of Mexico and taxing authorities of the State Board of Equalization, the Franchise Tax Board, and the Employment Development Department. Furthermore, the reciprocal agreement shall be limited to the exchange of information that is essential for tax administration purposes only. Taxing authorities of the State of California shall be granted tax information only on California residents. Taxing authorities of Mexico shall be granted tax information only on Mexican nationals.(r) To enable city and county planning agencies to develop economic forecasts for planning purposes. The information shall be limited to businesses within the jurisdiction of the city or county whose planning agency is requesting the information, and shall not include information regarding individual employees.(s) To provide the State Department of Developmental Services with wage and employer information that will assist in the collection of moneys owed by the recipient, parent, or any other legally liable individual for services and supports provided pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 4775) of Division 4.5 of, and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 7200) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 7 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code.(t) To provide the State Board of Equalization with employment tax information that will assist in the administration of tax programs. The information shall be limited to the exchange of employment tax information essential for tax administration purposes to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations.(u) This section shall not be construed to authorize or permit the use of information obtained in the administration of this code by any private collection agency.(v) The disclosure of the name and address of an individual or business entity that was issued an assessment that included penalties under Section 1128 or 1128.1 shall not be in violation of Section 1094 if the assessment is final. The disclosure may also include any of the following:(1) The total amount of the assessment.(2) The amount of the penalty imposed under Section 1128 or 1128.1 that is included in the assessment.(3) The facts that resulted in the charging of the penalty under Section 1128 or 1128.1.(w) To enable the Contractors State License Board to verify the employment history of an individual applying for licensure pursuant to Section 7068 of the Business and Professions Code.(x) To provide any peace officer with the Division of Investigation in the Department of Consumer Affairs information pursuant to subdivision (i) when the requesting peace officer has been designated by the Chief of the Division of Investigation and requests this information in the course of and as part of an investigation into the commission of a crime or other unlawful act when there is reasonable suspicion to believe that the crime or act may be connected to the information requested and would lead to relevant information regarding the crime or unlawful act.(y) To enable the Labor Commissioner of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement in the Department of Industrial Relations to identify, pursuant to Section 90.3 of the Labor Code, unlawfully uninsured employers. The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations.(z) To enable the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in accordance with the requirements of Section 84754.5 of the Education Code, to obtain quarterly wage data, commencing January 1, 1993, on students who have attended one or more community colleges, to assess the impact of education on the employment and earnings of students, to conduct the annual evaluation of district-level and individual college performance in achieving priority educational outcomes, and to submit the required reports to the Legislature and the Governor. The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations.(aa) To enable the Public Employees’ Retirement System to seek criminal, civil, or administrative remedies in connection with the unlawful application for, or receipt of, benefits provided under Part 3 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(ab) To enable the State Department of Education, the University of California, the California State University, and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, pursuant to the requirements prescribed by the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), to obtain quarterly wage data, commencing July 1, 2010, on students who have attended their respective systems to assess the impact of education on the employment and earnings of those students, to conduct the annual analysis of district-level and individual district or postsecondary education system performance in achieving priority educational outcomes, and to submit the required reports to the Legislature and the Governor. The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations.(ac) To provide the Agricultural Labor Relations Board with employee, wage, and employer information, for use in the investigation or enforcement of the Alatorre-Zenovich-Dunlap-Berman Agricultural Labor Relations Act of 1975 (Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 1140) of Division 2 of the Labor Code). The information shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations.(ad) (1) To enable the State Department of Health Care Services, the California Health Benefit Exchange, the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, and county departments and agencies to obtain information regarding employee wages, California employer names and account numbers, employer reports of wages and number of employees, and disability insurance and unemployment insurance claim information, for the purpose of:(A) Verifying or determining the eligibility of an applicant for, or a recipient of, state health subsidy programs, limited to the Medi-Cal program provided pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the Medi-Cal Access Program provided pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15810) of Part 3.3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, when the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the state health subsidy programs referenced in this subparagraph.(B) Verifying or determining the eligibility of an applicant for, or a recipient of, state or federal subsidies offered through the California Health Benefit Exchange, provided pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code, including federal tax credits and cost-sharing assistance pursuant to the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), when the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the California Health Benefit Exchange.(C) Verifying or determining the eligibility of employees and employers for health coverage through the Small Business Health Options Program, provided pursuant to Section 100502 of the Government Code, when the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the Small Business Health Options Program.(2) The information provided under this subdivision shall be subject to the requirements of, and provided to the extent permitted by, federal law and regulations, including Part 603 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(ae) To provide any peace officer with the Investigations Division of the Department of Motor Vehicles with information pursuant to subdivision (i), when the requesting peace officer has been designated by the Chief of the Investigations Division and requests this information in the course of, and as part of, an investigation into identity theft, counterfeiting, document fraud, or consumer fraud, and there is reasonable suspicion that the crime is a felony and that the information would lead to relevant evidence regarding the identity theft, counterfeiting, document fraud, or consumer fraud. The information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, and to the extent the information is available and accessible within the constraints and configurations of existing department records. Any person who receives any information under this subdivision shall make a written report of the information to the Investigations Division of the Department of Motor Vehicles, for filing under the normal procedures of that division.(af) Until January 1, 2020, to enable the Department of Finance to prepare and submit the report required by Section 13084 of the Government Code that identifies all employers in California that employ 100 or more employees who receive benefits from the Medi-Cal program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code). The information used for this purpose shall be limited to information obtained pursuant to Section 11026.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and from the administration of personal income tax wage withholding pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) and the disability insurance program and may be disclosed to the Department of Finance only for the purpose of preparing and submitting the report and only to the extent not prohibited by federal law.(ag) To provide, to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, the Student Aid Commission with wage information in order to verify the employment status of an individual applying for a Cal Grant C award pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 69439 of the Education Code.(ah) To enable the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to obtain quarterly wage data of former inmates who have been incarcerated within the prison system in order to assess the impact of rehabilitation services or the lack of these services on the employment and earnings of these former inmates. Quarterly data for a former inmate’s employment status and wage history shall be provided for a period of one year, three years, and five years following release. The data shall only be used for the purpose of tracking outcomes for former inmates in order to assess the effectiveness of rehabilitation strategies on the wages and employment histories of those formerly incarcerated. The information shall be provided to the department to the extent not prohibited by federal law.(ai) To enable federal, state, or local government departments or agencies, or their contracted agencies, subject to federal law, including the confidentiality, disclosure, and other requirements set forth in Part 603 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations, to evaluate, research, or forecast the effectiveness of public social services programs administered pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or Part A of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.), when the evaluation, research, or forecast is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the public social services programs.(aj) (1) To enable the California Workforce Development Board, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Department of Rehabilitation, the State Department of Social Services, the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the Department of Industrial Relations, the Division of Apprenticeship Standards, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority, the Employment Training Panel, and a chief elected official, as that term is defined in Section 3102(9) of Title 29 of the United States Code, to access any relevant quarterly wage data necessary for the evaluation and reporting of their respective program performance outcomes as required and permitted by various local, state, and federal laws pertaining to performance measurement and program evaluation, including responsibilities arising under Sections 14013, 14033, and 14042 of this code and Sections 2032 and 2038 of the Streets and Highways Code; the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128); the workforce metrics dashboard pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 14013; the Adult Education Block Grant Program consortia performance metrics pursuant to Section 84920 of the Education Code; the economic and workforce development program performance measures pursuant to Section 88650 of the Education Code; and the California Community Colleges Economic and Workforce Development Program performance measures established in Part 52.5 (commencing with Section 88600) of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. Disclosures under this subdivision shall comply with federal and state privacy laws that require the informed consent from program participants of city and county departments or agencies that administer public workforce development programs for the evaluation, research, or forecast of their programs regardless of local, state, or federal funding source.(2) The department shall do all of the following:(A) Consistent with this subdivision, develop the minimum requirements for granting a request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision regardless of local, state, or federal funding source.(B) Develop a standard application for submitting a request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision.(C) Approve or deny a request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision, or request additional information, within 20 business days of receiving the standard application. The entity submitting the application shall respond to any request by the department for additional information within 20 business days of receipt of the department’s request. Within 30 calendar days of receiving any additional information, the department shall provide a final approval or denial of the request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision. Any approval, denial, or request for additional information shall be in writing. Denials shall identify the reason or category of reasons for the denial.(D) Make publicly available on the department’s internet website all of the following:(i) The minimum requirements for granting a request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision, as developed pursuant to subparagraph (A).(ii) The standard application developed pursuant to subparagraph (B).(iii) The timeframe for information request determinations by the department, as specified in subparagraph (C).(iv) Contact information for assistance with requests for disclosures of information authorized by this subdivision.(v) Any denials for requests of disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision, including the reason or category of reasons for the denial.(ak) (1) To provide any peace officer with the Enforcement Branch of the Department of Insurance with both of the following:(A) Information provided pursuant to subdivision (i) that relates to a specific insurance fraud investigation involving automobile insurance fraud, life insurance and annuity fraud, property and casualty insurance fraud, and organized automobile insurance fraud. That information shall be provided when the requesting peace officer has been designated by the Chief of the Fraud Division of the Department of Insurance and requests the information in the course of, and as part of, an investigation into the commission of a crime or other unlawful act when there is reasonable suspicion to believe that the crime or act may be connected to the information requested and would lead to relevant information regarding the crime or unlawful act.(B) Employee, wage, employer, and state disability insurance claim information that relates to a specific insurance fraud investigation involving health or disability insurance fraud when the requesting peace officer has been designated by the Chief of the Fraud Division of the Department of Insurance and requests the information in the course of, and as part of, an investigation into the commission of a crime or other unlawful act when there is reasonable suspicion to believe that the crime or act may be connected to the information requested and would lead to relevant information regarding the crime or unlawful act.(2) To enable the State Department of Developmental Services to obtain quarterly wage data and unemployment insurance claim data of consumers served by that department for the purposes of monitoring, program operation and evaluation, and evaluating employment outcomes, of the Employment First Policy, established pursuant to Section 4869 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(3) The information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations.(al) To provide the CalSavers Retirement Savings Board with employer tax information for use in the administration of, and to facilitate compliance with, the CalSavers Retirement Savings Trust Act (Title 21 (commencing with Section 100000) of the Government Code). The information should be limited to the tax information the director deems appropriate, and shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal laws and regulations.(am) (1) To enable the Joint Enforcement Strike Force as established by Section 329, and the Labor Enforcement Task Force, as established pursuant to Assembly Bill 1464 of the 2011–12 Regular Session (Chapter 21 of the Statutes of 2012), to carry out their duties.(2) To provide an agency listed in subdivision (a) of Section 329 intelligence, data, including confidential tax and fee information, documents, information, complaints, or lead referrals pursuant to Section 15925 of the Government Code.(an) To enable the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education to access and use any relevant quarterly wage data necessary to perform the labor market outcome reporting data match pursuant to Section 94892.6 of the Education Code. The information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by state and federal laws and regulations.(ao) To enable the Civil Rights Department to carry out its duties, including ensuring compliance with Section 12999 of the Government Code. Conduct related to information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall not be subject to the criminal sanctions set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 1094.(ap) To enable the Cradle-to-Career Data System, as established by Article 2 (commencing with Section 10860) of Chapter 8.5 of Part 7 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, to receive employment and earnings data and, as required by the director pursuant to Section 10871 of the Education Code, to provide information to the data system, to the extent permissible by federal laws and regulations.(aq) (1) To enable the State Air Resources Board to receive unpaid final tax assessment information issued to a port drayage motor carrier or short-haul trucking service for misclassification of a commercial driver, for use in the administration of, and to facilitate compliance with, Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 39680) of Part 2 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code. The information shall be limited to the tax information the director deems appropriate for disclosure and shall be provided only to the extent permitted by federal laws and regulations.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:(A) “Commercial driver” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2810.4 of the Labor Code.(B) “Port drayage motor carrier” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2810.4 of the Labor Code.(C) “Short-haul trucking service” has the same meaning as defined in Section 39682 of the Health and Safety Code.(ar) To enable the California Health Benefit Exchange to do all of the following:(1) Notify an employer that an employee has been determined eligible for advance payments of the premium tax credit and cost-sharing reductions and has enrolled in a qualified health plan through the California Health Benefit Exchange, as required pursuant to Section 155.310(h) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The information shall include available employer contact information, including addresses, email addresses, and telephone numbers.(2) Assist the California Health Benefit Exchange or the State Department of Health Care Services in determining eligibility for the insurance affordability programs administered by those state agencies. The determination of eligibility or entitlement shall include efforts by either the California Health Benefit Exchange or the State Department of Health Care Services to assist those individuals in obtaining that coverage, including informing those individuals potentially eligible for health coverage of the availability of that coverage.(3) Verify if a consumer has been offered affordable comprehensive employer-sponsored health care coverage pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code and the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148). The information shall include available employer contact information, including addresses, email addresses, and telephone numbers.(4) Upon the request of either the California Health Benefit Exchange or the State Department of Health Care Services, the department shall also provide to the relevant state agency information on new applicants for unemployment insurance, state disability insurance, and paid family leave. The California Health Benefit Exchange and the State Department of Health Care Services shall at all times request from the department the minimum amount of information necessary from the information listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 100503.9 of the Government Code, to accomplish the purposes of Section 100503.9 of the Government Code. The information shall be sent in a manner that is encrypted or otherwise complies with government data security best practices, as specified by the California Health Benefit Exchange. This information shall only be used for the purposes of outreach and marketing.(5) This subdivision shall become operative no later than September 1, 2023.SEC. 71. Section 1808.4 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:1808.4. (a) For all of the following persons, the person’s home address that appears in a record of the department is confidential if the person requests the confidentiality of that information:(1) Attorney General.(2) State Public Defender.(3) A Member of the Legislature.(4) An active or retired judge or court commissioner.(5) A district attorney.(6) A public defender.(7) An attorney employed by the Department of Justice, the office of the State Public Defender, or a county office of the district attorney or public defender.(8) A city attorney, city prosecutor, or an attorney who submits verification from their public employer that the attorney represents the city in matters that routinely place the attorney in personal contact with persons under investigation for, charged with, or convicted of, committing criminal acts, if that attorney is employed by a city attorney or city prosecutor.(9) A nonsworn police dispatcher.(10) A child abuse investigator or social worker, working in child protective services within a social services department.(11) An active or retired peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.(12) An employee of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, or the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority specified in Sections 20403 and 20405 of the Government Code.(13) A nonsworn employee of a city police department, a county sheriff’s office, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, a federal, state, or local detention facility, or a local juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or home, who submits agency verification that, in the normal course of the employee’s employment, the employee controls or supervises inmates or is required to have a prisoner in the employee’s care or custody.(14) A county counsel assigned to child abuse cases.(15) An investigator employed by the Department of Justice, a county district attorney, or a county public defender.(16) A member of a city council.(17) A member of a board of supervisors.(18) A federal prosecutor, criminal investigator, or National Park Service Ranger working in this state.(19) An active or retired city enforcement officer engaged in the enforcement of the Vehicle Code or municipal parking ordinances.(20) An employee of a trial court.(21) A psychiatric social worker employed by a county.(22) A police or sheriff department employee designated by the chief of police of the department or the sheriff of the county as being in a sensitive position. A designation pursuant to this paragraph shall, for purposes of this section, remain in effect for three years subject to additional designations that, for purposes of this section, shall remain in effect for additional three-year periods.(23) A state employee in one of the following classifications:(A) Licensing-Registration Examiner, Department of Motor Vehicles.(B) Motor Carrier Specialist I, Department of the California Highway Patrol.(C) Museum Security Officer and Supervising Museum Security Officer.(D) Licensing Program Analyst, State Department of Social Services.(24) (A) The spouse or child of a person listed in paragraphs (1) to (23), inclusive, regardless of the spouse’s or child’s place of residence.(B) The surviving spouse or child of a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, if the peace officer died in the line of duty.(C) The surviving spouse or child of a judge or court commissioner, if the judge or court commissioner died in the performance of their duties.(D) (i) Subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) do not apply if the person listed in those subparagraphs was convicted of a crime and is on active parole or probation.(ii) For requests made on or after January 1, 2011, the person requesting confidentiality for their spouse or child listed in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) shall declare, at the time of the request for confidentiality, whether the spouse or child has been convicted of a crime and is on active parole or probation.(iii) Neither the listed person’s employer nor the department shall be required to verify, or be responsible for verifying, that a person listed in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) was convicted of a crime and is on active parole or probation.(E) (i) The department shall discontinue holding a home address confidential pursuant to this subdivision for a person specified in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) who is the child or spouse of a person described in paragraph (4), (9), (11), (13), or (22) if the child or spouse is convicted of a felony in this state or is convicted of an offense in another jurisdiction that, if committed in California, would be a felony.(ii) The department shall comply with this subparagraph upon receiving notice of a disqualifying conviction from the agency that employs or formerly employed the parent or spouse of the convicted person, or as soon as the department otherwise becomes aware of the disqualifying conviction.(b) The confidential home address of a person listed in subdivision (a) shall not be disclosed, except to any of the following:(1) A court.(2) A law enforcement agency.(3) The State Board of Equalization.(4) An attorney in a civil or criminal action that demonstrates to a court the need for the home address, if the disclosure is made pursuant to a subpoena.(5) A governmental agency to which, under any law, information is required to be furnished from records maintained by the department.(c) (1) A record of the department containing a confidential home address shall be open to public inspection, as provided in Section 1808, if the address is completely obliterated or otherwise removed from the record.(2) Following termination of office or employment, a confidential home address shall be withheld from public inspection for three years, unless the termination is the result of conviction of a criminal offense or a request to remove confidentiality protections has been made by an employing agency pursuant to paragraph (6). If the termination or separation is the result of the filing of a criminal complaint, a confidential home address shall be withheld from public inspection during the time in which the terminated individual may file an appeal from termination, while an appeal from termination is ongoing, and until the appeal process is exhausted, after which confidentiality shall be at the discretion of the employing agency if the termination or separation is upheld. Upon reinstatement to an office or employment, the protections of this section are available.(3) With respect to a retired peace officer, the peace officer’s home address shall be withheld from public inspection permanently upon request of confidentiality at the time the information would otherwise be opened. The home address of the surviving spouse or child listed in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (24) of subdivision (a) shall be withheld from public inspection for three years following the death of the peace officer.(4) The department shall inform a person who requests a confidential home address what agency the individual whose address was requested is employed by or the court at which the judge or court commissioner presides.(5) With respect to a retired judge or court commissioner, the retired judge or court commissioner’s home address shall be withheld from public inspection permanently upon request of confidentiality at the time the information would otherwise be opened. The home address of the surviving spouse or child listed in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (24) of subdivision (a) shall be withheld from public inspection for three years following the death of the judge or court commissioner.(6) Following a termination of employment, the terminated individual’s employing agency may request that the department remove the confidentiality protections of this section for the terminated individual if no appeal to the termination is filed or if the termination or separation is upheld. The employing agency shall certify in its request to the department that no appeal to the termination has been filed or that the termination or separation has been upheld. If the terminated individual files an appeal from termination, the individual’s confidential home address shall be withheld from public inspection while the appeal from termination is ongoing and until the appeal process is exhausted. The department shall comply with a request made pursuant to this paragraph within 45 days of receipt. This paragraph shall not apply to terminations of employment resulting from the filing of a criminal complaint.(d) A violation of subdivision (a) by the disclosure of the confidential home address of a peace officer, as specified in paragraph (11) of subdivision (a), a nonsworn employee of the city police department or county sheriff’s office, a judge or court commissioner, as specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), or the spouses or children of these persons, including, but not limited to, the surviving spouse or child listed in subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (24) of subdivision (a), that results in bodily injury to the peace officer, employee of the city police department or county sheriff’s office, judge or court commissioner, or the spouses or children of these persons is a felony.SEC. 72. Section 5072 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:5072. (a) Any person described in Section 5101 may also apply for a set of “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” license plates, and the department shall issue those special license plates in lieu of the regular license plates. The “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” plates shall be distinct from other existing license plates by the inclusion of a well within the portion of the license plate that has the alpha-numeric sequence. The well may be placed in any position within that portion of the license plate. A heart shape, a five-pointed star, a hand shape, a plus-sign shape, shall be imprinted within the well itself. However, for purposes of processing the alpha-numeric sequence, the symbol within the well shall be read as a blank within the alpha-numeric sequence. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall cooperate with representatives of the California Highway Patrol and the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority to design the final shape and dimension of the symbols for these license plates.(b) An applicant for a license plate described in subdivision (a) may choose to either accept a license plate character sequence assigned by the department that includes one of the four symbols or request a specialized license plate character sequence determined by the applicant that includes one of the four symbols, in accordance with instructions which shall be provided by the department.(c) In addition to the regular fees for an original registration, a renewal of registration, or a transfer of registration, the following “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” license plate fees shall be paid:(1) Notwithstanding Section 5106, for those specialized license plates whose character sequence is determined by the license owner or applicant:(A) Fifty dollars ($50) for the initial issuance of the plates. These plates shall be permanent and shall not be required to be replaced.(B) Forty dollars ($40) for each renewal of registration which includes the continued display of the plates.(C) Fifteen dollars ($15) for transfer of the plates to another vehicle.(D) Thirty-five dollars ($35) for replacement plates, if the plates become damaged or unserviceable.(2) For those specialized license plates whose character sequence is assigned by the department:(A) Twenty dollars ($20) for the initial issuance of the plates. These plates shall be permanent and shall not be required to be replaced.(B) The legally allowed fee for renewal plus fifteen dollars ($15) for each renewal of registration, which includes the continued display of the plates.(C) Fifteen dollars ($15) for transfer of the plates to another vehicle.(D) Twenty dollars ($20) for replacement plates, if the plates become damaged or unserviceable.(d) When payment of renewal fees is not required as specified in Section 4000, or when the person determines to retain the “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” license plates upon sale, trade, or other release of the vehicle upon which the plates have been displayed, the person shall notify the department and the person may retain the plates.(e) The revenue derived from the additional special fees provided in this section, less costs incurred by the department, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and local law enforcement for developing and administering this license plate program pursuant to this section, shall be deposited in the Child Health and Safety Fund, created pursuant to Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 18285) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and, when appropriated by the Legislature shall be available for the purposes specified in that chapter.(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the additional special fees specified in subdivision (e) are not used to replace existing appropriation levels in the 1991–92 Budget Act.SEC. 73. Section 755 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:755. (a) A person placed on probation by the juvenile court or adjudged to be a ward of the juvenile court may be permitted by order of the court to reside in a county other than the county of their legal residence, and the court shall retain jurisdiction over that person.(b) If a ward of the juvenile court is permitted to reside in a county other than the county of their legal residence, the ward may be placed under the supervision of the probation officer of the county of actual residence, with the consent of the probation officer. The ward shall comply with the instructions of the probation officer and upon failure to do so shall be returned to the county of their legal residence for further hearing and order of the court.(c) This section applies to wards discharged to probation supervision pursuant to Section 875.SEC. 74. Section 786 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:786. (a) If a person who has been alleged or found to be a ward of the juvenile court satisfactorily completes (1) an informal program of supervision pursuant to Section 654.2, (2) probation under Section 725, or (3) a term of probation for any offense, the court shall order the petition dismissed. The court shall order sealed all records pertaining to the dismissed petition in the custody of the juvenile court, and in the custody of law enforcement agencies, the probation department, or the Department of Justice. Defense counsel for the minor shall not be ordered to seal their records. The court shall send a copy of the order to each agency and official named in the order, direct the agency or official to seal its records, and specify a date by which the sealed records shall be destroyed. If a record contains a sustained petition rendering the person ineligible to own or possess a firearm until 30 years of age pursuant to Section 29820 of the Penal Code, then the date the sealed records shall be destroyed is the date upon which the person turns 33 years of age. Each agency and official named in the order shall seal the records in its custody as directed by the order, shall advise the court of its compliance, and, after advising the court, shall seal the copy of the court’s order that was received. The court shall also provide notice to the person and the person’s counsel that it has ordered the petition dismissed and the records sealed in the case. The notice shall include an advisement of the person’s right to nondisclosure of the arrest and proceedings, as specified in subdivision (b).(b) Upon the court’s order of dismissal of the petition, the arrest and other proceedings in the case shall be deemed not to have occurred and the person who was the subject of the petition may reply accordingly to an inquiry by employers, educational institutions, or other persons or entities regarding the arrest and proceedings in the case.(c) (1) For purposes of this section, satisfactory completion of an informal program of supervision or another term of probation described in subdivision (a) shall be deemed to have occurred if the person has no new findings of wardship or conviction for a felony offense or a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude during the period of supervision or probation and if the person has not failed to substantially comply with the reasonable orders of supervision or probation that are within their capacity to perform. The period of supervision or probation shall not be extended solely for the purpose of deferring or delaying eligibility for dismissal of the petition and sealing of the records under this section.(2) An unfulfilled order or condition of restitution, including a restitution fine that can be converted to a civil judgment under Section 730.6 or an unpaid restitution fee shall not be deemed to constitute unsatisfactory completion of supervision or probation under this section.(d) A court shall not seal a record or dismiss a petition pursuant to this section if the petition was sustained based on the commission of an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 that was committed when the individual was 14 years of age or older unless the finding on that offense was dismissed or was reduced to a misdemeanor or to a lesser offense that is not listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707.(e) If a person who has been alleged to be a ward of the juvenile court has their petition dismissed by the court, whether on the motion of the prosecution or on the court’s own motion, or if the petition is not sustained by the court after an adjudication hearing, the court shall order sealed all records pertaining to the dismissed petition in the custody of the juvenile court, and in the custody of law enforcement agencies, the probation department, or the Department of Justice. The court shall send a copy of the order to each agency and official named in the order, direct the agency or official to seal its records, and specify a date by which the sealed records shall be destroyed. Each agency and official named in the order shall seal the records in its custody as directed by the order, shall advise the court of its compliance, and, after advising the court, shall seal the copy of the court’s order that was received. The court shall also provide notice to the person and the person’s counsel that it has ordered the petition dismissed and the records sealed in the case. The notice shall include an advisement of the person’s right to nondisclosure of the arrest and proceedings, as specified in subdivision (b).(f) (1) The court may, in making its order to seal the record and dismiss the instant petition pursuant to this section, include an order to seal a record relating to, or to dismiss, any prior petition or petitions that have been filed or sustained against the individual and that appear to the satisfaction of the court to meet the sealing and dismissal criteria otherwise described in this section.(2) An individual who has a record that is eligible to be sealed under this section may ask the court to order the sealing of a record pertaining to the case that is in the custody of a public agency other than a law enforcement agency, the probation department, or the Department of Justice, and the court may grant the request and order that the public agency record be sealed if the court determines that sealing the additional record will promote the successful reentry and rehabilitation of the individual.(g) (1) A record that has been ordered sealed by the court under this section may be accessed, inspected, or utilized only under any of the following circumstances:(A) By the prosecuting attorney, the probation department, or the court for the limited purpose of determining whether the minor is eligible and suitable for deferred entry of judgment pursuant to Section 790 or is ineligible for a program of supervision as defined in Section 654.3.(B) By the court for the limited purpose of verifying the prior jurisdictional status of a ward who is petitioning the court to resume its jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388.(C) If a new petition has been filed against the minor for a felony offense, by the probation department for the limited purpose of identifying the minor’s previous court-ordered programs or placements, and in that event solely to determine the individual’s eligibility or suitability for remedial programs or services. The information obtained pursuant to this subparagraph shall not be disseminated to other agencies or individuals, except as necessary to implement a referral to a remedial program or service, and shall not be used to support the imposition of penalties, detention, or other sanctions upon the minor.(D) Upon a subsequent adjudication of a minor whose record has been sealed under this section and a finding that the minor is a person described by Section 602 based on the commission of a felony offense, by the probation department, the prosecuting attorney, counsel for the minor, or the court for the limited purpose of determining an appropriate juvenile court disposition. Access, inspection, or use of a sealed record as provided under this subparagraph shall not be construed as a reversal or modification of the court’s order dismissing the petition and sealing the record in the prior case.(E) Upon the prosecuting attorney’s motion, made in accordance with Section 707, to initiate court proceedings to determine whether the case should be transferred to a court of criminal jurisdiction, by the probation department, the prosecuting attorney, counsel for the minor, or the court for the limited purpose of evaluating and determining if such a transfer is appropriate. Access, inspection, or use of a sealed record as provided under this subparagraph shall not be construed as a reversal or modification of the court’s order dismissing the petition and sealing the record in the prior case.(F) By the person whose record has been sealed, upon their request and petition to the court to permit inspection of the records.(G) By the probation department of any county to access the records for the limited purpose of meeting federal Title IV-B and Title IV-E compliance.(H) The child welfare agency of a county responsible for the supervision and placement of a minor or nonminor dependent may access a record that has been ordered sealed by the court under this section for the limited purpose of determining an appropriate placement or service that has been ordered for the minor or nonminor dependent by the court. The information contained in the sealed record and accessed by the child welfare worker or agency under this subparagraph may be shared with the court but shall in all other respects remain confidential and shall not be disseminated to any other person or agency. Access to the sealed record under this subparagraph shall not be construed as a modification of the court’s order dismissing the petition and sealing the record in the case.(I) By the prosecuting attorney for the evaluation of charges and prosecution of offenses pursuant to Section 29820 of the Penal Code.(J) By the Department of Justice for the purpose of determining if the person is suitable to purchase, own, or possess a firearm, consistent with Section 29820 of the Penal Code.(K) (i) A record that has been sealed pursuant to this section may be accessed, inspected, or utilized by the prosecuting attorney in order to meet a statutory or constitutional obligation to disclose favorable or exculpatory evidence to a defendant in a criminal case in which the prosecuting attorney has reason to believe that access to the record is necessary to meet the disclosure obligation. A request to access information in the sealed record for this purpose, including the prosecutor’s rationale for believing that access to the information in the record may be necessary to meet the disclosure obligation and the date by which the records are needed, shall be submitted by the prosecuting attorney to the juvenile court. The juvenile court shall notify the person having the sealed record, including the person’s attorney of record, that the court is considering the prosecutor’s request to access the record, and the court shall provide that person with the opportunity to respond, in writing or by appearance, to the request prior to making its determination. The juvenile court shall review the case file and records that have been referenced by the prosecutor as necessary to meet the disclosure obligation and any response submitted by the person having the sealed record. The court shall approve the prosecutor’s request to the extent that the court has, upon review of the relevant records, determined that access to a specific sealed record or portion of a sealed record is necessary to enable the prosecuting attorney to comply with the disclosure obligation. If the juvenile court approves the prosecuting attorney’s request, the court shall state on the record appropriate limits on the access, inspection, and utilization of the sealed record information in order to protect the confidentiality of the person whose sealed record is accessed pursuant to this subparagraph. A ruling allowing disclosure of information pursuant to this subdivision does not affect whether the information is admissible in a criminal or juvenile proceeding. This subparagraph does not impose any discovery obligations on a prosecuting attorney that do not already exist.(ii) This subparagraph shall not apply to juvenile case files pertaining to matters within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300.(L) If a new petition has been filed against the minor in juvenile court and the issue of competency is raised, by the probation department, the prosecuting attorney, counsel for the minor, and the court for the purpose of assessing the minor’s competency in the proceedings on the new petition. Access, inspection, or utilization of the sealed records is limited to any prior competency evaluations submitted to the court, whether ordered by the court or not, all reports concerning remediation efforts and success, all court findings and orders relating to the minor’s competency, and any other evidence submitted to the court for consideration in determining the minor’s competency, including, but not limited to, school records and other test results. The information obtained pursuant to this subparagraph shall not be disseminated to any other person or agency except as necessary to evaluate the minor’s competency or provide remediation services, and shall not be used to support the imposition of penalties, detention, or other sanctions on the minor. Access to the sealed record under this subparagraph shall not be construed as a modification of the court’s order dismissing the petition and sealing the record in the case.(M) A record that was sealed pursuant to this section that was generated in connection with the investigation, prosecution, or adjudication of a qualifying offense as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 679.10 of the Penal Code may be accessed by a judge or prosecutor for the limited purpose of processing a request of a victim or victim’s family member to certify victim helpfulness on the Form I-918 Supplement B certification or Form I-914 Supplement B declaration. The information obtained pursuant to this subparagraph shall not be disseminated to other agencies or individuals, except as necessary to certify victim helpfulness on the Form I-918 Supplement B certification or Form I-914 Supplement B declaration, and under no circumstances shall it be used to support the imposition of penalties, detention, or other sanctions upon an individual.(2) When a record has been sealed by the court based on a dismissed petition pursuant to subdivision (e), the prosecutor, within six months of the date of dismissal, may petition the court to access, inspect, or utilize the sealed record for the limited purpose of refiling the dismissed petition based on new circumstances, including, but not limited to, new evidence or witness availability. The court shall determine whether the new circumstances alleged by the prosecutor provide sufficient justification for accessing, inspecting, or utilizing the sealed record in order to refile the dismissed petition.(3) Access to, or inspection of, a sealed record authorized by paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not be deemed an unsealing of the record and shall not require notice to any other agency.(h) (1) This section does not prohibit a court from enforcing a civil judgment for an unfulfilled order of restitution ordered pursuant to Section 730.6. A minor is not relieved from the obligation to pay victim restitution, restitution fines, and court-ordered fines and fees because the minor’s records are sealed.(2) A victim or a local collection program may continue to enforce victim restitution orders, restitution fines, and court-ordered fines and fees after a record is sealed. The juvenile court shall have access to records sealed pursuant to this section for the limited purpose of enforcing a civil judgment or restitution order.(i) This section does not prohibit the State Department of Social Services from meeting its obligations to monitor and conduct periodic evaluations of, and provide reports on, the programs carried under federal Title IV-B and Title IV-E as required by Sections 622, 629 et seq., and 671(a)(7) and (22) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as implemented by federal regulation and state statute.(j) The Judicial Council shall adopt rules of court, and shall make available appropriate forms, providing for the standardized implementation of this section by the juvenile courts.SEC. 75. Section 788 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:788. (a) Notwithstanding Section 781, of this code or Section 1203.47 of the Penal Code, if a petition has been filed with a juvenile court to commence proceedings to adjudge a person a ward of the court, the county probation officer shall do either of the following once the person has reached 18 years of age:(1) If the person will not remain under the juvenile court’s delinquency jurisdiction, the county probation officer shall petition the court to seal the records relating to the person’s case that are in the custody of the juvenile court, probation officer, law enforcement agency, or any other private or public agency. The probation officer shall provide a copy of the petition to the minor and their counsel at least 30 days prior to filing the petition.(2) If the person will remain under the juvenile court’s delinquency jurisdiction, the county probation officer shall petition the court as specified in paragraph (1) no later than one year after the termination of the juvenile court’s delinquency jurisdiction.(b) All of the following shall not be sealed pursuant to this section:(1) A person’s juvenile court records relating to a case that was transferred from juvenile court to a court of criminal jurisdiction under Section 707.1 if the person was convicted in the court of criminal jurisdiction.(2) A person’s juvenile court records relating to an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 that was committed when the person was 14 years of age or older, unless that offense was dismissed or reduced to a misdemeanor or a lesser offense that is not listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707.(3) A person’s juvenile court records relating to an offense for which the person is required to register pursuant to Section 290.008 of the Penal Code.(c) If the court finds that the person has not been convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude after the juvenile court’s jurisdiction was terminated, it shall order sealed all records, papers, and exhibits in the person’s case that are in the custody of the juvenile court, law enforcement agency, probation department, Department of Justice, or any other private or public agency, including the juvenile court record, minute book entries, docket entries, and arrest records. The person’s defense counsel shall not be ordered to seal their records. The court shall send a copy of the order to each agency named in the order. Each agency shall seal the records in its custody as directed by the order, send a notice to the court that it has complied with the order, and seal the copy of the court’s order the agency received.(d) If the court has ordered the person’s records sealed, the proceedings of the sealed case shall be deemed never to have occurred and the person may properly reply accordingly to any inquiry about the events.(e) When the probation officer does not file a petition pursuant to this section, the probation officer shall notify, in writing, the person and their counsel of the reason for not filing the petition.(f) (1) A record that has been ordered sealed by the court under this section may be accessed, inspected, or utilized only under any of the following circumstances:(A) If the person who is the subject of the sealed records petitions the court to permit inspection of the records and the court grants inspection.(B) By the court for the limited purpose of verifying the prior jurisdictional status of a ward who is petitioning the court to resume its jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388.(C) (i) By the prosecuting attorney in order to meet a statutory or constitutional obligation to disclose favorable or exculpatory evidence to a defendant in a criminal case in which the prosecuting attorney has reason to believe that access to the record is necessary to meet the disclosure obligation. The prosecuting attorney shall submit a request to the juvenile court to access information in the sealed record for this purpose. The request shall include the prosecutor’s rationale for believing that access to the information in the record may be necessary to meet the disclosure obligation and the date by which the records are needed. The juvenile court shall notify the subject of the sealed records and their attorney of the prosecutor’s request and provide them with the opportunity to respond, in writing or by appearance, to the request. The court shall approve the prosecutor’s request if, upon review of the relevant records, it determines that access to a specific sealed record or portion of a sealed record is necessary to enable the prosecuting attorney to comply with the disclosure obligation. If the juvenile court approves the prosecuting attorney’s request, the court shall state on the record appropriate limits on the access, inspection, and utilization of the sealed records in order to protect the confidentiality of the subject of the sealed records. A court ruling allowing disclosure of information pursuant to this subdivision does not affect whether the information is admissible in a criminal or juvenile proceeding.(ii) This subparagraph does not impose any additional discovery obligations on a prosecuting attorney.(iii) This subparagraph does not apply to juvenile case files pertaining to matters within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300.(2) Access to, or inspection of, a sealed record authorized by this subdivision is not considered an unsealing of the record and does not require notice to any other agency.(g) (1) This section does not apply to records in the custody of the Department of Motor Vehicles relating to a conviction for an offense under the Vehicle Code or any local ordinance relating to the operation, stopping and standing, or parking of a vehicle if the record of the conviction would be a public record under Section 1808 of the Vehicle Code. However, if a court orders the record containing this conviction to be sealed under this section, and the department maintains a public record of the conviction, the court shall notify the department of the sealing.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, if the department is notified by the court of a sealing pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall allow access to its record of conviction only to the subject of the record and to insurers that have been granted requestor code numbers by the department. An insurer that has been given access to a record of conviction shall be given notice of the sealing when the record is disclosed. The insurer may use the information contained in the record for purposes of determining eligibility for insurance and insurance rates for the subject of the record. The insurer shall not use the information for any other purpose and shall not disclose it to any other person or agency.(h) A petition for sealing shall not be denied due to an unfulfilled order of restitution or restitution fine.(i) (1) This section does not prohibit a court from enforcing a civil judgment for an unfulfilled order of restitution obtained pursuant to Section 730.6. A person is not relieved from the obligation to pay victim restitution, a restitution fine, or a court-ordered fine because their records are sealed.(2) The juvenile court shall have access to any records sealed pursuant to this section for the limited purpose of enforcing a civil judgment or restitution order.(j) A court shall not grant relief under this section unless the prosecuting attorney has been given 15 days’ notice of the petition for sealing. The probation officer shall notify the prosecuting attorney when a petition is filed. If the prosecuting attorney fails to appear or object to the petition after receiving notice, the prosecuting attorney shall not move to set aside or otherwise appeal the grant of that petition.(k) Unless the court determines there is good cause to retain the juvenile court record, the court shall order the destruction of a person’s juvenile court records that are sealed pursuant to this section.(1) If the subject of the record was alleged or adjudged to be a person described by Section 601, the court shall order the destruction five years after the record was ordered sealed.(2) If the subject of the record was alleged or adjudged to be a person described by Section 602, the court shall order the destruction when the subject reaches 38 years of age. If the subject was found to be a person described in Section 602 because of the commission of an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 and was 14 years of age or older at the time of the offense, the records shall not be destroyed.(3) The court shall order any other agency in possession of sealed records to destroy its records five years after the records were ordered sealed.(l) The relief provided in this section does not preclude any other relief provided by law.SEC. 76. Section 16001.9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:16001.9. (a) All children placed in foster care, either voluntarily or after being adjudged a ward or dependent of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300, 601, or 602, shall have the rights specified in this section. These rights also apply to nonminor dependents in foster care, except when they conflict with nonminor dependents’ retention of all their legal decisionmaking authority as an adult. The rights are as follows:(1) To live in a safe, healthy, and comfortable home where they are treated with respect. If the child is an Indian child, to live in a home that upholds the prevailing social and cultural standards of the child’s Indian community, including, but not limited to, family, social, and political ties.(2) To be free from physical, sexual, emotional, or other abuse, corporal punishment, and exploitation.(3) To receive adequate and healthy food, adequate clothing, grooming and hygiene products, and an age-appropriate allowance. Clothing and grooming and hygiene products shall respect the child’s culture, ethnicity, and gender identity and expression.(4) To be placed in the least restrictive setting possible, regardless of age, physical health, mental health, sexual orientation, and gender identity and expression, juvenile court record, or status as a pregnant or parenting youth, unless a court orders otherwise.(5) To be placed with a relative or nonrelative extended family member if an appropriate and willing individual is available.(6) To not be locked in any portion of their foster care placement, unless placed in a community treatment facility.(7) To have a placement that utilizes trauma-informed and evidence-based de-escalation and intervention techniques, to have law enforcement intervention requested only when there is an imminent threat to the life or safety of a child or another person or as a last resort after other diversion and de-escalation techniques have been utilized, and to not have law enforcement intervention used as a threat or in retaliation against the child.(8) To not be detained in a juvenile detention facility based on their status as a dependent of the juvenile court or the child welfare services department’s inability to provide a foster care placement. If they are detained, to have all the rights afforded under the United States Constitution, the California Constitution, and all applicable state and federal laws.(9) To have storage space for private use.(10) To be free from unreasonable searches of personal belongings.(11) To be provided the names and contact information for social workers, probation officers, attorneys, service providers, foster youth advocates and supporters, Court Appointed Special Advocates (CASAs), and education rights holder if other than the parent or parents, and when applicable, representatives designated by the child’s Indian tribe to participate in the juvenile court proceeding, and to communicate with these individuals privately.(12) To visit and contact siblings, family members, and relatives privately, unless prohibited by court order, and to ask the court for visitation with the child’s siblings.(13) To make, send, and receive confidential telephone calls and other electronic communications, and to send and receive unopened mail, unless prohibited by court order.(14) To have social contacts with people outside of the foster care system, including, but not limited to, teachers, coaches, religious or spiritual community members, mentors, and friends. If the child is an Indian child, to have the right to have contact with tribal members and members of their Indian community consistent with the prevailing social and cultural conditions and way of life of the Indian child’s tribe.(15) To attend religious services, activities, and ceremonies of the child’s choice, including, but not limited to, engaging in traditional Native American religious practices.(16) To participate in extracurricular, cultural, racial, ethnic, personal enrichment, and social activities, including, but not limited to, access to computer technology and the internet, consistent with the child’s age, maturity, developmental level, sexual orientation, and gender identity and expression.(17) To have fair and equal access to all available services, placement, care, treatment, and benefits, and to not be subjected to discrimination or harassment on the basis of actual or perceived race, ethnic group identification, ancestry, national origin, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, mental or physical disability, or HIV status.(18) To have caregivers, child welfare and probation personnel, and legal counsel who have received instruction on cultural competency and sensitivity relating to sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, and best practices for providing adequate care to lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender children in out-of-home care.(19) To be placed in out-of-home care according to their gender identity, regardless of the gender or sex listed in their court, child welfare, medical, or vital records, to be referred to by the child’s preferred name and gender pronoun, and to maintain privacy regarding sexual orientation and gender identity and expression, unless the child permits the information to be disclosed, or disclosure is required to protect their health and safety, or disclosure is compelled by law or a court order.(20) To have child welfare and probation personnel and legal counsel who have received instruction on the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.) and on cultural competency and sensitivity relating to, and best practices for, providing adequate care to Indian children in out-of-home care.(21) To have recognition of the child’s political affiliation with an Indian tribe or Alaskan village, including a determination of the child’s membership or citizenship in an Indian tribe or Alaskan village; to receive assistance in becoming a member of an Indian tribe or Alaskan village in which the child is eligible for membership or citizenship; to receive all benefits and privileges that flow from membership or citizenship in an Indian tribe or Alaskan village; and to be free from discrimination based on the child’s political affiliation with an Indian tribe or Alaskan village.(22) (A) To access and receive medical, dental, vision, mental health, and substance use disorder services, and reproductive and sexual health care, with reasonable promptness that meets the needs of the child, to have diagnoses and services explained in an understandable manner, and to participate in decisions regarding health care treatment and services. This right includes covered gender affirming health care and gender affirming mental health care, and is subject to existing laws governing consent to health care for minors and nonminors and does not limit, add, or otherwise affect applicable laws governing consent to health care.(B) To view and receive a copy of their medical records to the extent they have the right to consent to the treatment provided in the medical record and at no cost to the child until they are 26 years of age.(23) Except in an emergency, to be free of the administration of medication or chemical substances, and to be free of all psychotropic medications unless prescribed by a physician, and in the case of children, authorized by a judge, without consequences or retaliation. The child has the right to consult with and be represented by counsel in opposing a request for the administration of psychotropic medication and to provide input to the court about the request to authorize medication. The child also has the right to report to the court the positive and adverse effects of the medication and to request that the court reconsider, revoke, or modify the authorization at any time.(24) (A) To have access to age-appropriate, medically accurate information about reproductive health care, the prevention of unplanned pregnancy, and the prevention and treatment of sexually transmitted infections.(B) At any age, to consent to or decline services regarding contraception, pregnancy care, and perinatal care, including, but not limited to, abortion services and health care services for sexual assault without the knowledge or consent of any adult.(C) At 12 years of age or older, to consent to or decline health care services to prevent, test for, or treat sexually transmitted diseases, including HIV, and mental health services, without the consent or knowledge of any adult.(25) At 12 years of age or older, to choose, whenever feasible and in accordance with applicable law, their own health care provider for medical, dental, vision, mental health, substance use disorder services, and sexual and reproductive health care, if payment for the service is authorized under applicable federal Medicaid law or other approved insurance, and to communicate with that health care provider regarding any treatment concerns or needs and to request a second opinion before being required to undergo invasive medical, dental, or psychiatric treatment.(26) To confidentiality of medical and mental health records, including, but not limited to, HIV status, substance use disorder history and treatment, and sexual and reproductive health care, consistent with existing law.(27) To attend school, to remain in the child’s school of origin, to immediate enrollment upon a change of school, to partial credits for any coursework completed, and to priority enrollment in preschool, after school programs, a California State University, and each community college district, and to receive all other necessary educational supports and benefits, as described in the Education Code.(28) To have access to existing information regarding the educational options available, including, but not limited to, the coursework necessary for career, technical, and postsecondary educational programs, and information regarding financial aid for postsecondary education, and specialized programs for current and former foster children available at the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges.(29) To attend Independent Living Program classes and activities, if the child meets the age requirements, and to not be prevented by caregivers from attending as a consequence or punishment.(30) To maintain a bank account and manage personal income, consistent with the child’s age and developmental level, unless prohibited by the case plan.(31) To work and develop job skills at an age-appropriate level, consistent with state law.(32) For children 14 to 17 years of age, inclusive, to receive a consumer credit report provided to the child by the social worker or probation officer on an annual basis from each of the three major credit reporting agencies, and to receive assistance with interpreting and resolving any inaccuracies.(33) To be represented by an attorney in juvenile court; to have an attorney appointed to advise the court of the child’s wishes, to advocate for the child’s protection, safety, and well-being, and to investigate and report to the court on legal interests beyond the scope of the juvenile proceeding; to speak to the attorney confidentially; and to request a hearing if the child feels their appointed counsel is not acting in their best interest or adequately representing their legal interests.(34) (A) To receive a notice of court hearings, to attend court hearings, to speak to the judge, to view and receive a copy of the court file, subject to existing federal and state confidentiality laws, and to object to or request the presence of interested persons during court hearings. If the child is an Indian child, to have a representative designated by the child’s Indian tribe be in attendance during hearings.(B) When a child is entitled to receive a copy of the court report, case plan, and transition to independent living plan (TILP), those items shall be provided in the child’s primary language.(35) To the confidentiality of all juvenile court records consistent with existing law.(36) To view and receive a copy of their child welfare records, juvenile court records, and educational records at no cost to the child until the child is 26 years of age, subject to existing federal and state confidentiality laws.(37) To be involved in the development of their own case plan, including placement decisions, and plan for permanency. This involvement includes, but is not limited to, the development of case plan elements related to placement and gender affirming health care, with consideration of the child’s gender identity. If the child is an Indian child, the case plan shall include protecting the essential tribal relations and best interests of the Indian child by assisting the child in establishing, developing, and maintaining political, cultural, and social relationships with the child’s Indian tribe and Indian community.(38) To review the child’s own case plan and plan for permanent placement if the child is 10 years of age or older, and to receive information about their out-of-home placement and case plan, including being told of changes to the plan.(39) To request and participate in a child and family team meeting, as follows:(A) Within 60 days of entering foster care, and every 6 months thereafter.(B) If placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program, or receiving intensive home-based services or intensive case coordination, or receiving therapeutic foster care services, to have a child and family team meeting at least every 90 days.(C) To request additional child and family team meetings to address concerns, including, but not limited to, placement disruption, change in service needs, addressing barriers to sibling or family visits, and addressing difficulties in coordinating services.(D) To have both informal and formal support people participate, consistent with state law.(40) (A) To be informed of these rights in an age and developmentally appropriate manner by the social worker or probation officer and to be provided a copy of the rights in this section at the time of placement, any placement change, and at least once every six months or at the time of a regularly scheduled contact with the social worker or probation officer.(B) For a child who speaks a primary language other than English, to be provided a copy of the child’s rights in the child’s primary language.(41) To be provided with contact information for the Community Care Licensing Division of the State Department of Social Services, the tribal authority approving a tribally approved home, and the State Foster Care Ombudsperson, at the time of each placement, and to contact any or all of these offices immediately upon request regarding violations of rights, to speak to representatives of these offices confidentially, and to be free from threats or punishment for making complaints.(b) The rights described in this section are broad expressions of the rights of children in foster care and are not exhaustive of all rights set forth in the United States Constitution and the California Constitution, federal and California statutes, and case law.(c) This section does not require, and shall not be interpreted to require, a foster care provider to take any action that would impair the health and safety of children in out-of-home placement.(d) The State Department of Social Services and each county welfare department are encouraged to work with the Student Aid Commission, the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges to receive information pursuant to paragraph (28) of subdivision (a).SEC. 77. Section 16527 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:16527. (a) The department shall establish a statewide hotline as the entry point for the Family Urgent Response System, which shall be available 24 hours a day, seven days a week, to respond to calls from a caregiver or current or former foster child or youth during moments of instability. Both of the following shall be available through this hotline:(1) Hotline workers who are trained in techniques for de-escalation and conflict resolution telephone response specifically for children or youth impacted by trauma.(2) Referrals to a county-based mobile response system, established pursuant to Section 16529, for further support and in-person response. Referrals shall occur as follows:(A) A warm handoff whereby the hotline worker establishes direct and live connection through a three-way call that includes the caregiver, child or youth, and county contact. The caregiver, child, or youth may decline the three-way contact with the county contact if they feel their situation has been resolved at the time of the call.(B) If a direct communication cannot be established pursuant to subparagraph (A), a referral directly to the community- or county-based service and a followup call to ensure that a connection to the caregiver, child, or youth occurs.(C) The hotline worker shall contact the caregiver and the child or youth within 24 hours after the initial call required under subparagraph (A) or (B) to offer additional support, if needed.(b) The statewide hotline shall maintain contact information for all county-based mobile response systems, based on information provided by counties, for referrals to local services, including, but not limited to, county-based mobile response and stabilization teams.(c) The department shall ensure that deidentified, aggregated data are collected regarding individuals served through the statewide hotline and county-based mobile response systems and shall publish a report on the department’s internet website by January 1, 2022, and annually by January 1 thereafter, in consultation with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, and the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California. The data shall be collected using automated procedures or other matching methods mutually agreed upon by the state and county agencies, including, but not limited to, the statewide child welfare automation management system, and shall include all of the following information:(1) The number of caregivers served through the hotline, separated by placement type and status as a current or former foster caregiver.(2) The number of current and former foster children or youth served through the hotline, separated by county agency type, current or former foster care status, age, gender, race, and whether the call was made by the caregiver or the child or youth.(3) The disposition of each call, including, but not limited to, whether mobile response and stabilization services were provided or a referral was made to other services.(4) County-based outcome data, including, but not limited to, placement stability, return into foster care, movement from child welfare to juvenile justice, and timeliness to permanency.(d) The department may meet the requirements of this section through contract with an entity with demonstrated experience in working with populations of children or youth who have suffered trauma and with capacity to provide a 24-hour-a-day, seven-day-a-week response that includes mediation, relationship preservation for the caregiver and the child or youth, and a family-centered and developmentally appropriate approach with the caregiver and the child or youth.(e) The department, in consultation with stakeholders, including current and former foster youth and caregivers, shall do all of the following:(1) Develop methods and materials for informing all caregivers and current or former foster children or youth about the statewide hotline, including a dissemination plan for those materials, which shall include, at a minimum, making those materials publicly available through the department’s internet website.(2) Establish protocols for triage and response.(3) Establish minimum education and training requirements for hotline workers.(4) Consider expanding the statewide hotline to include communication through electronic means, including, but not limited to, text messaging or email.(f) (1) The statewide hotline shall be operational no sooner than January 1, 2021, and on the same date as the county mobile response system created pursuant to this chapter.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the statewide hotline may operate sooner than January 1, 2021, or prior to the date that each county has created a county mobile response system, upon notification from each county to the department that the county satisfies one of the following requirements:(A) Has established a county mobile response system created pursuant to this chapter.(B) Has an alternative method to accept and respond to referrals from the statewide hotline pending the establishment of the county mobile response system.(g) The department shall assist, as needed, the State Department of Health Care Services in exercising its authority pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16528.SEC. 78. Section 16529 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:16529. (a) County child welfare, probation, and behavioral health agencies, in each county or region of counties as specified in subdivision (e), shall establish a joint county-based mobile response system that includes a mobile response and stabilization team for the purpose of providing supportive services to address situations of instability, preserve the relationship of the caregiver and the child or youth, develop healthy conflict resolution and relationship skills, promote healing as a family, and stabilize the situation.(b) In each county or region of counties, the county child welfare, probation, and behavioral health agencies, in consultation with other relevant county agencies, tribal representatives, caregivers, and current or former foster children or youth, shall submit a single, coordinated plan to the department that describes how the county-based mobile response system shall meet the requirements described in subdivision (c). The plan shall also describe all of the following:(1) How the county, or region of counties, will track and monitor calls.(2) Data collection efforts, consistent with guidance provided by the department, including, at a minimum, collection of data necessary for the report required pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16527.(3) Transitions from mobile response and stabilization services to ongoing services.(4) A process for identifying if the child or youth has an existing child and family team for coordinating with the child and family team to address the instability, and a plan for ongoing care to support that relationship in a trusting and healing environment.(5) A process and criteria for determining response.(6) The composition of the responders, including efforts to include peer partners and those with lived experience in the response team, whenever possible.(7) Both existing and new services that will be used to support the mobile response and stabilization services. County behavioral health departments that operate mobile crisis units may share resources between mobile crisis units and the mobile response system required pursuant to this chapter, at their discretion.(8) Response protocols for the child or youth in family-based and congregate care settings based on guidelines developed by the department, in consultation with stakeholders, pursuant to Section 16528. The response protocols shall ensure protections for children and youth to prevent placements into congregate care settings, psychiatric institutions, and hospital settings.(9) A process for identifying whether the child or youth has an existing behavioral health treatment plan and a placement preservation strategy, as described in Section 16010.7, and for coordinating response and services consistent with the plan and strategy.(10) A plan for the mobile response and stabilization team to provide supportive services in the least intrusive and most child, youth, and family friendly manner, such that mobile response and stabilization teams do not trigger further trauma to the child or youth.(c) A county-based mobile response system shall include all of the following:(1) Phone response at the county level that facilitates entry of the caregivers and current or former foster children or youth into mobile response services.(2) A process for determining when a mobile response and stabilization team will be sent, or when other services will be used, based on the urgent and critical needs of the caregiver, child, or youth.(3) A mobile response and stabilization team available 24 hours a day, seven days a week.(4) Ability to provide immediate, in-person, face-to-face response preferably within one hour, but not to exceed 3 hours in extenuating circumstances for urgent needs, or same-day response within 24 hours for nonurgent situations.(5) Utilization of individuals with specialized training in trauma of children or youth and the foster care system on the mobile response and stabilization team. Efforts should be made to include peer partners and those with lived experience in the response team, whenever possible.(6) Provision of in-home de-escalation, stabilization, and support services and supports, including all of the following:(A) Establishing in-person, face-to-face contact with the child or youth and caregiver.(B) Identifying the underlying causes of, and precursors to, the situation that led to the instability.(C) Identifying the caregiver interventions attempted.(D) Observing the child and caregiver interaction.(E) Diffusing the immediate situation.(F) Coaching and working with the caregiver and the child or youth in order to preserve the family unit and maintain the current living situation or create a healthy transition plan, if necessary.(G) Establishing connections to other county- or community-based supports and services to ensure continuity of care, including, but not limited to, linkage to additional trauma-informed and culturally and linguistically responsive family supportive services and youth and family wellness resources.(H) Following up after the initial face-to-face response, for up to 72 hours, to determine if additional supports or services are needed.(I) Identifying any additional support or ongoing stabilization needs for the family and making a plan for, or referral to, appropriate youth and family supportive services within the county.(7) A process for communicating with the county of jurisdiction and the county behavioral health agency regarding the service needs of the child or youth and caregiver provided that the child or youth is currently under the jurisdiction of either the county child welfare or the probation system.(d) County-based mobile response systems may be temporarily adapted to address circumstances associated with COVID-19, consistent with the Governor’s Proclamation of a State of Emergency, issued on March 4, 2020.(e) (1) Each county shall establish a mobile response system no sooner than January 1, 2021, and on the same date as the statewide hotline created under this chapter.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a county may establish a mobile response system, or an alternative method to accept and respond to referrals from the statewide hotline, pending the establishment of the county mobile response system, prior to January 1, 2021, in order to facilitate the early operation of the statewide hotline.(3) The county agencies described in subdivisions (a) and (b) may implement this section on a per-county basis or by collaborating with other counties to establish regional, cross-county mobile response systems. For counties implementing this section pursuant to a regional approach, a single plan, as described in subdivision (b), signed by all agency representatives, shall be submitted to the department and a lead county shall be identified.(4) Funds expended pursuant to this act shall be used to supplement, and not supplant, other existing funding for mobile response services described in this chapter.(5) A county or region of counties may receive an extension, not to exceed six months, to implement a mobile response system after January 1, 2021, upon submission of a written request, in a manner to be prescribed by the department, that includes a demonstration of actions to implement, progress towards implementation, and the county’s alternative method to accept and respond to referrals from the statewide hotline pending the establishment of the county mobile response system.(f) The creation and implementation of the Family Urgent Response System shall not infringe on entitlements or services provided pursuant to Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.) or the federal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis and Treatment services (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(r)).(g) The department, in collaboration with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, and the Chief Probation Officers of California, on an annual basis beginning on January 1, 2022, shall assess utilization and workload associated with implementation of the statewide hotline and mobile response and provide an update to the Legislature during budget hearings.SEC. 79. Section 18358.10 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:18358.10. Each foster family agency participating in this program shall enter into a contract or memorandum of understanding with the county and provide all of the following personnel and administrative and support services:(a) (1) Special attention to the selection and training of foster parents.(2) All participating intensive treatment foster care (ITFC) foster parents shall be provided with at least 40 hours of training in the care of emotionally disturbed children or children who have a serious behavioral problem before becoming an ITFC parent, and before placement of a child pursuant to this program, 32 hours of ongoing in-service training within the first 12 months after becoming a certified ITFC parent, and 12 hours of ongoing in-service training each year thereafter. Training shall include, but not be limited to, working with abused and neglected children, behavior de-escalation techniques, and cardiopulmonary resuscitation and first aid. All training shall be completed prior to the child’s placement in the home. In two-parent homes, placement may be made after one parent has completed 40 hours of training, provided that an additional 20 hours of ongoing in-service training are completed within 12 months after becoming an ITFC foster parent, and provided that the second parent has completed 40 hours of training and completes an additional 20 hours of training within the first six months of certification of the foster parent as an ITFC foster parent.(3) Upon approval of the county interagency review team or the county placing agency, the training requirements specified in paragraph (2) for a participating foster parent in this program may be waived for foster parents with prior experience that includes, but is not limited to, working for at least one year with emotionally disturbed children or children who have a serious behavioral problem.(4) Foster parents shall be provided with all necessary support services.(b) Caseloads for participating social work case managers that average eight children, except as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 18358.30.(c) The specific assignment to each certified family home of a trained support counselor with experience in residential treatment.(1) The support counselor shall have one of the following:(A) A bachelor’s degree in a social science related field and at least six months of experience in working with emotionally disturbed children or children who have a serious behavioral problem.(B) An associate degree in a social science related field and have at least one year’s experience in working with emotionally disturbed children or children who have a serious behavioral problem.(C) Upon approval of the county interagency review team or the county placing agency, the educational requirements may be waived for support counselors with at least two years of experience working with emotionally disturbed children or children who have a serious behavioral problem, and who demonstrate a combination of education, skills, and experience that meets the specific cultural and linguistic needs of the target population.(2) Each participating foster family agency shall provide each support counselor with 40 hours of training to include, but not be limited to, working with abused and neglected children, behavior de-escalation techniques, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, first aid, and developing treatment plans for emotionally disturbed children or children who have a serious behavioral problem. All training shall be completed prior to placing a child in a certified family home for which the support counselor is assigned responsibility. An additional 20 hours of ongoing in-service training is required within the first 12 months after becoming an ITFC support counselor.(3) Each support counselor shall provide support service to the child and the foster family. This service shall include, but not be limited to, structuring a safe environment for the child, collateral contacts, and any administrative or training functions necessary to implement the child’s needs and services plan. The child’s needs and services plan shall ensure that services meet the child’s needs and are appropriate to and consistent with the minimum level of service specified in Section 18358.30. The child’s individual needs and services plan shall be reviewed and approved by the certified foster parents.(d) Coordination services with local education agencies and the service provider’s nonpublic school, where applicable.(e) A 24-hour on call administrator who is available to respond to emergency situations.SEC. 80. Section 18358.20 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:18358.20. In addition to the requirements of Sections 18358.10 and 18358.15, any foster family agency that serves children under this program shall have a contract or memorandum of understanding with the county prior to accepting referrals of children. The contract or memorandum of understanding shall identify how the foster family agency will provide or arrange for the following services and activities:(a) An effective 24 hours a day, seven days a week social work emergency response service. The plan shall include the criteria for an in-person response and define the timeframe in which in-person response will be made.(b) Mental health coverage available as needed for mental health emergencies.(c) Development of a service plan approved by the placing county for each child within one month of placement that thoroughly assesses the unique needs and strengths of the child in the life domains specified in paragraph (1), and identifies the necessary services and supports to improve outcomes.(1) For purposes of this section, “life domains” means the framework of important aspects of a child’s life to be assessed in the child’s service plan, including, but not limited to, the following:(A) Safety.(B) Emotional and psychological well-being.(C) Behavioral.(D) Family and living situation.(E) Social and recreational.(F) Cultural and spiritual.(G) Educational and vocational.(H) Health.(I) Developmental.(2) Applicable services and supports associated with each life domain, which may include, but are not limited to, the following:(A) The child’s need for mental health service interventions.(B) Individual or group mental health treatment services.(C) Psychotropic medication and monitoring.(D) Behavior analysis, positive behavioral interventions, and behavioral modification techniques.(E) Interventions designed to prevent entry or reentry into the juvenile justice system.(F) Family reunification services, parent training, or other support services needed to return the child home, or when that is not possible, to establish, reestablish, or reinforce a lifelong relationship with a caring adult.(G) Family finding services to support and enhance access to lifelong permanent relationships with relative and nonrelative kin.(H) Targeted life skills training and resources to ensure appropriate access to social and recreational resources and relationships, as needed to support the achievement of important developmental milestones.(I) Mentoring or developing of positive adult relationships.(J) Education supports, as needed to maintain and enhance the child’s educational success and stability.(K) Education liaison services as needed to support the child’s education in the least restrictive environment.(L) Respite care.(M) Support counselors.(N) Case management to ensure appropriate and effective coordination of activities and resources as identified in the needs and services plan.(d) A system for recruiting, training, and supervising qualified in-home support counselors.(e) A system of record keeping that documents the delivery of services and supports to each child. This documentation shall be summarized and submitted on an annual basis to the county. Each agency shall report the type and cost of the services delivered.(f) Written policies and procedures on how the program will be structured to ensure the safety of the child, how suicide attempts, runaways, sexual acting out or, violent and assaultive behavior will be handled, and what will occur to reduce or eliminate future episodes.(g) Written procedures on frequency of treatment plan review, modifications of treatment plans, and the role of the foster family and the child’s parents in development of the treatment plan.(h) A process for recruitment, selection and training of foster parents, including respite foster parents. The training curriculum shall include the following areas, at a minimum:(1) Alternative forms of discipline.(2) Child growth and development.(3) Behavior management techniques.(4) Differential needs and treatment of children.(5) Behavior de-escalation techniques.(i) Arranging for the provision of respite care services and frequency of respite care.(j) Social work staffing. Social workers shall have a master’s degree consistent with subdivision (e) of Section 1506 of the Health and Safety Code, and shall have at least one year of experience working with seriously emotionally disturbed children or children who have a serious behavioral problem.(k) Other staff or contract services to be utilized in service delivery, the tasks and responsibilities of those individuals, and the training they will receive.(l) An evaluation component that includes quarterly reporting to the department of the following data, by age group. The department shall publish the data annually.(1) Number of children placed under this chapter.(2) Number of prior foster care placements for each child prior to entering the ITFC program.(3) Outcomes for children referred to the program, including:(A) Percentage of children discharged to a more intensive program.(B) Percentage of children discharged to a less restrictive program, short of permanency.(C) Percentage of children who drop down an ITFC level.(D) Percentage of children discharged to reunification with a parent or guardian.(E) Percentage of children discharged to adoption.(F) Percentage of children discharged to kin guardianship.(G) Percentage of children discharged to other permanent outcome.(H) Percentage of children hospitalized.(I) Number of ITFC families in which a child was placed.(J) Percentage of children continuing in placement.(m) A plan for surveying placing counties annually to ascertain and report to the department on the following:(1) Quality of services provided.(2) Progress toward treatment goals.SEC. 81. Section 18358.30 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:18358.30. (a) Rates for foster family agency programs participating under this chapter shall be exempt from the current AFDC-FC foster family agency ratesetting system.(b) Rates for foster family agency programs participating under this chapter shall be set according to the appropriate service and rate level based on the level of services provided to the eligible child and the certified foster family. For an eligible child placed from a group home program, the service and rate level shall not exceed the rate paid for group home placement. For an eligible child assessed by the county interagency review team or county placing agency as at imminent risk of group home placement or psychiatric hospitalization, the appropriate service and rate level for the child shall be determined by the interagency review team or county placing agency at time of placement. In all of the service and rate levels, the foster family agency programs shall:(1) Provide social work services with average caseloads not to exceed eight children per worker, except that social worker average caseloads for children in Service and Rate Level E shall not exceed 12 children per worker.(2) Pay an amount not less than two thousand one hundred dollars ($2,100) per child per month to the certified foster parent or parents.(3) Perform activities necessary for the administration of the programs, including, but not limited to, training, recruitment, certification, and monitoring of the certified foster parents.(4) (A) (i) Provide a minimum average range of service per month for children in each service and rate level in a participating foster family agency, represented by paid employee hours incurred by the participating foster family agency, by the in-home support counselor to the eligible child and the certified foster parents depending on the needs of the child and according to the following schedule:ServiceIn-Home SupportandCounselor HoursRate LevelPer MonthA98-114 hoursB81-97 hoursC64-80 hoursD47-63 hours(ii) Children placed at Service and Rate Level E shall receive behavior de-escalation and other support services on a flexible, as needed, basis from an in-home support counselor. The foster family agency shall provide one full-time in-home support counselor for every 20 children placed at this level.(B) (i) For the interim period beginning July 1, 2012, through December 31, 2016, inclusive, only the following modified service and rate levels to support modified in-home support counselor hours per month shall apply:ServiceIn-Home SupportandCounselor HoursRate LevelPer MonthLevel I81-114 hoursLevel II47-80 hoursLevel IIILess than 47 hours(ii) Children placed at Service and Rate Level III shall receive behavior de-escalation and other support services on a flexible, as needed, basis from an in-home support counselor. The foster family agency shall provide one full-time in-home support counselor for every 20 children placed at this level.(C) When the interagency review team or county placing agency and the foster family agency agree that alternative services are in the best interests of the child, the foster family agency may provide or arrange for services and supports allowable under California’s foster care program in lieu of in-home support services required by subparagraphs (A) and (B). These services and supports may include, but need not be limited to, activities in the Multidimensional Treatment Foster Care (MTFC) program.(c) The department or placing county, or both, may review the level of services provided by the foster family agency program. If the level of services actually provided are less than those required by subdivision (b) for the child’s service and rate level, the rate shall be adjusted to reflect the level of service actually provided, and an overpayment may be established and recovered by the department.(d) (1) On and after July 1, 1998, the standard rate schedule of service and rate levels shall be:ServiceFiscal Yearand1998-99Rate LevelStandard RateA$3,957B$3,628C$3,290D$2,970E$2,639(2) For the interim period beginning July 1, 2012, through December 31, 2016, inclusive, only the following modified service and rate levels to support the modified standard rate schedule shall apply:ServiceandRate LevelStandard RateLevel I$5,581Level II$4,798Level III$4,034(3) (A) On and after July 1, 1999, the standardized schedule of rates shall be adjusted by an amount equal to the California Necessities Index computed pursuant to Section 11453, rounded to the nearest dollar. The resultant amounts shall constitute the new standardized rate schedule, subject to further adjustment pursuant to subparagraph (B), for foster family agency programs participating under this chapter.(B) In addition to the adjustment in subparagraph (A), commencing January 1, 2000, the standardized schedule of rates shall be increased by 2.36 percent, rounded to the nearest dollar. The resultant amounts shall constitute the new standardized rate schedule for foster family agency programs participating under this chapter.(4) (A) Beginning with the 2000–01 fiscal year, the standardized schedule of rates shall be adjusted annually by an amount equal to the California Necessities Index computed pursuant to Section 11453, subject to the availability of funds. The resultant amounts, rounded to the nearest dollar, shall constitute the new standard rate schedule for foster family agency programs participating under this chapter.(B) Effective October 1, 2009, the rates identified in this subdivision shall be reduced by 10 percent. The resulting amounts shall constitute the new standardized schedule of rates.(5) Notwithstanding paragraphs (3) and (4), the rate identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall be adjusted on July 1, 2013, and each July 1 thereafter through July 1, 2016, inclusive, by an amount equal to the California Necessities Index computed pursuant to Section 11453.(e) (1) Rates for foster family agency programs participating under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) shall not exceed Service and Rate Level A at any time during an eligible child’s placement. An eligible child may be initially placed in a participating intensive foster care program at any one of the five Service and Rate Levels A to E, inclusive, and thereafter placed at any level, either higher or lower, not to exceed a total of six months at any level other than Service and Rate Level E, unless it is determined to be in the best interests of the child by the child’s county interagency review team or county placing agency and the child’s certified foster parents. The child’s county interagency placement review team or county placement agency may, through a formal review of the child’s placement, extend the placement of an eligible child in a service and rate level higher than Service and Rate Level E for additional periods of up to six months each.(2) Rates for foster family agency programs participating under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) shall not exceed Service and Rate Level I at any time during an eligible child’s placement. An eligible child may be initially placed in a participating intensive foster care program at any one of the three Service and Rate Levels I to III, inclusive, and thereafter placed at any level, either higher or lower, not to exceed a total of six months at any level other than Service and Rate Level III, unless it is determined to be in the best interests of the child by the child’s county interagency review team or county placing agency, foster family agency, and the child’s certified foster parents. The child’s county interagency placement review team or county placement agency, through a formal review of the child’s placement, may extend the placement of an eligible child in a service and rate level higher than Service and Rate Level III for additional periods of up to six months each.(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the rate paid to participating foster family agency programs shall decrease as the child’s need for services from the foster family agency decreases. The foster family agency shall notify the placing county and the department of the reduced services and the pilot classification model, and the rate shall be reduced accordingly.(g) It is the intent of the Legislature to prohibit any duplication of public funding. Therefore, social worker services, payments to certified foster parents, administrative activities, and the services of in-home support counselors that are funded by another public source shall not be counted in determining whether the foster family agency program has met its obligations to provide the items listed in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4) of subdivision (b). The department shall work with other potentially affected state departments to ensure that duplication of payment or services does not occur.(h) It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services, in collaboration with county placing agencies and ITFC providers and other stakeholders, develop and implement an integrated system that provides for the appropriate level of placement and care, support services, and mental health treatment services to foster children served in these programs.(i) Beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.(j)  Notwithstanding subdivisions (d) and (e), the department shall implement a new interim rate structure for the period beginning January 1, 2017, to December 31, 2024, inclusive. The rate shall reflect the appropriate level of placement and address the need for specialized health care, support services, and mental health treatment services for foster children served in these programs.SEC. 82. Section 18360.10 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:18360.10. (a) Each licensed foster family agency or county operating a public delivery model intensive services foster care program shall engage in both of the following:(1) Targeted selection and specialized training of intensive services foster care resource families used to provide care and supervision to eligible children placed in an intensive services foster care program.(2) Placement matching between eligible children with intensive services foster care resource families.(b) In addition to the training requirements for resource families set forth in Section 16519.5 of this code and in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, intensive services foster care resource family training shall be a condition for participating in the intensive services foster care program, and conform to the following:(1) (A) Preplacement training for intensive services foster care resource families shall be at least 40 hours and shall be completed prior to the placement of an eligible child, unless the intensive services foster care resource family meets the condition of paragraph (5). Training hours may be satisfied, in part or in whole, by either of the following:(i) Twelve hours may be satisfied through the training required by paragraph (13) of subdivision (g) of Section 16519.5 or, for licensed foster family homes and certified family homes of foster family agencies, the preplacement training received pursuant to Section 1529.2 of the Health and Safety Code.(ii) For an intensive services foster care resource parent who is also a health care professional, preplacement training hours may be satisfied on an hour-by-hour basis by the training hours necessary to obtain or maintain their licensure or certification.(B) Ongoing training for intensive services foster care resource families shall be at least 24 hours within 12 months of the placement of an eligible child, and 12 hours for each year thereafter, which may be satisfied, in part or in whole, by either of the following:(i) Eight hours may be satisfied through the training required by paragraph (14) of subdivision (g) of Section 16519.5 or, for licensed foster family homes and certified family homes of foster family agencies, the training received pursuant to Section 1529.2 of the Health and Safety Code.(ii) For an intensive services foster care resource parent who is also a health care professional, ongoing training hours may be satisfied on an hour-by-hour basis by the training hours necessary to obtain or maintain their licensure or certification.(2) In a two-parent intensive services foster care resource family, placement of an eligible child may be made after one parent has completed the preplacement training required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), followed by the 24 hours of ongoing training required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), provided that the second parent has completed 20 hours of the preplacement training required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) prior to the placement of an eligible child and the remaining 20 hours of the preplacement training required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) within 12 months of placement of an eligible child. The second parent shall not be required to complete the 24 hours of ongoing training required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1). Thereafter, each parent shall complete the 12 hours of ongoing training required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).(3) Any preplacement or ongoing training hours required by paragraphs (1) and (2) that are satisfied with training hours obtained pursuant to Section 16519.5 of this code or Section 1529.2 of the Health and Safety Code shall not waive the requirement to receive training necessary to meet the needs of a specific eligible child.(4) The 40 hours of preplacement training required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) shall include, but not be limited to, information relating to working with children who have experienced trauma, behavior de-escalation techniques, and cardiopulmonary resuscitation and first aid. The preplacement training may be customized to each intensive services foster care resource family based on the populations of children the family intends to serve. Additional preplacement training subject matter may be required by the county placing agency depending on the special needs of an eligible child to be placed with the intensive services foster care resource family.(5) An intensive services foster care resource family that has not completed the training required in this subdivision may accept an eligible child, or retain a child identified as an eligible child subsequent to placement, under the following conditions:(A) (i) In a one-parent intensive services foster care resource family, the intensive services foster care resource parent completes the 40 hours of preplacement training required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) within 120 days after the placement, or identification, of an eligible child.(ii) In a two-parent intensive services foster care resource family, the first parent completes the 40 hours of preplacement training required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) within 120 days after the placement, or identification, of an eligible child, and the second intensive services foster care resource parent completes the initial 20 hours of preplacement training within 180 days from the placement, or identification, of an eligible child and the remaining 20 hours of the preplacement training within 12 months of placement, or identification, of an eligible child. The second parent shall not be required to complete the 24 hours of ongoing training required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).(B) Placement, or identification, of an eligible child is made pursuant to the level of care rate protocol in order to meet the urgent placement needs of a child.(C) The county placing agency shall provide or arrange for any necessary service and support to a child in a resource family pending the family’s transition to an intensive services foster care resource family or a placement change.(c) (1) A licensed foster family agency or county operating an intensive services foster care program shall provide all of the following:(A) (i) Necessary core services and supports that are identified in the individual needs and services plan and that constitute care and supervision, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 11460, and core services, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 11463.(ii) Core services and support may be provided either directly by the licensed foster family agency or county or secured through agreements with other agencies.(iii) Each licensed foster family agency or county operating an intensive services foster care program shall arrange for the services needed by each child for which the child meets the eligibility criteria under applicable publicly funded programs, including, but not limited to, mental health, education, and health services.(iv) A licensed foster family agency shall describe its intensive services foster care program model in the program statement required pursuant to Section 1506.1 of the Health and Safety Code, including by identifying a 24-hour on-call administrator or designee, identifying the staff delivering core services and supports, and describing the manner in which core services and supports are delivered.(B) Necessary professional and paraprofessional staff.(C) Social work staff to manage cases of eligible children, consistent with the requirements set forth in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.(2) (A) A licensed foster family agency or county operating an intensive services foster care program may employ client support staff, as appropriate, who have experience working with children, youth, and families with special needs.(B) Client support staff shall have at least one of the following:(i) A minimum of a bachelor’s degree and six months of experience in working with children who have serious emotional or behavioral needs, or children who have special needs, including, but not limited to, intensive medical needs.(ii) A minimum of an associate’s degree and one year of experience in working with children who have serious emotional or behavioral needs, or children who have special needs, including, but not limited to, intensive medical needs.(iii) The department may waive the educational requirements described in clauses (i) and (ii) for client support staff who have direct client supervision with at least two years of experience working with children who have serious emotional or behavioral needs, or children who have special needs, including, but not limited to, intensive medical needs, and who have demonstrated a combination of education, skills, and experience that meets the specific needs of the target population, including, but not limited to, cultural and linguistic needs.(C) (i) Client support staff shall receive at least 40 hours of training that includes, but is not limited to, information relating to working with children who have experienced trauma, behavior de-escalation techniques, cardiopulmonary resuscitation and first aid, and implementing individual needs and services plans for children who have serious emotional or behavioral needs or children who have special needs, including, but not limited to, intensive medical needs. A client support staff shall complete all training prior to an eligible child being placed in an intensive services foster care resource family home for which the client support staff is assigned responsibility.(ii) Client support staff shall complete 20 hours of ongoing in-service training within the first 12 months after becoming an intensive services foster care client support staff.(D) Each client support staff shall provide support services to the child and the intensive services foster care resource family to implement the child’s individual needs and services plan that is appropriate. The client support staff shall review the child’s individual needs and services plan with the intensive services foster care resource parents and the child and family team, as needed.(3) If an eligible child is a child with special health care needs, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 17710, support professionals may be employed as staff or contractors operating within the scope of practice of their license or certification to implement the child’s individual needs and services plan and individualized health care plan, as approved by the county placing agency and informed by the child and family team, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501, or the individualized health care plan team, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 17710.(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (3), training hours may be satisfied for intensive services foster care client support staff caring for children with special health care needs on an hour-by-hour basis by the training received pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17731, or as required by the licensing board within their scope of practice.SEC. 83. Section 18999.93 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:18999.93. (a) (1) Subject to an appropriation in the 2021 Budget Act for purposes of this chapter, the C.R.I.S.E.S. Grant Pilot Program established pursuant to Section 18999.91 shall be administered by the department.(2) (A) The department shall award grants to eligible grantees, as determined by the department, based on grant eligibility criteria developed in partnership with the stakeholder workgroup.(B) For purposes of this paragraph, an eligible grantee is a city, county, or tribe, or a department of a city, county, or tribe, including, but not limited to, departments of social services, disability services, health services, public health, or behavioral health. Law enforcement agencies and organizations are not eligible grantees.(3) Each grantee shall receive a minimum award of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per year.(4) (A) Funds awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be utilized to create and strengthen community-based alternatives to law enforcement to lessen the reliance on law enforcement agencies as first responders to crisis situations unrelated to a fire department or emergency medical service response.(B) Community-based alternatives may include, but are not limited to, providing mobile crisis response teams or community para-medicine programs. Community-based alternatives shall not include law enforcement officers or agencies as first responders or coresponders.(5) The department shall prioritize grantees that propose interventions that serve historically marginalized populations and that serve communities with a demonstrated need for community-based alternatives to law enforcement, as evidenced by metrics, including, a high record of police use of force, a high volume of civilian complaints, high rates of imprisonment, and racial profiling.(b) (1) Grantees shall award 90 percent or more of the grant funds to one or more qualifying community-based organizations, to create and strengthen community-based alternatives to law enforcement as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a). No more than 10 percent of the grant funds shall be used to support program administration of the grantee.(2) Grantees shall publicly solicit partnerships with community-based organizations. This public solicitation shall include, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) Issuing a public notice and invitation to create a partnership to establish a program pursuant to this chapter.(B) Inviting letters of intent from community-based organizations.(C) Convening public meetings to hear questions, concerns, and suggestions from the community that would inform the development of the program.(3) Grantees shall prioritize the awarding of program funds to qualified community-based organizations that demonstrate the capacity to lead the proposed program and demonstrate experience providing community-based alternatives to law enforcement or civilian crisis response in the communities listed in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a). This includes, but is not limited to, the ability to do any of the following:(A) Respond to emergency calls.(B) Provide treatment, screening, and assessment.(C) Provide stabilization and de-escalation services.(D) Coordinate with health, social services, and other support services, as needed.(E) Maintain relationships with relevant community partners, including a range of community organizers, and medical, behavioral health, and crisis providers.(4) A grantee and the community-based organization that receives funds may collaborate on program planning and implementation of community-based alternatives to law enforcement, including, but not limited to, any of the following:(A) Local stakeholder engagement.(B) Mechanisms for response requests.(C) Crisis response activities.(D) Crisis response followup, including coordination with local services and supports, tracking service delivery data, and submitting grant reports.(c) A grantee shall report at least annually to the department on the use of program funding, which shall include data reporting on clients served and program outcomes, as determined by the department in consultation with stakeholder workgroup.(d) (1) The department shall convene a stakeholder workgroup to make recommendations to the department regarding implementation of the program. The department shall convene regular meetings with the stakeholder workgroup in which the workgroup shall do all of the following:(A) Provide input regarding criteria for qualified grantees.(B) Provide best practices and program recommendations.(C) Provide consultation on implementation and priorities for technical assistance.(D) Identify barriers to implementation and suggest solutions to address those barriers.(E) Recommend anonymous data to be collected.(F) Collaboratively review data and program outcomes.(G) Advise on the design of the evaluation.(2) (A) The members of the stakeholder workgroup shall include, but not be limited to, a minimum of one of each of the following individuals:(i) Emergency medical system practitioners with experience providing community-based, trauma-informed, culturally competent care, de-escalation strategies, and harm reduction support.(ii) Public health or behavioral health practitioners with specific experience in community health and an understanding of health care, mental health services, trauma-informed, culturally competent care, de-escalation strategies, and harm reduction support.(iii) Members of the public, who have survived an emergency or crisis, and have used community-based services in response to the emergency or crisis.(iv) Survivors of police brutality.(v) Surviving family members of someone who has been subject to use of force resulting in death or serious bodily injury by a law enforcement officer.(B) The stakeholder workgroup shall not include current or former law enforcement officers or immediate family members of law enforcement officers.(e) The department shall issue a public report, to be posted on its internet website six months following the end of the program, on the programmatic and fiscal savings associated with the program, key conclusions, populations served and the benefits conferred or realized, using quantitative and qualitative data, and resulting policy recommendations to provide guidance to the Legislature and Governor in fully implementing and scaling a permanent program.SEC. 84. Any section of any act enacted by the Legislature during the 2025 calendar year that takes effect on or before January 1, 2026, and that amends, amends and renumbers, adds, repeals and adds, or repeals a section that is amended, amended and renumbered, added, repealed and added, or repealed by this act, shall prevail over this act, whether the act is enacted before, or subsequent to, the enactment of this act.